But the victim's brother says he can't think of anyone who would want to hurt him, saying, "Things were finally going well for him."
The body found at the Westfield Mall Wednesday morning was identified as 28-year-old San Francisco resident Frank Galicia, the San Francisco Medical Examiner's Office said.
The San Francisco Police Department said the death was ruled a homicide and an investigation is ongoing.
A spokesperson for Sons & Daughters said they were "shocked and devastated" by his death.
Louis Galicia said Frank initially stayed in hostels, but recently, "Things were finally going well for him."
"He found an apartment, he was dating a girl," Louis Galicia told KGO.
His way of connecting with the family was always making us a dish, making us dinner," Louis Galicia said.
He never wanted to be in any kind of altercation.
He was the brother that went with the flow.
"With everything else that's going wrong with the world, he was that diamond in the rough that was shining bright every day," he said.
Jennifer Aniston: I'm always pigeonholed
Jennifer Aniston need not always be perfect or successful.
"I'm always pigeonholed, or labelled by someone who has little, if anything, to do with me and reality."
"To be honest, I don't really give a damn about things like that."
The actress prefers to spend her time at home in front of the television with her hair in a relaxed bun, eating Mexican food, the magazine reports.
The question of whether she wants children makes her livid: "We women do not need to be married or have children to feel fulfilled," the Hollywood star says.
In her new film, "Mother's Day - love isn't child's play", Aniston stars as a single mother with two sons.
At the end of a golfing tournament in South Africa, Bernhard Langer and a colleague went for a ride along the beach for a bit of fun.
CHIO: "Golden Sport Pyramid" for Bernhard Langer
After a kilometre at this speed I was scared.
On Saturday, Germany's best golfer of all time - with 101 tournament wins under his belt - was once again near horses.
The German Sport Aid foundation awarded the man from Anhausen with the Golden Sport Pyramid at a small gala event.
The friendly sportsman is not lacking for awards.
Even the British Queen has bestowed an honour upon him.
Langer is the 18th person to be awarded the Sport Pyramid.
On Saturday, he met the first person to receive it, Hans Günter Winkler, in Aachen.
And in this vein, he passed the prize money of 25,000 euros on straight away.
After the official part, the illustrious gathering wandered to the show-jumping stadium, where the Lavazza Prize was underway.
Bernhard Langer kept his distance from the large animals.
If in doubt, Trump wants the state's role to be minor, and warns of how the state can damage the economy with taxes and regulations.
Clinton wants to lead the economy to its death and regulate it to its death, he says.
There has to be investment in infrastructure, Trump and Clinton say almost verbatim.
State programs investing in infrastructure are classic Democrat policies, and are rejected by the tea party wing of the Republican party, which is critical of the state.
Consequently, Trump could lead to discussions within the party.
Drilling for oil should be permitted in protected areas, and he wants to withdraw from the Paris Climate Change Treaty.
Neither want to sign TTP, the trans-Pacific trade agreement.
The current minimum wage of 7.25 US dollars is a pittance, she says.
Trump is on one side, wanting to relieve the burden on the economy and citizens to boost growth.
His critics state that this will just increase the budgetary deficit.
Clinton is on the opposite side: as a minimum, she wants the rich to pay more taxes, and her critics say that more taxes are not the solution either.
Seeking refuge: "Every refugee woman has dealt with sexual violence"
When they arrive in Germany, they are often traumatised.
One house offers refuge.
Every one of them has a baby with them, the oldest of which is one year old.
One woman holds her little son in her arms.
He looks around the room inquisitively, his eyes wide.
The scene looks normal.
She is the field manager for Condrobs, a provider of social assistance within Bavaria. One of the issues she deals with is refugee women.
They live in the north of Munich, in one of the few decentralised accommodation centres in Bavaria for refugee women and their children who have made the journey alone.
"I'm not exaggerating when I say that every woman who arrives here has dealt with sexual violence on her way to find refuge," said Bahr.
In their home countries, they experienced sexual violence, forced marriage, honour killings, slavery or forced prostitution.
That propels them forward.
And it continues even while they're on the run.
"It is not a rare occurrence that traffickers request a sexual act in exchange for a bottle of water, for example," says Bahr.
If you think that this stops as soon as they arrive in Germany, you'd be wrong, says Bahr.
Even in Germany, lone women are often seen as inferior in refugee accommodation, and, in the worst cases, they are abused.
"Or they can't bring themselves to talk about what they experienced because they are too ashamed".
Because they often don't know how to get help, there needs to be more accommodation just for them, says Bahr.
When asked if they knew of projects like the one in Munich operating within the areas they covered, some answered with "no".
In Upper Palatinate and Upper Franconia regions, for example, there is no similar accommodation offered by the government.
Even the European Parliament's Committee on "Women's Rights and Gender Equality" stresses that women must be provided with accommodation separate from that of the men.
"If there is a lack of private space, or if men and women are provided with accommodation together, this can result in (perpetual) violence against women".
Representatives of junior doctors have called on their union to authorise fresh industrial action in their dispute about a new contract.
The JDC says ministers have failed to address concerns about the contract.
Junior doctors and medical students voted in July to reject a contract deal agreed with the BMA.
She said: "In light of this, the JDC Executive has voted to reject the proposed new contract in full and to call for formal re-negotiations on all of your concerns."
In response to the government's silence, JDC exec has today made a formal request for a special meeting of BMA Council to authorise a rolling programme of escalated industrial action beginning in early September.
The dispute has led to junior doctors taking part in six strikes this year, including the first all-out stoppages in the history of the NHS.
The BMA's junior doctor leader, Dr Johann Malawana, resigned following the vote to reject the negotiated terms of the contract, which the BMA had recommended.
The leaders of Russia and Turkey met on Tuesday to shake hands and declare a formal end to an eight-month long war of words and economic sanctions.
There was the handshake, yes.
But Mr Putin's smile looked thin and he was hardly oozing warmth even by his own restrained standards.
I lost count.
He also pledged that relations with Russia would return not just to their pre-crisis level, but even higher.
The next day one newspaper here described Mr Erdogan as acting as if nothing bad had ever happened.
To me, his enthusiasm implied the opposite.
But a lingering coolness emanating from Mr Putin showed that Russia's leader has forgotten nothing.
In fact, the cause of the crisis was the first thing he mentioned in his opening comments: Turkey's shooting down of a Russian fighter plane on the Syrian border.
Mr Putin lashed out, accusing Ankara of stabbing Moscow in the back.
The offence was even greater, coming from a supposed friend.
All of a sudden, it seemed like Turks were to blame for everything.
First and foremost, Erdogan needs all the friends he can get after he was nearly ousted from power last month in a failed coup.
Russian sanctions have hit hard - particularly the ban on charter flights, which usually carry several million Russian tourists to the Turkish coast each year.
They're banking on a late-season rush to the Mediterranean.
And even this week, state TV has been predicting cheaper fruit and vegetables once Turkish agricultural imports are permitted again.
"Tourists that way, tomatoes back here," as a report in Vedemosti newspaper phrased it.
Ankara is angry with the West for what it considers a weak response to the attempted takeover.
Add to that its long-standing grudge at the snail's pace of talks to join the EU and step in Mr Putin - who is keen to capitalise on the chill and chip away at Turkey's ties with the West.
The Russian leader certainly won bonus points with Ankara for calling in support of the elected authorities after the attempted coup.
Mind you, that's a given for Moscow which has its own deep-seated fear of regime change.
So the summit at this glitzy, seaside palace allowed Russia and Turkey to present what one analyst described to me as an "alliance of misfits": two countries that feel rejected and mistreated by the West, joining forces.
The key one is Syria, where Moscow has recently been casting itself as peacemaker but where Russia and Turkey back opposite sides.
It could be telling that after almost three hours of initial talks, the two presidents told a press conference that they hadn't even touched on the topic.
Royal Bank of Scotland to disappear for customers outside Scotland
It has retreated from them since it nearly collapsed eight years ago and had to be bailed out.
It was backed with millions of pounds in sponsorship of international sport, from Six Nations rugby to Wimbledon champion Andy Murray.
Royal Bank of Scotland will be used with Scottish customers, but will not be initialised.
In England and Wales, all RBS references, outside head office and the stock exchange listing, will be changed to NatWest.
RBS had already stated that it would not to continue its Six Nations sponsorship, and it has been raising the profile of different brands in its sports sponsorship.
"The time is right for us to move to the bank of brands, because underneath (we've been asking) how do we focus on making this a better bank for customers?" said the chief executive.
It would have been very cynical three years ago if we'd said we're going to be a great bank for customers and put those brands out there.
Frankie Dettori reaches 3,000 winners with victory at Newmarket on Predilection
He brought up the landmark with his second winner of the night at his local track - on Predilection, trained by John Gosden.
The 45-year-old Italian is the sixth jockey to reach the landmark in Flat racing.
He follows Sir Gordon Richards, Doug Smith, Lester Piggott, Pat Eddery and Willie Carson.
Three-time champion jockey Dettori, who earlier won on Ghayyar, said: "It's special."
I'm relieved and very humble.
Dettori soaks up the cheers as he brings in Predilection after victory
Two jockeys have reached the milestone in jump racing - champion jockey Richard Johnson and retired 20-time champion Sir Anthony McCoy, who had more than 4,300 victories in a record-breaking career.
Frankie is one of the best jockeys of the modern era and it is no surprise he has reached this landmark so few have achieved before him.
He is stylish and strong, but it is his tactical nous that sets him apart from others in the weighing room.
He is a fantastic ambassador for racing, his enthusiasm and charisma have been drawing fans to the sport for years.
I said to Frankie a few weeks ago at Epsom he'd have ridden 6,000 winners if he wasn't just a weekend and big-race jockey!
Seriously though, Frankie's been riding winners in the UK for the best part of 30 years which is great to see.
Frankie Dettori celebrated the milestone with a trademark flying dismount
From flying finishes to flying dismounts, Frankie Dettori has been the poster boy of British Flat racing for two decades.
It has been a rollercoaster ride.
Stacks of big-race winners, including his famous 1996 'Magnificent Seven' at Ascot, but he also survived a plane crash and served a drugs ban.
Three years ago he initially struggled when returning from that six-month suspension, but he showed formidable strength of character to defy the doubters and return to his best.
And he may not be done for some time - Dettori has previously said he would like to carry on competing until the age of 50, at least.
Mr Ivanov has been part of Mr Putin's trusted inner circle for many years.
A statement from the Kremlin said that Mr Putin had "decreed to relieve Ivanov of his duties as head of the Russian presidential administration," but gave no reason.
Later he managed presidential protocol and government staff, the Kremlin website says (in Russian).
I think the administration's most important task is to support your activity as head of state in terms of drafting laws and control over how your instructions are implemented.
Mr Putin told a Russian TV station on Friday that Mr Ivanov had asked to leave the post, and recommended that Mr Vaino should replace him.
Sergei Ivanov has long been one of Vladimir Putin's closest allies and, like him, served in the Soviet security service, the KGB.
But despite the smiles for the cameras, few here are convinced - especially now, just before parliamentary elections.
So is this the fall-out from some kind of power struggle?
Well, it turns out that I've been presidential chief of staff for four years and eight months.
Gibson was involved in a physical altercation on the set of the show in Los Angeles last month.
There were creative differences on the set and a disagreement.
I regret that it occurred," he said in a statement.
Details on how Gibson's character will be written out of the show, which follows a team of FBI agents, is expected to come at a later date, according to the ABC Studios and CBS Television Studios statement.
The 54-year-old, who previously starred on the sitcom Dharma & Greg, had been on the show since its first season in 2005.
I had hoped to see it through to the end, but that won't be possible now.
Mystery as fish land in Banff garden
Kevin Bain thinks the 75 fish could be sand eels deposited by a waterspout.
Mr Bain, who lives about 500m from the sea, posted footage of the spectacle on Periscope in the hope someone could shed light on the appearance of the two-inch fish.
The £1.35bn project is now due to be complete by May 2017
Engineers have joined the Queensferry Crossing's north deck and viaduct - meaning the bridge is now connected to Fife.
It is the first of four closures between the "deck fans," which are now nearing completion around each of the bridge's three towers.
The bridge section from Fife is now 600 metres long and weighs 30,000 tonnes.
We're all witnessing engineering on a truly epic scale on this project, with over 30,000 tonnes of concrete and steel used just to build this part of the bridge.
Despite the massive size and weight of the bridge completing the closure between the viaduct and bridge deck is a delicate operation involving extremely precise tolerances for fit up.
Michael Martin, Forth Crossing Bridge Constructors project director said: "The first closure on any bridge project is always a significant milestone.
On this fantastic project, this closure represents leading edge civil engineering.
After installing the last road deck section and connecting it to the expanding North Tower road deck, we then had to close the remaining gap on the north - or landward - side.
This was done by pulling the northern approach viaduct 700 millimetres southwards.
Delicate because the tolerances the team were working to were tiny - just a few millimetres either way.
Happily, it all went very well.
Moelfre Bay rescue: Three men are 'lucky to be alive'
Three men are "lucky to be alive" after they were thrown from their fishing boat off Anglesey.
The three men struggled to swim to safety while their boat continued under its own power.
"We saw their boat circling close to them and imagined the worst," said Moelfre lifeboat helm Vince Jones.
"Fortunately, by the time we had launched, the strong winds had blown it clear of them," he added.
Two of the men were rescued by a local fishing boat, while the third man, aged 60, was found exhausted and clinging to a buoy without a lifejacket.
They were all taken on board the inshore lifeboat and brought back to the lifeboat station
Mr Jones said: "The three men thrown in the water are lucky to be alive and completely uninjured.
The boat's engine had an emergency kill cord but it had somehow come detached from the person driving the boat when it capsized.
Someone was watching over these guys today.
Instead, the drunk attacker sliced up his ex-girlfriend's clothes.
While the 50-year-old man was destroying his ex-girlfriend's clothing, he called his mother.
They met the man's ex-partner in the street.
The SPD and the Greens think that investors should step up to the plate much more in the future.
But it won't be smooth sailing.
SPD group chairman, Christoph Bratmann, says: "We agree with the Greens: if you want to build on municipal land, you will have to designate 20 percent of all homes as social housing in the future."
However, the main issue for the council, according to Bratmann: "How do we handle investors who want to build on private ground?"
A new municipal programme to promote the construction of homes, which will cost millions, and which still needs to be financed, will trigger concerns.
Despite that, according to Bratman, the situation in terms of the housing market is also hotting up.
If the action plan is implemented, the building authorities will be faced with additional tasks.
But the program is not quite complete: because the approximately 1260 new homes are to be built anyway.
To prevent this, according to Nicole Palm, spokeswoman for planning policy, bonds that are about to mature should be purchased by the municipality.
In addition, thought must be given to putting homes back into a price maintenance scenario.
The problem could be solved in one fell swoop.
This is because deadlines expire at the end of the year in the west of the city.
Around 1800 homes could then be moved into the managed price scheme for affordable housing.
This would dramatically increase the amount of affordable housing in the west of the city, taking a step back from the target of "blending".
The Greens think there's still room for manoeuvre in the discussions.
Group chairman Holger Herlitschke thinks that "the CDU will have to get into bed with us to reach a decent majority."
Pokémon Go a worthy hunt for health and happiness
Pokemon Go is getting people off the couch and into some activity.
Screen time was initially limited to the television then video games and more recently smartphones.
So it is great to see that technology and being active outdoors are not mutually exclusive.
Like many pop cultural phenomena it had gone off the boil somewhat before this new game was made available in the US, Australia and New Zealand in early July.
A generation who played the game when younger have joined the craze, jumping off the couch for the search.
The company does not know who is playing Pokémon Go - it just sees raw data on exercise levels.
Many public health campaigns to get people to "find 30," "get off the couch" and "be active everyday" have fallen on deaf ears because most public health messages are boring and delivered by people who look miserable.
Those who exercise regularly reduce their chances of getting cancer or depression.
But the beauty of Pokémon Go is it gets people outside doing something they enjoy.
As usual there are po-faced killjoys looking for something to complain about.
And yes somebody might walk into a door.
For while smartphone apps like Fitbit could previously track our activity, they didn't give us a reason to exercise like this game does.
The novelty will wear off and use will subside in due course.
However because of Pokmeon's success there will be more games that combine apps and virtual reality with being active in the real world, helping many people on the hunt to be more active, fitter and healthier.
Simone Biles nails all-around gold in women's gymnastics
Forget the hype.
Dynamic on vault.
Effortless on beam.
Jaw-dropping on floor.
Brilliant all over.
The 19-year-old American gymnast soared to the all-around title on Thursday, putting the gap between herself and the rest of the world on full display under the Olympic spotlight.
Her total of 62.198 was well clear of silver medalist and "Final Five" teammate Aly Raisman and Russian bronze medalist Aliya Mustafina.
United States' Simone Biles performs on the balance beam during the artistic gymnastics women's individual all-around final at the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, Thursday.
Biles became the fourth straight American woman to win the all-around title and fifth overall while cementing her reputation as the best of her generation and perhaps ever.
She burst into tears when her final total was posted and her long journey to this moment ended.
The achievement puts her in the same league as once-in-a-generation athletes like Michael Phelps who have taken their sports to new heights:
One last test awaited in Brazil, a contest not so much between Biles and the rest of the field but between herself and the burden of oversized expectations.
Anything less than heading back to her family's home in Spring, Texas, with a fistful of golds would be seen as a disappointment.
United States' Simone Biles, left, and Aly Raisman embrace after winning gold and silver respectively for the artistic gymnastics women's individual all-around final at the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, Thursday, Aug.
Biles earned the first one on Tuesday while serving as the exclamation point to retiring national team coordinator Martha Karolyi's going away party.
While Biles insisted she's never looked ahead during her long run at the top, that's not exactly true.
A portion of her floor exercise routine - the one that includes her signature tumbling pass - is set to Latin music that would fit right at home in the street right outside the Rio Olympic Arena.
The girl adopted by her grandparents as a toddler and discovered by coach Aimee Boorman's mother during a field trip to the gym where Boorman was coaching has become a force.
She hasn't lost an all-around competition since the summer of 2013, a winning streak that should go for as long as Biles wants it to.
Though Mustafina took a small lead through two rotations, it was a mirage.
Balance beam and floor exercise - where Biles is the defending world champion - lay in wait.
She went back in front with a 15.433 on beam - and capped it with a 15.933 on floor.
Raisman hugged her gently as they awaited the final score - a mere formality - and tears appeared around Biles' glittery red, white and blue eyeliner when the vision she once wrote in a scrapbook became a reality.
Raisman's performance was a bit of revenge from four years ago, when she tied for third but lost the bronze to Mustafina on a tiebreaker.
This time, the 22-year-old team captain the Americans call "grandma" was well ahead.
She blew kisses to the crowd after her floor exercise, overcome by a comeback that at times seemed in doubt.
As for Biles, the 19-year-old's viral tweet from earlier this week now carries a whole new meaning:
Police: 3 victims in serial killer case shot while listening to music in car
Two women and a 12-year-old girl who died in the deadliest attack in Phoenix's first serial killer case in a decade were sitting in a car talking and listening to music when they were shot, according to police reports released Thursday.
Angela Rochelle Liner, Stefanie R. Ellis and Ellis' daughter Maleah were shot on June 12 while the car was parked in a driveway, authorities said.
The gunman fired as many as eight shots from a handgun while standing on the passenger side of the car then fled in another vehicle, the report states.
"It's occurring within a residential area in front of a home," Howard said to CBS affiliate KPHO earlier this month.
Ellis, 33, was hospitalized for her injuries and later died.
Authorities also released a police report on a shooting that targeted an unoccupied pickup truck just a half-hour before the triple killing and is believed to have been the work of the serial killer.
Investigators found bullet casings and recovered a bullet from a seat and bullet fragments from the engine compartment.
Which is not true at all -- of course you sign up for it," she said.
She and her husband, Vincent, were told Edmund might never recognize them, and that he might not even survive.
Edmund walks with the help of a walker.
Edmund didn't sit up or crawl until he was three, and he still doesn't talk.
But he's slowly meeting some milestones.
He's walking with help, and riding a bike.
Elizabeth demonstrates the sign language Edmund made up for "please sing to me."
Microcephaly can arise from a number of different conditions: genetic ones like Edmund's, and infections during pregnancy from viruses like measles and Zika.
I kept saying, what's going to happen?
Numerous rivers in southeast Louisiana and southern Mississippi were overflowing their banks and threatening widespread flooding after extreme rainfall, the National Weather Service reported.
Mike Steele, a spokesman for the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness, said requests were coming in for high-water vehicles, boats and sandbags.
A flood watch remains in effect until Saturday across most of south Louisiana.
The weather service said in a statement that an additional 3 to 5 inches could fall over the area.
In south Alabama, a flood watch was in effect Friday as rain continued in the Mobile area.
The Comite River near Baton Rouge and Amite River near Denham Springs, both in Louisiana, were predicted to set record crests over the weekend.
He also said that flooding downstream in Ascension Parish is a threat, as those swollen rivers will be slow to drain into Lake Maurepas.
Hansford, 62, says waters from Beaver Creek, which is normally more than 400 feet away from his house, rose quickly overnight.
"We woke up and the water kept on coming," Hansford said.
It came up to my waist.
His wife told Hansford that it's the highest she's seen the creek in the 48 years she's lived there.
Krautmann says flooding is "quickly becoming widespread" as heavy rains continue, saying officials are considering evacuation orders.
Krautmann says one observer near Livingston reported 13.75 inches of rain from midnight to Friday morning.
Krautmann said the ground was heavily saturated by rainfall since Wednesday.
Heavy rain and street flooding prompted the rescue of residents from their homes in Tangipahoa Parish and the cancellation of classes in five school districts, authorities said.
CBS affiliate WWL reports that an alderwoman in Tangipahoa said 200 homes flooded.
Residents had been evacuated to two churches but both are now flooding.
In the Tangipahoa Parish city of Hammond, close to two dozen streets were closed because of high water, and sandbags were made available for pickup by residents hoping to keep water out of homes and businesses.
"The last major flood we had was in March," said city administrator Lacy Landrum.
This one is on track to be a similar event.
In Mississippi, Harrison County Emergency Manager Rupert Lacy said steady rain continued on the Gulf Coast.
He said a handful of houses were reported as flooded Thursday, but none have been reported so far Friday.
The child's grandparents identified him to CBS Philadelphia as Mahaj Brown.
"He just took a lot, his little body was riddled with bullets," his grandmother Delores Melendez tells the station.
Also shot were three men: two 29-year-olds and one 32-year old.
One of the 29-year-old men was reported in critical condition; the other two victims were listed in stable condition, according to CBS Philadelphia.
Investigators tells CBS Philadelphia it appears there was crossfire between multiple gunmen.
Assault weapon-style shell casings, traced to different assault style weapons, littered the scene.
It appears that this was definitely an ongoing battle.
There were casings in the street, on both sides of the sidewalk.
So it appears that there were multiple armed combatants out here and that they were actively engaged," Philadelphia police Captain Anthony Ginaldi told the station.
Another 6-year-old, a girl, was hit in her arm by a stray bullet Tuesday while playing in front of her home in the West Oak Lane neighborhood.
She is recovering, and police are still searching for a suspect.
And second: This team features three gymnasts, Simone Biles, Gabby Douglas and Lauren "Laurie" Hernandez, who have been inspiring so many young girls of color.
The make-up of this team, rounded out by Aly Raisman, who is Jewish, and Madison Kocian, who is Catholic, is making everyone proud.
It also has solidified the black and Latina female presence at the top of this sport.
Now the world has been able to witness the incredible performances of three-time World Champion Simone Biles, Douglas and Laurie Hernandez delivering the unexpected, yet masterful gymnastics routines.
On Thursday, Simone became the fourth straight American to win gold in the women's individual all-around event.
We are witnessing the top of the sport, but it does not look like this at gymnastics classes across the country.
Simone, Gabby and Laurie all took the same path as Aly and Madison to make the Olympic team.
They are the "Final Five" because the next Olympic gymnastics team will only have four gymnasts on the team, and this is Marta Karolyi's last year coaching.
But the reality is that gymnastics is an expensive sport, and gymnasts primarily train in private gymnastics clubs that are maintained by parents paying the cost of the training, facility, travel, uniforms, competition fees, hotel fees (for the coaches and their gymnasts and families) and the list goes on.
Most of these gymnastics clubs are located in affluent suburban neighborhoods that can support the business.
Aimee Boorman, coach of Simone Biles, and Maggie Haney, coach of Laurie Hernandez, have both coached their athletes since they started in gymnastics.
At my organizations, we have provided free and low-cost gymnastics, based in Harlem, for over 15,000 urban youth (primarily black and Hispanic) and have trained national and international champions.
In September, we will be expanding to Detroit (my hometown) to provide high quality gymnastics to the youth that deserve the opportunity to learn and benefit from this great Olympic sport.
Gymnastics develops strength, flexibility and coordination for the body and hard work, discipline and determination for the mind.
To participate in sport is so important, especially for girls.
Thank you Simone, Aly, Laurie, Gabby and Madison for that serious showcase of "Girl Power" in winning the Olympic team gold and for motivating so many young girls of all backgrounds to begin their path to be healthy, strong and successful young women.
In July, Mr Hunt revealed plans to impose the contract saying the NHS was in "no man's land" and any further delay would be damaging for staff and patients.
The first junior doctors are moved onto the new contract, which includes changes to overnight and weekend working practices to improve care at unsociable hours.
With just eight weeks before the first group of doctors are moved onto the new contract, progress needs to be made and time is running out.
Efforts by the BMA to resolve the dispute through talks have been met with an unwillingness to engage and, at times, deafening silence from the government.
If he does not then junior doctors are clear that they are prepared to take further industrial action.
The last strike at the end of April saw the postponement of nearly 13,000 routine operations and 100,000 appointments as nurses and consultants were drafted in to provide cover for doctors on the picket line.
Ministers had hoped to end the dispute over the changes by agreeing to a reformed contract with British Medical Association officials.
The BMA wants better weekend pay for the 54,000 junior doctors who would be subject of the contract.
Over the last two months we have been talking with the Junior Doctors Committee and have, along with the Department of Health and others, responded positively to their concerns regarding the Guardian Role and Whistleblowing.
The £2-a-day drug that can cut heart attack threat
Thousands of heart attack patients are to benefit from a £2-a-day drug, after officials recommended it be given to more people for longer.
Anti-clotting drug ticagrelor slashes the risk of repeat attacks for people with heart disease.
NHS watchdog NICE has advised that it should be given to people for four years, to further reduce the risk of cardiovascular problems.
If the plaque breaks apart it can cause a blood clot, blocking blood to the heart causing a heart attack.
And if the clot dislodges it can travel in the blood stream and block blood flow to the brain, causing a stroke.
Ticagrelor, which is made by UK firm AstraZeneca and sold under the trade name Brilique, reduces this risk by making clots less likely.
The evidence shows that ticagrelor, in combination with aspirin, is effective at reducing the risk of further heart attacks and strokes in people who have already had a heart attack.
Ex-Tower Hamlets mayor Lutfur Rahman was removed from office last year for corruption, prompting the government report
A culture of political correctness has led to a blind eye being turned to widespread voting fraud in Muslim communities, a devastating government report reveals today.
Ex-Cabinet minister Sir Eric Pickles lambasts the police, election watchdogs and town halls for ignoring evidence of electoral abuse because of "over-sensitivities about ethnicity and religion."
The former communities secretary, now the anti-corruption tsar, said the intimidation of voters on religious grounds was so bad that police should be allowed to put cordons outside polling stations to protect frightened voters.
Currently, a voter merely has to state their name and address.
The report even suggests putting indelible ink on a person's fingers as they cast their ballot to prevent anyone being able to vote twice.
"This is not solely to protect against electoral fraud, but to protect local government from the broader culture of corruption and financial fraud that goes hand in hand with it," he said.
The report was ordered by Downing Street in the wake of the Tower Hamlets voting scandal in East London.
The court found Rahman "cynically perverted" the religious feeling of his Muslim community and silenced his critics with accusations of racism and Islamophobia.
He voiced particular alarm about postal voting fraud - in which senior members of the Muslim community were said to have exerted pressure on people to vote for a candidate of their choosing.
Sir Eric, pictured, made several recommendations to clean up the voting system including bringing your ID to prove who you are
His report says: "Evidence was presented of pressure being put on vulnerable members of some ethnic minority communities, particularly women and young people, to vote according to the will of the elders, especially in communities of Pakistani and Bangladeshi background.
"There were concerns that... state institutions had turned a blind eye to such behaviour because of "politically correct" over-sensitivities about ethnicity and religion."
Sir Eric made 50 recommendations to clean up the system, including banning political activists from handling postal ballot papers to stop "vote harvesting."
The report, being considered by Theresa May, also calls for tougher checks on registration to prevent the electoral register being used for immigration and benefit fraud.
Consider the options for requiring voters to produce ID before voting.
Use indelible ink on a person's fingers once they cast their ballot to prevent anyone voting twice.
Ban political campaigners and activists from handling completed postal votes and postal vote envelopes.
Change the law to make it easier to charge people with intimidation under the Representation of the People Act 1983.
"The election court disqualified Lutfur Rahman and his agent for a litany of corrupt and illegal practices," he said.
He was found guilty beyond reasonable doubt - to a criminal standard of proof - on a series of grounds.
Our nation has a proud heritage as the mother of parliaments, yet the worrying and covert spread of electoral fraud and state of denial by some bodies threatens that good reputation.
Crazy for Kate's cyclist lookalike and other celeb doppelgangers of Rio Olympians
Fans of the Rio 2016 Olympics this week have gone wild for French cyclist Pauline Ferrand-Prevot, who has proven an impressive lookalike for the Duchess of Cambridge.
But the 24-year-old Olympian is far from the only athlete out fighting for gold this summer that boasts their own celebrity doppelganger - at least not according to social media.
So, in honor of the Rio Games and all the famous faces crossing our screens at the moment, FEMAIL have compiled a list of Olympians who bear more than a passing resemblance with Hollywood celebs.
Aside from Kate's doppelganger on the cycling track, many people online have been quick to point out how a certain archer could be the twin of A-lister Leonardo DiCaprio.
U.S. Men's Archery Team member Brady Ellison has caused a storm on Twitter after images of him looking eerily similar to the Wolf of Wall Street star surfaced.
'I personally don't see a huge resemblance, maybe besides the facial hair,' Brady told Huffington Post.
One of the most popular comparisons from London 2012 is undoubtedly going to be pointed out even more this year: the striking likeness between British long jumper Greg Rutherford and popular actor Neil Patrick Harris.
Russian gymnast Aliya Mustafina, with her large, expressive eyes, has been said to be a dead ringer for Cuban-American singer Gloria Estefan.
Changing it up: This user reckons that Nathan is an 'athletic version' of the Inception actor
Another long-running comparison has been between tennis star Rafael Nadal and actor Josh Hartnett who boast a similar heavy brow and lips.
Floating a theory: According to this user, perhaps there is a reason behind the pair's similar looks
One Twitter user took to the site recently to declare her happiness that 'the rest of the internet thinks that Hope Solo and Jennifer Carpenter are actually identical.'
Byron MacDonald's analysis of 14-year-old Ai Yanhan's fourth place finish at the women's 4x200m freestyle relay outraged viewers of CBC's live Olympic coverage on Wednesday
Canadian broadcaster CBC has been forced to apologize after one of its commentators said a 14-year-old female Chinese swimmer 'went out like stink' and 'died like a pig' during a race.
Commentator Byron MacDonald thought his mic was turned off when he started to dispense some of his own opinions at the end of the women's 4x200m freestyle relay final.
MacDonald, who was brought on board CBC's commentary team to provide 'color' could be heard saying: 'That little 14-year-old from China dropped the ball, baby'.
Too excited, went out like stink, died like a pig.
Chinese swimmer Ai Yanhan, 14, swam the second leg of the relay in 1:57.79 - 1.61 seconds slower than Canada's Taylor Ruck, allowing the Canadians to close the gap on China.
Viewers across Canada were quick to react online after being shocked by the tone and the language used
Emmett Macfarlane tweeted, "Did the CBC announcer just say the 14-year-old swimmer from China 'died like a pig'"????
The idiot didn't realize they were still on the air.'
Ai Yanhan of China in the Women's 4 x 200m Freestyle Relay Final was described as: 'That little 14-year-old from China dropped the ball, baby.'
Criticism on Twitter came thick and fast against Byron MacDonald with many calling him out
Twitter users did not hold back when the heard how insensitive Byron Macdonlad was being
You represent the CBC and Canada and make us all sound like a bunch of racists. #disgusted.
Soon after, Scott Russel who was hosting CBC's broadcast apologized on-air for MacDonald's comment, saying: 'We apologize the comment on a swim performance made it to air.'
CBC ended up apologizing more than 90 times to people who had tweeted in response to the remark
That said, they were inappropriate and an unfortunate choice of words and Byron is very sorry for what he said.
On Thursday afternoon, MacDonald apologized on-air and attempted to qualify his remark by stating he didn't mean for it to be construed as a personal attack.
'I was referring to a swimmer's performance, and not to them as a person.'
'Needless to say, there was no disrespect intended and I'm very sorry.'
Primark shopper outraged at woman who brazenly tried on underwear in the middle of the shop
Shoppers didn't know where to look when a woman stripped off to try on knickers on the shop floor in the middle of a Primark.
To make it even worse, she sized up how she looked in them, peeled them off and put them back on the shelf.
She carried on browsing and eventually tried on four pairs of underwear at the store in Bouverie Place shopping centre, Folkestone.
The Primark store in Bouverie Place shopping centre, Folkestone, where the woman tried on knickers before putting them back on the shelf
A mother-of-two, Jenny Davidson, who was in the shop at the time, said after trying on the underwear the mystery woman 'got dressed again and walked out of the store without buying anything.'
Standing in the middle of the shop floor, she took a pair of knickers from the display, stripped off her own tights and pants and put them on.
'She didn't try to find anywhere discreet to do it - she just stood there, bold as brass.'
'She didn't seem to care who was watching - or think about the person who would eventually buy the knickers she'd been trying on.'
Ms Davidson, 33, who lives in the Kent town, said: 'How disgusting to think someone is going to take home knickers that another person has been wearing and they haven't been cleaned.'
'I'd hate to get home with a new pair of knickers and find another woman had put them on and taken them off again, and they hadn't been washed.'
All the product in question has been removed from sale.
Whether you're approached from in front or behind, this video will show you how to turn the tables on your mugger.
If approached from behind, Mizrachi says, the first thing to do is turn around, so that you can see your attacker and 'clear the line of fire'.
A knee to the groin follows, and while the attacker doubles up in pain, you twist the gun from his hands, smack him in the face with the barrel and back up, keeping the weapon trained on him.
For gunmen approaching from the front, it's a similar technique - get your body out of the line of fire, grab the gun and twist it around so the villain can't fire.
At the same time, put weight on the gun and punch the attacker in the chest, then twist the gun from his grip before backing up and pointing it at him.
But remember that the safest way out of any mugging - if you're not a Krav Maga grandmaster - is to hand over your cash.
Traveller Ian Wright scrapes his tongue along Europe's dirtiest places for travel guide
A British traveller has put his immune system and gag reflex to a serious test - by licking some of the dirtiest and disgusting places in Europe.
Presenter and travel writer Ian Wright, 51, from Suffolk, scraped his tongue along a Euro note, a Piccadilly Circus hand rail, a train toilet's flush button and a Russian public telephone to prove the strength of his immune system.
Before licking each object, he used a luminometer to show himself, and us, just what he was getting in to.
But the experiment, which has be made into a film called The Lickhiker's Guide to Inner Strength, threw up some surprising results.
The thought of licking a train's flush button used by thousands of other may be utterly repellent, but in fact there are more bad bacteria in a kitchen sink.
Fortunately, nothing he licked left him with anything more than a bad taste in his mouth.
Mr Wright became known for testing the durability of his gut by travelling around the world and eating weird and wonderful things.
From public handrails in train stations to a toilet flush button the task definitely tested his immune system
In the movie made about it he said: 'Ever since I was a kid I have been fairly carefree with my health and I've put all sorts of things in my mouth from soil, eating worms and muddy water.'
He certainly proved his reputation during the film.
The only thing he turned down was a filthy Russian public toilet.
His sample swab showed a luminometer count of over 4000 units.
By comparison, freshly washed hands should come in under 60.
But there was one Russian public toilet he refused to lick after his luminometer count was over 4000 units, when freshly washed hands are less than 60
He said in the film: 'That is close to one of the worst things I have smelled in a toilet.'
There's nothing more dirty than that!
I'm not going to lick anything because it's disgusting in there.
Something that would be fascinating to watch and at the same time explain the benefits of probiotics.
They claim the interest in gut health is becoming a global phenomenon
I also think the film shows we have a great sense of humour!
Tom Hakala, who directed the film, added: 'Let's put it this way - I would have lost my respect for Ian if he had licked some of the things I asked him to, like the disgusting Russian toilet that's shown in the film.'
Naturally some things were easier to get Ian to lick, some were pretty tough.
I'm glad we got some of those dirty licks caught on tape.'
Family of yobs destroyed Saltash, Cornwall council house ahead of eviction
A family of yobs left their council house with £50,000 worth of damage after they were evicted for terrorising their neighbours.
Tanya Skeldon and her partner Shaun Trebilcock have been kicked out of the property in Saltash, Cornwall, after a long list of complaints against them.
After they were forcibly removed from the property, shocked housing associations officers found the property in a state of disrepair.
The walls were left with gaping holes, floorboards were ripped up, rubbish was strewn over the floor and graffiti was daubed on the walls.
The family have now been moved on and are believed to be living in a private accomodation
There are a lot of things to weigh up because this property will probably be known by the not-so-nice element of Cornwall.
The couple had three sons who lived at the property intermittently and police say the reign of terror the family inflicted included fighting in the street with baseball bats, intimidating nearby residents, drug use, drug dealing and excessive shouting, arguing and swearing.
Skeldon, 47, whose name was on the tenancy, was given an antisocial behaviour order in June.
Floor boards had been pulled up in the property, from which drugs had been dealt in the past
Neighbours say they were seen fighting in the street and police were regularly called
Cornwall Housing evicted her and her partner forcefully from the property this week after giving them an extended period of 11 weeks to move on voluntarily.
One said: 'They didn't care about anybody.'
The amount of times we've seen the police down here is unbelievable.
We got up because it was so quiet here - we're not used to that!
Adam Fitzpatrick, Cornwall Housing's neighbourhood enforcement manager, said the family failed to cooperate with the local authority.
The family have lived in the house for 20 years, with police regularly called to the property
Rubbish and old toys have been thrown down the overgrown side of the council house
He added: 'It is a shame that the tenant failed to accept any responsibility for the behaviour of her and her family as eviction is always the last course of action that Cornwall Housing considers.
This was a very difficult case as the behaviour was extreme and their actions must have been terrifying for her neighbours to witness.
I appreciate all the work that has been put in by my team, Devon and Cornwall Police and members of the community who bravely came forward to give us information.
I hope that this development will give some comfort to the neighbours and sends out a message that antisocial behaviour will not be tolerated.
Mr Fitzpatrick said that the three sons had all lived at the property at different times but said they were all in their 20s.
Housing workers will now have to clear away the piles of rubbish which surround the house
Skeldon was fined after pleading guilty to possession of a Class B drug with intent to supply.
The walls of many of the house's rooms had graffiti scrawled across them.
Police say they will seek to evict tenants who flout the rules of their tenancies
'This sends out to those who feel that they can behave without recrimination, as well as those blighted by such behaviour,' she said.
Tourists in Portugal are left terrified as a low-flying military jet flies skims beach
This is the moment terrified tourists start to panic as a low-flying jet swooped down over a packed beach.
Dramatic footage showed the military plane almost coming within touching distance of sunseekers on the stretch of sand in Aveiro, northern Portugal.
Holidaymakers rose to their feet as they became understandably concerned about the noise from the jet engines without being able to see at first what was coming their way through the clouds.
Daniel Fernandes, one of several holidaymakers who posted videos of the dramatic fly-by onto social media, said: 'It passed really low twice and there was a point when it looked like it was going to crash.'
Tourists on the beach at Aveiro were terrified when the plane appeared out of the murk and flew at an incredibly low altitude
He said the jet had flown slightly lower than normal because of poor visibility caused by the smoke from nearby wildfires, but the air force insisted no-one's safety had been compromised.
Wildfires have devastated parts of mainland Portugal this summer as well as killing four people on the island of Madeira.
Seville - On Sunday, FC Barcelona will fight to take their first step towards their first title of the new football season.
The two-time champions will have to face up to the defeated Cup finalists and reigning Europa League champions without Neymar, who is playing in the Olympic football tournament for Brazil.
Coach Luis Enrique has so far refused to make a clear decision either way, allowing Bravo to wear the jersey in league games, but giving it to Ter Stegen in most of their other matches.
Ahead of the first compulsory game of the new season there were doubts as to the Spanish champions' fitness: they lost 0-4 to Liverpool in a friendly game on Saturday.
On the other hand, Sevilla have to swallow their 2-3 extra-time defeat against Real Madrid in the Supercup, and are aiming for a second victory in the "Supercopa de Espana".
With eleven victories, Barcelona are the current record-holders for this competition.
Ma Long is in a league of his own, taking Gold in the table tennis
On Thursday, the 27-year-old beat his fellow countryman and "defending champion" Zhang Jike in Rio de Janeiro 4-0 in a one-sided final (12,5,4,4).
This gave the world number one the "golden grand slam", winning the World Championship, the World Cup, the final tournament of the World Tour, and the Olympics.
The last non-Chinese athlete on the top step of the Olympic podium was former SVS Lower Austria legionary Ryu Seung-min from South Korea.
They had returned to the stands, leaving their charges alone to fight a fair battle against each other.
Ma only had to fight off his 28-year-old opponent in the first set.
Afterwards, he set the pace on the table, and only let Zhang score a total of 13 points.
Ma's dominance meant that the match was not as exciting as expected.
But nevertheless, there were some breathtaking volleys to be seen.
The Belarussian had injured his rib in his quarter-final against German European Champion Dimitrij Ovtcharov, and was given medical treatment, and ultimately had to content himself with fourth place.
Jan-Ove Waldner from Sweden (38/2004) and Jörgen Persson (42/2008) also reached fourth place at the Olympics at a similarly old age for table tennis.
The US Republicans' lead is plagued by significant fears that they might lose their majority, even in states that are traditionally conservative.
Presidential candidate Donald Trump has now admitted to the weaknesses of his election campaign in Utah, formerly a Republican stronghold.
It was a strange moment - the multi-millionaire normally puts on a pompous, self-assured performance, but this time he expressed something analogous to doubt, as correspondents report.
After he had beaten 16 rivals from within the Republican camp, doubt is now growing as to whether he will be successful in the race for the White House.
"We have huge problems in Utah," Trump said to an audience of evangelical Christians whom he asked for assistance in key states such as Ohio, Florida or Virginia.
He blamed false reports on his candidacy, once again giving the media a dressing-down, as he is known to do.
Utah is normally a safe seat for the Republicans.
A poll carried out by SurveyUSA in June puts Trump and his competitor on an equal footing with Democrat Hillary Clinton.
Other bodies do put Trump ahead, but not by the margin usual for Republican candidates in the state.
And he added: "Either it'll work out, or I'll go on a long, long holiday".
If he doesn't make it because of political correctness, that's ok, Trump added.
Then, he said, I'd return to a very nice way of life.
A Kenyan official announced that former sprinter and current coach John Anzrah had given a urine sample in the Olympic village in the name of 800-metre runner Ferguson Rotich.
"The IAAF will perform an evaluation, depending on the findings of the investigation and the steps taken by the IOC as a result," said an IAAF statement.
He had the athlete's accreditation as given in the list of training checks for the World Anti-Doping Agency.
Four days previously, the Head of the Kenyan track & field delegation, Michael Rotich, had been sent away from the Rio games.
After numerous instances of doping, the IOC has been keeping a particularly close eye on Kenya for a while.
When the IOC announced that it would hold more than 2000 targeted doping checks in advance of the Rio games, it also announced, unusually, that athletes from Kenya and Russia would be examined particularly closely.
A musical has gripped Salzburg: Leornard Bernstein's masterpiece, "West Side Story".
Artistic Director Cecilia Bartoli wanted to bring the musical into the temple of classical music, and has made a childhood dream come true by taking on the role of Maria.
In the orchestra pit, the Simón Bolívar Orchestra will be conducted by Venezuelan director Gustavo Dudamel: "This music is full of rhythm," he enthuses.
She remembers her love affair with Tony with wistfulness, while the younger Maria plays and dances.
We both have a rather southern temperament, fire, passion, and we both approach life with joy, which is the most important of all!
For the American director Philip Wm. McKinley, "West Side Story" is bang up-to-date: "This work is all about prejudice and fanaticism."
London schoolgirl who joined ISIL killed in Syria
She was believed to have been killed by a Russian air strike in Raqqa, the group's stronghold in the country, ITV News reported on Thursday.
"One would hope that the only benefit out of this is - as a tombstone and testament to others, that these are the risks actually involved in going to a war zone - to dissuade people from ever making that choice really," Akunjee said.
Reid says Clinton will stick with Garland as Supreme Court nominee if elected
He praised Garland and said Clinton's team would not want to "rock the boat" with a new pick.
Garland is the chief judge for the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit.
Reid said Republicans who are blocking Garland's nomination are "minions" and "enablers" of Republican presidential candidate Donald Trump.
Treats says nude calendar for 'women, as well as men'
But instead of famous naked people, they're setting out to find the next generation of top models for their 2017 NU Muses calendar.
Treats president Steve Shaw told us earlier this year that his nude-heavy magazine differs from old-school Playboys because "Playboy is for men."
I do this for women.
Apparently he thinks the calendar is, too.
Turkey: Kurdish community faces mass exodus
"If you don't change your tune and praise Erdogan, your suitcase is basically packed," says the President of the Gülen-supporting Dialogue and World foundation, Ercan Karakoyun.
The Kurdish community in Germany is expecting tens of thousands of people to arrive at short notice in search of protection, fleeing from Turkey to Germany.
The crackdown instigated by Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan after the attempted coup has led the Germany Kurdish Association to expect a mass exodus to Germany.
"In the short term I'm expecting ten thousand, in the medium term a few hundred thousand people coming from Turkey looking for protection in Germany, if the Erdogan regime continues to antagonise minorities and democratic opposition," said the President of the Association, Ali Toprak, to "Die Welt" newspaper on Friday.
A few months ago the government initiated punitive action against Kurdish strongholds - and as a result, 500,000 Kurds are already on the run within Turkey.
Many will want to seek a new start in Europe if they continue to suffer oppression in Turkey.
"It is unacceptable that a country that takes in refugees is also producing them," said Toprak.
Over the past few months, I have no longer felt safe in Germany for the first time.
The German branch of the Gülen movement also fears that many Turks will flee abroad.
More Turks will seek asylum in Germany, especially Kurds and members of the opposition.
"If you don't change your tune and praise Erdogan, your suitcase is basically packed," said the President of the Gülen-supporting Dialogue and World Foundation, Ercan Karakoyun, to "Die Welt" newspaper.
As the newspaper reports, using figures from the Federal Ministry of the Interior, even before the coup Turks were the largest group granted asylum in Germany on the grounds of political persecution.
Strange Mecklenburg-Vorpommern: Locals hear nothing about the summer elections - and holidaymakers from North Rhine-Westphalia are not allowed to vote for the state parliament.
In Mecklenburg-Vorpommern, they understood this.
The way things had been going was simply ridiculous: summer holidays, heat and state parliament elections - they clash with one another.
The locals who need to be won over by the candidates are on holiday.
Most holidaymakers in the state, in Usedom, Rügen or Hiddensee, are not locals - and are not allowed to vote for the state parliament.
The heated phase, if that can be said at all, has already begun.
And there's something at stake: Prime Minister Erwin Sellering, leader of an SPD/CDU coalition, is fearing for his seat.
It will be exciting to see how Neuling AfD carves things up, and whether a coalition can be formed with what's left at the end.
Sellering, 66 years old and head of the parliament since 2008, pursued a rather inconspicuous election campaign, as can be seen from his posters.
Apart from that, Seelering has got cold feet, blaming Chancellor Merkel for the rise of the AfD.
Her refugee policies, her "we can manage it" have accelerated the rise of the far-right, he believes - which will probably cost him his job.
The CDU and its top-level candidate, Minister of the Interior Lorenz Caffier, has already experienced what happens when you fight an election in the right place at the wrong time.
The CDU have invited Chancellor Angela Merkel to two mass rallies; Merkel's parliamentary constituency is in the north-east.
But the target group wasn't right: there were more people from North Rhine-Westphalia, Berlin and Saxony there than people from Mecklenburg-Vorpommern.
But it won't do any harm to anyone from other parts of Germany to listen to Angela Merkal for once.
Apart from that, the north-east CDU is generally dispensing with the normal election events with parasols and balloons in market squares and outside shopping centres.
According to Kokert, that will only play a "minor role".
The Union also noticed that they are losing their footing in the region, and will have to work hard to connect with the people.
They are suffering like the Left, the SPD, the Greens: hardly present across large swathes of the region.
The advice that CDU candidate Kokert gave to his competitors is revealing: "You have got to go where it hurts, or where the people are: village fetes, Golden Wedding anniversaries, you have to make use of every birthday party."
The Greens, a small party with seven percent in the polls, should make the leap into the regional parliament.
They are making a modern virtue out of the holiday issue, and are waging their election war predominantly online.
"Online election campaign" is what the regional chairperson Claudia Müller has dubbed it.
Silke Gajek, their top candidate, is currently crossing Mecklenburg's lakes on a houseboat - and is having a nice time.
Her view? "Having an election holiday in Mecklenburg-Vorpommern isn't all that bad".
B27 redevelopment: restaurants are suffering from the closure
There are also no delays.
At the start of the week, the construction site could be moved southwards in line with plans, marking the half-way point, and everything is expected to be completed by October.
The obligingness of the people responsible for the construction works in terms of setting up substitute driveways.
Since the construction site was moved southwards on Monday, and the Aspegstraße in Ofterdingen was reopened, and the link to Rottenburg was re-established, the traffic situation within the town has improved.
There seem to be fewer drivers taking alternative routes through the town.
"There were some serious complaints made," said Florian King, deputy chief officer responsible for traffic management during the redevelopment.
Residents in Bachsatzstraße, Steinlachstraße, Hafnerstraße and Weiherrain had to put up with more traffic noise because people were looking for ways to cut through, trusting their satnav more than the signage.
This led to some lorries hurtling through residential areas.
The commune has increased calls for the measuring vehicle from Mössingen because speed limits were not always adhered to either.
"There were considerable infringements," said King, who had taken a look on-site to see what was going on.
Two to three vehicles were snapped by a speed camera every minute.
The fastest was travelling at 77 kilometres per hour in a 30 zone.
Since the construction site has moved on, things have quietened down.
This is only a small consolation for businesses located along the B 27 that the road has reopened for customers from Rottenburg.
Business people don't like to show their hand.
Even at the Maier car dealership, Thomas Sulz talked of "a slight loss, at the most", but also admitted that "there had been a lack of passing trade".
It's not just him: all restaurants have been "hit hard".
We have to be happy about every euro of profit we make.
He reckons that profits slumped by "far more than 50 percent".
The road redevelopment "set back" his businesses "by two years".
Göhner knows of other districts where people have acted more generously.
He can understand that his regular customers visit less as a result of the complicated traffic system.
If you can't drive past, other places are also nice.
Despite the crises with BSE and bird flu, Göhner believes that the effects of the B 27 works on his clientele mark the biggest crisis his restaurant has suffered in its long history.
After the most recent attacks, Minister of the Interior de Maizière is now putting forward a host of security measures.
Thomas de Maizière is playing the conciliator.
They are not asking too much of anyone.
I will also be involved in that.
As Minister of the Interior, however, he is responsible for results, and for reaching an "achievable agreement" within the coalition, he says.
After the most recent attacks in Würzburg and Ansbach, de Maizière let a little time pass before announcing his conclusions for security within Germany.
One thing was already known, announced, heralded: The fact that a new security agency is going to work on cracking encrypted communications is not new.
Neither is the fact that Germany will have to implement several EU directives on air passenger data and gun laws.
To some extent, de Maizière is launching a second attempt at proposals that the SPD long wanted nothing to do with: He wants to penalise advertising for terrorist groups, and remove German passports from jihadis with dual citizenship.
"They will be difficult issues for the SPD," admitted the CDU politician.
Some of them have a lot to offer: He is planning accelerated processes for deportation and more opportunities to arrest individuals prior to their deportation.
Refugees who are specifically brought to the country should allow their smartphones to be checked, and present their social media accounts for security checks.
Some of it also seems half-baked, and leaves questions to be answered.
And for some points - such as the unequal treatment of tolerated persons - the following question is raised: What does that actually have to do with security and terrorism?
Domestic security has come to the fore to a huge extent.
First a nasty argument about the Federal Police Force's equipment, then about an ideas-gathering event for security and politics-related discussions between some Ministers of the Interior in the Union, at which a burka ban and the renunciation of dual citizenship were demanded by department heads.
De Maizière is also trying to strike a conciliatory note here.
He does not think that dual citizenship will be removed.
However, it remains to be seen whether his own package is in line with the constitution throughout, and whether it really is "achievable" for his coalition partner.
There are few things inside it that could cause problems.
But the SPD is also currently attempting to use the issue of domestic security to shape itself.
SPD Head Sigmar Gabriel showed that the party was happy to discuss the issue, albeit sensitively at first, saying that "the SPD is prepared to discuss anything that will increase security further."
Volkswagen gets off lightly.
The recall has led to fuss about one term.
Thanks to its number of brands and some well-functioning markets, Europe's largest car manufacturer can boast another plus for the previous year, despite the diesel scandal.
However, in July, the VW core brand suffered, particularly in Western Europe, thereby affecting overall sales, as the Dax-listed company announced.
Globally, the VW brand sold 449,100 cars in July - 1.8 percent fewer vehicles than in the same month in the previous year.
Head of brand sales, Jürge Stackmann, blamed July's poor figures on the loss of two sales days in Europe.
In addition, some key markets saw "changed economic climates", which led to fewer purchases.
In addition to the situation regarding the attempted coup in Turkey, the British vote to leave the EU had also had an impact, a spokeswoman said.
In the USA, where the emissions scandal first began, the books are once again in the red.
In total, Lower Saxony's own brand, which was most affected, has got off lightly from the diesel scandal: After the first seven months, there is a minus in the books for deliveries amounting to 0.9 percent of 3.37 million vehicles.
Volkswagen delivered 1.3 percent more vehicles in this time period, coming to a global total of 5.904 million.
After the vehicles have been modified, fuel consumption, CO2 emissions or motor performance would not get worse.
After modification, the car manufacturer will provide its customers with a certificate that is "as good as a guarantee" but would not talk of an actual "guarantee", as was mentioned on Friday in corporate circles.
Legal intricacies are the reason for this.
The Ministry of Transport confirmed that this meeting had taken place.
"VW must fully meet the requirements of my investigative committee and the KBA."
Volkswagen itself does not use the term "guarantee", as has been mentioned in corporate circles.
Volkswagen believes that the broad term "guarantee" could see customers returning to the workshop with motor damage six months after the modification - and being able to blame this on the new software, even if the damage had nothing at all to do with it.
The Raffeisen Bank in Gmund am Tegernsee will demand penalty interest from wealthy savers in the future - and it will be the second bank in Germany to do so.
Managing Director of the bank, Josef Paul, said on Thursday that "this only applies to 139 customers with 40 million euros in their current accounts or day-to-day accounts".
The Federal Association of German Banks believes this is an isolated case, and does not see it as a sign: normal savers "need not worry about being hit with penalty interest on the pennies they've put aside".
If banks invest money overnight with the European Central Bank (ECB), they have to pay penalty interest of 0.4 percent.
From September, the Raffeisen Bank in Gmund will be asking private and business customers with more than 100,000 euros in their current account or day-to-day account to pay this fee.
"The first 100,000 euros are free."
"In the future, any subsequent 100,000 euros will cost 400 euros a year," Paul said.
For some time, he has been managing 40 million euros that could be withdrawn any day, and that he is unable to make use of.
"I cannot put 4000 euros aside for every million."
He is passing on the costs under the "polluter pays" principle.
It would be far too dangerous just to leave the cash in the Raffeisen Bank's safe: "I have already been through four raids, I don't want a fifth!" the bank's managing director said.
Only a small number moved to other banks.
The Federation of Cooperatives of Bavaria explained that "the extreme monetary policy pursued by the ECG leads to all banks incurring significant costs".
Thuringia's "Volks- und Raffeisen Bank" in Altenburger Land hit the headlines in 2014 when their Skatbank branch imposed penalty interest on investments of more than three million euros.
A banker said that, in Tegernsee, there was "clientele who were rather better off in terms of assets."
"That can be a problem for a small bank," if the bank is looking after their money for free.
Spokesperson Ernst said that the Cooperative Association of Bavaria "was not currently aware of any other banks that ask private customers to reimburse their expenses".
The President of the Bundesverband der deutschen Volksbanken und Raiffeisenbanken (BVR), Uwe Fröhlich, said at the end of June that "the threshold for tipping into the red in terms of private customers is very, very high".
Customers in Germany will not put up with that, broadly speaking.
Vinyl destination: who is actually buying records?
Before you rush to litter the comments section with gnarly insults under the pseudonym NotAllLonelyMiddleAgedMen, this statement derives from actual data.
According to YouGov, the much talked-about record resurgence is driven not by a boom in millennials who want to embrace the novelty of a physical item, but by midlife nostalgia.
In fact, those in the 18-24 age group are the least likely.
It is not just an act of hoarding by hobbyists, either - it has emotional significance: older vinyl buyers are slightly more likely to keep their feelings to themselves (56% versus 53%) and enjoy being alone (69% versus 66%).
If this blog was a televised news report, the camera would follow me as I walked down the middle of a busy Soho street, wearing a modest grey suit and gesturing wildly before stopping, cupping my hands and saying something authoritative like: "So, let's take a look."
While the heart of Soho is slowly being drained of its charm and grot - hotels, Eats, Prets and Paperchases now fill the buildings once occupied by independent sellers - a handful of fantastic specialist record shops still remain.
I'd probably ask the camera to stop rolling for the next bit, in which I stand very close to various men in some of these stores and attempt to gauge their age and emotional disposition via observation.
Glaswegian Stuart, 55, whom I follow from Sister Ray (data count: two young women, three middle-aged men) into Reckless Records (data count: eight middle-aged men, one woman, probably in her 20s) is in London for the afternoon for a meeting and is perusing the shops to fill a few hours.
"I suppose I am," he says.
These records, pictured above (he emailed me the snap, I didn't follow him home), line his living room walls.
"A lot of the stuff I get is late 60s, early 70s, things that came out when I was 11 or 12, things I was probably a bit too young to get," he says.
He has, however, noticed a new wave of people influenced by the media hype, people who heard about the comeback and felt compelled to buy back their old records.
From conversations I've had, people have got rid of their collection, normally around 1998 or 1999.
Customers who once sold their vinyl to buy CDs are now selling their CDs to buy their records back," he says.
That may explain a boom in vinyl revivalists of a certain age.
According to Wez, some older customers have taken umbrage with the contactless payment system in particular.
Some vinyl fans may feel overwhelmed by the digital world and choose to retreat to the stability of the familiar record sleeve, of items that recall halcyon teenage memories.
"I think sometimes it can be filling a void or having material possessions as some kind of comfort," Wez says.
As a collector myself, I have that, and I think a lot of people do.
It's an easy way to occupy your headspace.
"We're like their social workers!" pipes up a co-worker from a stack of records.
An ICM poll in April revealed that almost 50% of people who bought a vinyl album the previous month had yet to listen to it.
At this stage of the news report, I would probably be looking gravely concerned while flicking through a stack of bossa nova compilations.
The "trophy" aspect of the revival is something that Jonny, 42, who works in Sounds of the Universe (data count: three midde-aged men) has noticed.
That's not a large percentage, but it's definitely happening.
More of the product side, less of the music.
We have people saying: "I don't have a record player."
That's younger people, not older ones, late teens who are just getting into it.
Fopp, which now dedicates almost an entire floor to vinyl, has a far more varied audience when I arrive.
While the atmosphere is less at ease than the aforementioned stores - Wild Beast's latest synth- and sex-fuelled pop, rather than noodling jazz, is blasting from the speakers - it is good to see diversity in its customers.
None of them look particularly lonely, but nagging psychological trauma is hard to ascertain by standing next to someone for 30 seconds.
She is window-shopping, rather than on a spending spree.
She doesn't earn a lot, she says, so collecting records isn't really an option.
It's easy to listen to music by a computer or another way, but the beauty of vinyl is ..." she drifts off into a lovestruck sigh.
While giving the illusion of perusing the denim hot pants, I observe a group of teenage girls, who cluster around the Polaroid cameras momentarily, before a dad and his daughter deliberate purchasing a Crosley record player.
Nobody is looking - perhaps because they are merely decoration, some so high up the wall that it would be impossible to touch them.
But, given that any attraction to these items could mean more money for the industry and send a few customers into the depths of Soho for more, there is little to complain about.
It is no surprise that a demographic more likely than most to have more time and money than most is also the one that spends the most on luxury items such as vinyl.
But while my findings suggest YouGov's results are accurate, in Soho record stores at least, they do not discount the huge number of female collectors and vinyl lovers that exist in reality, in record shops and on online forums.
These people are probably working hard at school or in offices.
They are certainly not spending their Thursday mornings loitering around the record shops of Berwick Street, flicking through records and avoiding the gaze of a creepy, 30-year-old fake television presenter who is looming over the shoulders of unsuspecting middle-aged men.
Julius Nielsen, who has been studying the sharks, says record goes to a female thought to be between 272 and 512 years old and is five metres in length
French court rejects bid to demolish shops at Jungle refugee camp
A French court has rejected a bid by Calais authorities to demolish dozens of makeshift shops and restaurants in the Jungle camp where thousands of refugees are living.
At a court hearing this week, Calais authorities had argued the state should be able to knock down a total of 72 makeshift shops where people inside the camp sell goods, from cigarettes to energy drinks, offer haircuts, or sell tea for 50 cents (40p) or basic meals for a few euros in makeshift restaurants.
The Calais prefect's office argued the places should be demolished because they represented a parallel economy that did not pay tax, and because they carried fire and sanitation risks.
The judge, Jean-François Molla, said the groceries, cafes and restaurants played a much bigger role than simply feeding people that "live in extremely precarious conditions."
He said the spaces provided calm meeting points between refugees and volunteers.
Despite his disappointing performance in the Olympic time trial, cycling professional Tony Martin will keep his chin up.
"I'm going to keep the World Championship in my sights, stay optimistic, and keep fighting," wrote the 31-year-old on Facebook on Thursday ahead of his journey home from Rio.
He was unable to provide an explanation for his poor finish in 12th place on Sugar Loaf Mountain.
"It's honestly hard for me to comment on my time from yesterday," said Martin.
He said he needed to reflect and analyse the reasons behind the debacle.
Martin had wanted to compete for the title at the time trial World Championship in Qatar in October.
"This also includes my position," wrote the three-time time trial World Champion, who had lost to Olympic gold medallist Fabian Cancellara (Switzerland) by more than three minutes over the course of the 54.5km race on Wednesday.
Laura Siegemund's reign of success comes to an end in the Rio quarter-final: Ranked 32 in the world, the player from Metzingen will definitely miss out on the semi-final of the Olympic tennis tournament after losing 1:6, 1:6 against Monic Puig (Puerto Rico/WTA no.
Sigemund, who has been struggling with back problems, was only able to hold her serve once, and seemed powerless in comparison to earlier rounds.
On Thursday, potential medallist Angelique Kerber (Kiel/no. 2) had the chance of making the semi-final.
The last time there were two German tennis players in the quarter-finals of the summer games was in 1992.
There has never been a German-German Olympic semi-final.
Company gets involved in start-up for live video game streaming
The technology company has purchased start-up Beam, which has specialised in this hobby.
On Thursday Microsoft did not announce how much many had been spent on the takeover.
They can watch other people play, and also get involved themselves.
Facebook is to help on the path to making them global media events.
The advertising industry has already pricked up its ears.
The start-up's employees, who were previously based in Seattle in the US state of Washington, will now move to Microsoft's headquarters in California's Redmond, Beam's co-founder and CEO Matt Salsamendi reported.
Here comes the enforcement trailer
Germany's speeders will have to get used to the new generation of speedometers: In various federal states, including Hesse and Brandenburg, new speed cameras are being trialled, which are supposed to be particularly effective at catching those who drive too fast.
The futuristic-looking enforcement trailer made by Vitronic, a company form Wiesbaden, could be used at accident blackspots, for example, where it is too dangerous for the police to go.
For example, roadworks on a motorway, or a bridge that is due to be repaired, and therefore has a temporary speed limit often lack the infrastructure to support a fixed speed camera to ensure that speed limits are being adhered to.
It can also be too dangerous or expensive to keep assembling and unassembling the speed camera at these points.
When powered up, the manufacturer says that any car with a trailer coupling can move the trailer.
To prevent it from simply being stolen, it sinks down when measuring, making its wheels disappear into the armoured, bullet-proof exterior.
In addition, the speed camera's in-built alarm system is designed to protect it from vandalism.
Foreign authorities are also using the new technology for speed cameras: recently France ordered 100 of them, after ordering 150 the year before.
Britain settle for silver in rugby sevens after Fiji masterclass sees them take gold
Great Britain's impressive run in the Rugby 7s was brought to a crashing halt at the final hurdle by Fiji in the final on Thursday night when they were comprehensively beaten 43-7 at the Deodoro Stadium here in Rio.
Fiji gave a masterclass in handling, off-loading, side-stepping, support play, running lines and brute strength to win gold - their first Olympic medal of any colour.
Defeat came with the non-too shabby consolation of silver - Britain's third of the day - and they could be proud of their efforts in the inaugural Olympic 7s tournament in which they beat New Zealand, Argentina and South Africa along the way.
The bruising beating of the Boks, 7-5 in the semi-final earlier in the day, may have come back to bite them in the final.
But, regardless, Fiji on this form would have beaten a fit as a fiddle 15-man team.
It may be some consolation to GB - but probably not - that at least one Briton will have a gold medal around his neck tomorrow: Fiji's head coach is Ben Ryan, the former England boss from Wimbledon.
This hammering will hurt but the progress is startling.
Fiji started magnificently, bouncing off GB tackles for fun.
It was like running into a series of moving buses for captain Tom Mitchell and co and the World Series champions went 5-0 up when Osea Kolinisau dived over in the corner.
With four minutes on the clock Jerry Tuwai added another down the right wing, which was converted.
A superb Mitchell tackle stopped the man-mountain Leone Nakarawa from scoring a third but it was only delaying Fiji.
On seven minutes Jasa Veremalua touched down in the right corner and GB were 17-0 to the bad.
Nakarawa added another from the restart and there was still over a minute on the clock ... in the first half.
Vatemo Ravouvou then burst through some more limp GB tackling and stormed to the line to score.
The conversion made it 29-0 at the break.
It was as if Fiji had been born to play 7s, while GB are still learning the trade.
Which is pretty much how it is.
GB made wholesale changes at half-time and they plugged the Fijian dam...for all of four minutes, which by first-half standards was good, until Josua Tuisova went over after some brilliant Fijian interplay.
Dan Norton grabbed a try for GB, touching down in the left corner to make it 36-7 but the game was long gone the way of the South Sea Islanders whose fans sang, waved flags and danced in the stands.
It was hard not to admire Fiji's whole joyful approach.
Mata Viliame iced the Fijian cake that didn't need icing with another try in the dying moments.
The whistle went, the Fijians embraced and GB hit the turf, thoroughly beaten.
Earlier in the day, Fiji had beaten Japan 20-5 in their semi-final and GB edged South Africa in a tight semi-final of one try each - Britain's conversion the difference.
Kyle Brown put the Boks ahead in the first half but Dan Norton with some dazzling footwork broke the line and scored under the posts in the second half.
A brilliant late tackle from Marcus Watson, brother of England's 15-aside team, Anthony, secured the win - and ultimately the silver medal.
Helen Glover and Heather Stanning inspired to rowing victory by coach's cancer battle
There will not be a more emotive gold at these games, and that is saying something.
From the first stroke to the last, 220 punishing heaves into history, Helen Glover and Heather Stanning found added meaning in their golden moment at the Estacio da Lagoa.
Though they were the two pulling on the oars, there were three voices in that boat, the echo of coach Robin Williams ever present as they powered to a second successive Olympic gold in the women's pairs, the first females in the annals of British sport to scale such a height.
Their dominance was absolute, after all this was their 39th outing unbeaten, again unprecedented.
What we see, two brilliant athletes skating over the surface with the elegance of swans, does not wholly reflect the nature of the triumph.
Behind every rowing gold is a battalion of willing hands contributing the incremental gains that make the difference, and no hands were more instrumental than those of a coach who 30 months ago did not know whether he would live to see this day when diagnosed with cancer.
As he said, it was touch and go.
I had bladder cancer which is one of the things they can operate on and they did.
If they don't it goes everywhere.
The trio were fortunate that he was able to begin his treatment at the start of 2014 out of season, keeping the disruption to a minimum, if that is ever the right expression in circumstances such as these.
I was in hospital and I was walking around the ward - 20ft, 30ft 50ft at a time when they were saying a few steps is enough.
In the immediacy of victory their first thoughts were for Williams, who had spent a nervy morning talking a little more than usual in an attempt to process his own anxieties.
Stanning, a captain in the Royal Artillery regiment with a tour of Afghanistan behind her, said "I've been an emotional wreck this week, maybe that's a bit extreme, but it means such a lot."
It just reiterates how much this means to me, how much me and Helen have worked and Robin as well.
It's been a fantastic three years back with Helen and Robin.
I couldn't have asked for a better person to train with, or a better coach.
The pair set a punishing rhythm that their rivals could never match.
We were very much in the moment.
Helen was calling 'stay in the process, stay in the process'.
It's really important not to get carried away.
We weren't looking for fireworks today, we were just looking to do a good row and to go out and win that race, which we did.
The pair will take a year before deciding their futures.
Glover has a wedding to attend next month, her own to television adventurer Steve Backshall.
This feels so much better," she said.
The Managing Director of the "Veitensteingruppe" Water Supply Association, Rupert Göller, is retiring.
The Assocation "sets an example for the entirety of Bavaria".
That was how the association was described in a segment on Bavarian radio.
The Veitensteingruppe's work was described as "setting an example for the entirety of Bavaria".
The Veitensteingruppe Drinking Water Supply Association has its headquarters in Kottendorf in the commune of Breitbrunn, and provides 150,000 cubic metres of water annually, supplying 32 villages and hamlets with around 5,500 inhabitants.
Water supply contracts are in place for additional municipalities and communes.
Things never stopped, and renovations were always underway: water means life, and drinking water is the most important foodstuff of all.
He put his heart and soul into the Water Supply Association, and lived for it as if it were his own company.
A few weeks ago he gave a presentation at the Water Forum for the District of Lower Franconia as a true practitioner of the Veitensteingruppe's successful nitrate reduction concept.
From his perspective, the high point was the construction of the spring and the restructuring of the Association.
However, the largest challenge and most difficult shift was when the pipe broke on the Kirchlauter elevated tank on 3 January one year.
Even the supply from the new spring was sometimes only maintained because the elevated tank at Pettstadt was filled by hosepipe.
The management of the Drinking Water Supply Association was passed to Daniel Stürmer from Lauter, who will be Rupert Göller's successor.
"Medicine has come a long way," the 44-year-old said to Italian newspaper "Corriere della Sera".
Tiago is the offspring of Netrebko's liaison with bass-baritone Erwin Schrott.
Crime passionelle in Bargteheide - man shoots his partner
A 35-year-old man shot and fatally wounded his partner on Friday around 10.45 a.m. in an apartment building in Bargeteheide (in the district of Stormarn).
"The man himself called up and admitted to having shot his partner," a police spokeswoman said.
The perpetrator is on the run, she said, and he is officially being sought.
The man is around 1.8 m tall, muscular, sun-tanned, and has a bald patch.
The man now has a bald patch.
The police are talking of a "crime passionelle".
The police force in Lübeck dealing with the crime initially did not want to disclose any information on the crime or the relationship between the perpetrator and the victim, but it confirmed that a person had been killed.
The German steel industry has been riddled with crises and uses a lot of energy - but it has been spared additional costs that could have run into the millions.
Federal Minister of the Economy Sigmar Gabriel (SPD) told the "Westdeutsche Allgemeine Zeitung" (WAZ) newspaper on Friday that the exemption from the renewable energies levy would remain in place for electricity self-supply for pre-existing plants within the German steel industry.
Gabriel told WAZ that a basic agreement had now been reached with the EU Commission, following discussions with Margrethe Vestager, the Commissioner for Competition.
This too will not be levied against the steel industry.
The agreement sees the status quo of the previous ruling largely formalised.
Gabriel's positive efforts are particularly important for the steel industry.
The situation only worsened over the past year when the world' biggest producer, China, dumped steel into the global market en masse as a result of weakening domestic demand.
European manufacturers accuse Chinese steel firms of price dumping.
On the one hand, import taxes started to have an impact on imported steel, on the other, economic prospects in China brightened up.
It is not clear how long prices will remain perked up for.
The German sector leader, Thyssenkrupp, was cautious on Thursday.
Prices had plateaued recently, he said.
After a brief spike in May, the amounts produced shrunk for a second consecutive month.
The association is expecting output to increase over the next few months thanks to an improved situation in terms of orders.
Singing has been a constant throughout Ursel Kipp's entire life: as a young girl she sang in her school choir, when she was studying to be a teacher she took music classes, and today, the 78-year-old sings in a choir for the elderly.
After a rehearsal, she feels balanced, happy, and generally more alive, she says.
And additionally, she's doing something good for her health and her mind.
Singing is a great hobby for the elderly for a host of reasons, says Erhard Hackler from the German Association for the Elderly.
Most elderly people sing in a choir and share the enjoyment they get from music with like-minded people, says Hackler.
Social and familial structures often weaken as people grow older - so choir is a perfect way to spend time with other people.
Ursel Kipp has also experienced this in her choir: "Arranging and organising things with people, being able to rely on others and learn from them - a choir is a really unique way of being together with other people".
This is because it teaches the elderly to breathe deeply and in a controlled manner.
If you push your lungs to their limits regularly, you will not run out of breath as quickly in day-to-day life.
And if you are interested in keeping the sound of your voice as you age, too, singing is the perfect hobby.
Singing often has a really special effect on older people, says Ursula LEnz from the German Association of Senior Citizens' Associations.
For older generations, singing together is seen as more important, it was part of their daily life both at school and in their leisure time, she explains.
Lenz often sees that singing or listening to songs often triggers memories in older people that are often connected to positive emotions from their youth.
Song texts, and melodies in particular, can even be used to help patients with dementia to remember things from far back in their past.
Another positive aspect is the recognition gained by singing in a choir, Hackler thinks.
A happy audience is great praise.
You're not singing by yourself - and in a group of 50 people singing, who'll hear if a note's out here or there?
If someone you know already sings in a choir for the elderly, you can just go along with them.
If you're interested in singing, you should absolutely join a choir, Hackler thinks.
Singing is good for the soul and is a kind of release - no matter how old you are.
Female cats react more sensitively than male cats to the mewls of their kittens
Biologists in Hanover have researched the effect kittens' cries have on adult animals.
To their surprise, the miaowing didn't leave the male cats unaffected - but, compared to their female counterparts, they always acted the same way.
Female cats can tell how agitated kittens are by their miaowing.
They react ten percent quicker to kittens who sound to be in great distress, the scientists from the Veterinary University and Medical University of Hanover discovered.
"It is clear that the acoustic differences between the miaows of kittens that are more or less agitaged are either imperceptible or unimportant for male cats," the biologists Wiebke Konerding, from MHH, said.
In a previous experiment the research team had already discovered that the duration and pitch of a kitten's miaow changes depending on how urgently they need help.
Nine adult male cats and eight female cats from the MHH's animal husbandry programme were examined.
Firstly, they were played the sound of a kitten who had been taken from the birthing box and separated from its mother and siblings for three minutes.
Then they were played the sound of a more agitated cat, which had also been lifted up.
"All females, even those who did not have their offspring, were able to differentiate between miaows," said Konerding.
They turned towards the speaker quicker if it was playing the sound of a highly agitated kitten.
"One surprise was that the male cats reacted at all," the biologist said.
In the past, scientists have researched women's and men's reactions to babies' cries on multiple occasions.
Podolski and "Gala" are shooting for the Supercup
An important football match is taking place in Turkey for the first time following the attempted coup.
Ahead of the duel between arch-rivals Besiktas Istanbul and Lukas Podolski's Galatasaray Istanbul for the Supercup in Konya, the official line is clear: "business as usual".
Even when announcing the state of emergency after the attempted coup in July, the government emphasised that this would not affect citizens' daily life.
And this doesn't stop for football.
Sükür is accused of being a follower of the imam Fethullah Gülen, whom President Recep Tayyip Erdogan holds responsible for the attempted coup.
On Wednesday, Erdogan announced that the night-time "democracy vigils" in public places across the country have come to an end.
Fans of the workers' club Besiktas, in particular, are not traditionally counted among the President's friends.
However, the strict rejection of military coups is what brings most Turks together, in the light of dramatic historical events.
For cup winners Gala, it will once again depend on Lukas Podolski.
The Cologne native has proved his sporting value over the last season: with 17 goals and nine assists across all competitions, the 31-year-old closed his first season as his club's top scorer.
The cup was the only chance to win something.
This is mainly thanks to Mario Gomez, who laid the groundwork for their fourteenth title with 26 matches in the season as the Süper Lig's star goalkeeper.
"But if Mario wants to come here, all he has to do is say," "Kicker" specialist magazine quoted club chairman Fikret Orman as saying.
However, the star would have to be prepared to give up around a third of his annual salary, estimated at 7.5 million euros, as Orman made clear: "We cannot pay the salary that Florenz do".
Despite doping: These athletes are still in with a chance of winning medals in Rio
Justin Gatlin, aged 34, has already been banned twice for doping (in 2001 and 2006).
Rio de Janeiro - Whistleblower Julia Stepanowa is banned from taking her place on the start line.
Other track athletes who have been found guilty can only laugh - they are in Rio competing for medals.
The Russian swimmer Julija Jefimowa, who appealed against her doping conviction shortly before the games to enable herself to compete, was booed and shouted at as she started her 100-metre breaststroke race.
It was a bizarre scene: She waltzed into the pool with a smile plastered on her face, a deliberately provocative entrance.
As it became clear that she would not take the gold medal, the audience cheered enthusiastically.
But there are many other athletes preparing to line up on the start line at the Olympic Games in Rio despite having been involved in doping in the past.
This year's four longest throws were by the woman tipped for gold.
Merritt claimed that a penis enlargement drug was to blame.
This year, the 30-year-old is the fastest man in the world in the 200m and the 400m.
Ivan Tichon (hammer, Belarus): There is hardly another athlete who has been retrospectively stripped of so many medals.
His bronze medal from the 2008 Olympics was also taken away, but it was returned to him following a decision by the International Court of Arbitration for Sport, CAS.
Liu Hong (20km walking, China): The world record holder and favourite to win gold tested positive as far back as May, but will still be on the start line in Rio.
The 29-year-old world champion revealed traces of a banned dietary supplement, but the World Anti-Doping Agency (WADA)'s ban was lenient, and ended as early as July 13.
Bomb terror in Thailand - One Austrian woman injured - Several dead
She has some cuts, he says, and was treated in hospital, but has already been able to leave hospital.
According to Schnöll, the Foreign Ministry is in constant contact with local authorities as a result.
Another bomb exploded in Surat Thani on the country's south-east coast, which led to the death of a civil servant.
According to the authorities, the explosive device was launched from a flower bed on the edge of the coastal police's territory.
"The bomb attacks bear the same signature," said Army General Danai Kritmethavee to journalists early on Friday morning.
The Thai media also wanted to see a pattern in the attacks that was typical of Islamic separatists in the south of the country.
It is more reasonable to assume that the bombs were set off by opponents of the military junta currently ruling the country.
Over the past few days, the authorities have received notification from the security services about attacks planned in the south of the country - but they do not know when and where exactly the attacks are planned for.
The police told civil servants across the entire country to increase security around important governmental buildings, along with airports, railway stations, tourist attractions, restaurants and nightlife districts.
Small-scale bombings are a frequent occurrence in Thailand, but they are rarely directed at tourists.
After skirmishes between security forces and Muslim sectors of the population, people are advised against all but essential travel to these districts.
The rest of the country is on an increased security alert (security level 2).
The Head of the junta, and Prime Minister, Prayut Chan-o-cha said that the bombs were an attempt to create chaos when the country was heading towards stability, an improved economic climate and tourism.
However, the military has not managed to quell the latent resistance brewing with Muslim rebels in the southern edges of the country.
The Federal Office for the Protection of the Constitution has the right-wing "Identitäre Bewegung" movement in its sights.
After several regional authorities had done so, the body charged with protecting the constitution across Germany has also put the group on a watchlist.
Maaßen said that his authority had worked closely with regional authorities to come to its decision.
"Groups such as the "Identitäre Bewegung" are trying to approach their target group on their level," said the head of constitutional protection.
In general, extremists attempt to speak to them in young people's own language, often with pop music.
This propaganda is designed to provoke an emotional response in people.
In terms of constitutional protection, potential contact of this kind only becomes relevant from a certain point, he says.
It depends on whether the party in question - in this case, the AfD - changes its focus and becomes extremist as a result of particular people who are extremists.
With regard to the clear increase in right-wing crimes and attacks on asylum seekers and refugee shelters, Maaßen said that he would not yet speak of a new right-wing terrorism.
There was the "Old School Society" group or the "Freitaler Group".
It can absolutely be the case that additional right-wing terrorist groups or small gatherings come to exist, and plan attacks on asylum seekers, refugee shelters, or for other far-right motives.
However, there is no Germany-wide or Europe-wide control of far-right terrorism that we can discern.
Many of those suspected of carrying out the attacks on asylum centers were not viewed as criminals, politically motivated perpetrators or members of the far-right scene.
"This means that many people have committed crimes who previously paid the far-right no heed, who might have been politically indifferent or voted for the CDU, SPD or the Left, who were then radicalised by far-right sensationalism".
Olympic athletes or world records aren't always the only things to hit the headlines at the Olympic Games.
This is shown by Robel Kiros Habte's brave performance at the summer games in Rio de Janeiro.
He just disappeared - no matter how wide a perspective was used.
The 24-year-old completed his heat 48 seconds slower than the next-fastest competitor, taking place 59 out of 59.
This is given out to popularise swimming in underrepresented countries.
Because most athletes from Ethiopia run, Habte wanted to do something different.
With reference to his "flabby stomach", the British tabloid "The Sun" mocked his "Dad Bod".
His time, almost one minute and five seconds for the 100 metre freestyle, played no part in this.
At the 2000 Olympic Games in Sydney, Eric Moussambani's race also drew media attention.
The performance of the swimmer from Equatorial Guinea was unforgettable: he had to swim his 100 metre freestyle heat all on his own.
Moussambani was then greeted by wild cheering.
A front-row seat to the stunning architecture of the Los Angeles Central Library
Attendees can tour the Central Hall, Period Rooms, Cactus Lounge and Tea Room.
Geretsried - Theft from the owner of a shop on the Neuen Platz.
When she returned the next morning at around 8.15 a.m. around 250 euros was missing from the till.
Donald Trump wouldn't really mind if he lost the US presidential election in November: "Either it'll work out, or I'll go on a long, long holiday," the Republican candidate said in an telephone interview with US television channel CNBC.
If he doesn't make it because of political correctness, that's ok, Trump said.
The postal service gets on board with electric vehicles
Soon the company will start retailing the vehicle.
"We want to start selling it to third parties," a postal service spokesman said on Friday.
For months the company has been examining whether the StreetScooter it developed, which is used to deliver letters and parcels, could be sold to other sectors as well.
The company is planning to use its own factories to build up to 10,000 vehicles per year, per level.
"We will take a very, very strong step towards 2020," he said at the end of July.
I can imagine that we will switch over the entire fleet.
Consumer research firm GfK is replacing its managing director Matthias Hartmann.
The tricky situation in which market research firm GfK finds itself made it self-evident that Managing Director Matthias Harmann's seat became more and more unstable the longer the success he promised failed to materialise.
Turbulence at the top of Nuremberg's market research firm GfK: After another round of disappointing figures and the resignation of the managing director, the firm, fifth in its sector globally, is on the brink of a personal new start.
The company announced that Gerhard Hausruckinger, who is currently a member of the board of directors, will take over the management of the board on 1 September.
Officially, he will take on the role of "board spokesman" until Hartmann's successor has been found.
In investment circles, on Friday it was said that shareholders were greatly disappointed by the lack of success following the restructuring programme implemented years ago.
"If that were the case at BMW, the quants would be too," he said.
After suffering losses in the previous quarters, the company was unable to stop losing money in the second quarter of 2016.
The goodwill amortisation of 139 million euros required for the consumer experience sector was provided by the company, leading to a final loss of 148.2 million euros.
The bus came off the right-hand side of the road, and skidded into a ditch, a spokeswoman for the police force of Aurich/Wittmund reported.
Uninjured passengers were transported back to Krummhörn's Pewsum district by regular bus.
The sewage fee for the sewage works in Azendorf will be raised again if it is necessary to carry out improvement works.
As mayor Bernd Steinhäuser (CSU) reported, when the district administration of Kulmbach approved the budget, it was determined that these sewage plants were underfunded.
The market town of Kasendorf is legally obliged to run the sewage works so that they break even.
As administrative director Herbert Schmidt showed the committee, it was necessary to recalculate the fees for the sewage plants serving the market town.
Between October 2016 and September 2020, overfunding and underfunding from the previous calculation period will be balanced out.
Schmidt justifies the major fee increases by saying that all three sewage plants are relatively small and deal with a very small amount of waste, namely between 6800 and 12000 cubic metres a pear.
As a result of the low distribution, expenses for critical repairs amounting to several thousand euros, for example, seem major.
In addition, the amount of sewage arriving at all three plants is gradually decreasing.
Furthermore, the previous calculation period did not include renovation and repair works to a great extent for all three treatment plants, not least because of their age.
Schmidt pointed out that the waste treatment plant at Azendorf needed to have its mechanical ventilation system replaced because of damage.
The conveyor system in the pumping station at Welschenkahl is almost 20 years old, and needs to be completely overhauled; the first clarification pond in the pond treatment plant at Lopp has been operational for almost 20 years and now needs to be dredged, its sewage sludge removed, and an additional ventilation system incorporated to ensure that it will be in line with water law regulations in the future.
Schmidt: "These extraordinary expenses were also coupled with perpetual support and maintenance costs that are to be taken into account in the new calculation period."
Steinhäuser pointed out that, even with a low amount of sewage coming to the three plants, the expenses for running and maintaining them "were significantly impacted".
As a result, Schmidt expanded, the market town had been saved from large maintenance costs for the sewage treatment plants over the past 20 years.
From Steinhäuser's perspective, the plants mentioned will remain in a precarious situation in the long run, especially as the area covered by Friesenbachtal wastewater association cannot be expanded to include these plants because they are running at a deficit.
Snapchat "Anime" Effect Is Criticized as Asian Caricature
Snapchat says this filter is inspired by anime, but some observers say it's racially insensitive.
With its lens tool, Snapchat allows some 150 million daily users to alter reality and play with identity in ways that border on the absurd.
The lenses are blunt, feature-warping tools that generate more than 30 million enhanced selfies a day.
Any missteps quickly enter the public record.
Snapchat lenses have drawn criticism in the past with accusations that the app was promoting blackface or encouraging whitened skin tones as an ideal of beauty.
So when it pushed a lens to some users this week that gave them slanted eyes, distorted teeth and puffy cheeks, some critics called it a racist caricature of Asian people - "yellowface."
The news and the outrage went wide on Wednesday, with reports by The Verge and Motherboard, a day after Snapchat said it had dismantled the feature.
The company offered an explanation: The lens was meant as homage to anime characters, not as a caricature of Asian people.
But for observers who have experienced racism, the lens reminded them of hurtful stereotypes in action.
In an email, Grace Sparapani, a Korean American art student whose tweet about the photos was widely shared, said that the lens was "hurtful and uncomfortable to say the least."
She added that "it's hard to argue with the side by side comparison of the very gross Asian caricature and the filter's effects.
It shows that the filter isn't just yellowface, but yellowface taken to its derogatory extreme.
Snapchat is not the only company to cross these cultural tripwires.
And Snapchat's huge audience of younger people - who are more racially diverse than their older counterparts - might mean that they are even more likely to expect sensitivity.
When one of Snapchat's lenses creates an image that is insulting to a user, 25-year-old Katie Zhu said in an interview on Thursday, "it's much harder for these types of things to go unnoticed like they did before."
"It's either that they had no diverse representation of people of color on their staff to the point where they're able to make decisions like this," Ms. Zhu, who is Chinese-American, said, "or they do have some people of color who are working there, but they're not on positions where they feel safe or comfortable to speak up."
Other observers share her view, a complaint that Snapchat has left largely unanswered.
For her part, Ms. Zhu said she would keep her Snapchat account closed, adding, "I wonder if they actually need more users like us to be able to say that this is not O.K."
"Intelligence products approved by senior Centcom leaders typically provided a more positive depiction of U.S. antiterrorism efforts than was warranted by facts on the ground and were consistently more positive than analysis produced by other elements of the intelligence community," a news release about the report said.
"What happened at Centcom is unacceptable - our war fighters suffer when bad analysis is presented to senior policy makers," said Representative Ken Calvert, Republican of California.
The leadership failures at Centcom reach to the very top of the organization.
The 10-page report detailed persistent problems in 2014 and 2015 in Central Command's description and analysis of American efforts to train Iraqi forces.
Although it offers no definitive evidence that senior Obama administration officials ordered the reports to be doctored, it describes analysts as feeling as though they were under pressure from Centcom leaders to present a more optimistic view of the threat posed by the Islamic State, also known as ISIS or ISIL.
"Throughout the first half of 2015, many Central Command press releases, statements and congressional testimonies were significantly more positive than actual events," the report said.
For example, a Centcom official stated publicly that a major military assault to take back Mosul could begin as early as April or May 2015.
From the middle of 2014 to the middle of 2015, the United States Central Command's most senior intelligence leaders manipulated the command's intelligence products to downplay the threat from ISIS in Iraq.
Republicans created the task force after learning that analysts had raised concerns that intelligence about the Islamic State was being manipulated.
There is an additional, ongoing investigation of Centcom intelligence by the Department of Defense inspector general.
This process, Mr. Schiff said, "stalled the release of intelligence products," hurt morale among analysts and "insufficiently accommodated dissenting views."
Last August, The New York Times reported the existence of the Pentagon inspector general investigation, opened after complaints by Centcom analysts.
The investigation has repercussions beyond the question of whether the American-led bombing campaign in Iraq and Syria is succeeding (an assertion now made by a growing number of Defense officials).
But last year's allegations called into question how much President Obama could rely on Central Command for honest assessments of military operations in Iraq, Afghanistan, Libya and other crisis spots.
The critiques on the Islamic State intelligence mirror disputes of more than a decade ago, when a Centcom intelligence analyst, Gregory Hooker, wrote a research paper saying that the administration of President George W. Bush, over many analysts" objections, advocated a small force in Iraq and spent little time thinking about what would follow the 2003 invasion.
Mr. Hooker also played a key part in the insurrection over the Islamic State intelligence.
Last year, officials said, Mr. Hooker's team concluded that despite public statements to the contrary, airstrikes against Islamic State-held refineries had not significantly weakened the terrorist group's finances because it had built makeshift refineries to sell oil on the black market.
Centcom's commander then, Gen. Lloyd J. Austin III, came under criticism last year after Senate testimony viewed by many lawmakers as being an overly positive assessment of the war.
General Austin retired in April and was replaced at Central Command by Gen. Joseph L. Votel.
U.S. Wins 4th Straight in Women's Field Hockey, Setting Up Showdown With Britain
I'm not really one of those people who keeps track of their goals.
Both teams have qualified for the quarter finals, and the game will decide who finishes first in their six-team bracket and who finishes second.
The first-place finisher will avoid the powerful Dutch, the leaders of the other bracket, for a bit longer when the quarter finals begin.
However Saturday's game turns out, the Americans have created a stir with their surprising run here, four years after finishing last among 12 teams at the London Games.
She grew up in Blue Bell, Pa., first picked up a field hockey stick when she was 3 (her twin older sisters played the sport at Drexel) and joined the national team when she was 16, becoming its youngest player ever.
She missed out on the 2008 Olympics when she did not make the cut for the final roster.
We didn't have the work rate in London that we have now.
On Thursday night, Bam opened the scoring in the first half with a backhand shot from close in.
India had come into the game without a victory in the tournament, but the team proved surprisingly tough and kept the score 1-0 until late in the third period, when Bam took charge.
She made a long run with the ball down the left side of the field, then curled into the middle and whipped the ball into the goal to give the Americans a 2-0 lead.
Melissa Gonzalez added the final goal midway through the fourth period.
The shutout was the first of the tournament for the United States goalie, Jackie Briggs, who had allowed one goal in each of the first three victories.
She is on a roll.
So is Bam.
"We're in a good place right now," Parnham said, but just how good it is will depend on the result of Saturday's game.
Amid the Fury of the Olympics, the Zen of the Trampoline
The events in Rio de Janeiro feel constant and inescapable, a furious relay of competition and striving.
It is as if the Olympic torch itself were a flaming baton, passed from archer to swimmer to gymnast to triathlete.
You can't turn on a television, read a newspaper or listen in on your neighbor's conversation in a coffee-shop line without hearing about Simone Biles, Katie Ledecky or the feud between Michael Phelps and Chad le Clos.
Mr. Dooley, a first-time Olympian and a dimpled heartthrob in the making, may well be among those household names being showcased in prime time, buoyed by sponsorships and feel-good TV commercials, if he were a swimmer, a gymnast or even a fencer.
The Olympic flame does not illuminate each event equally.
We will always have the breaststroke, and long may it reign.
But if I may make a modest case for my particular favorite, let me call attention to the discreet charm of the trampoline.
Though trampoline has been an Olympic event since 2000, when it debuted at the Sydney Games, it has spent the intervening 16 years so barely acknowledged that many I surveyed did not realize it was an Olympic sport at all.
This may be a regional ignorance.
Despite sending athletes to compete, the United States has never won a medal in trampoline and did not have an athlete advance to the finals until 2012.
The Chinese and the Russians tend to split the prizes for the men, and the Chinese and the Canadians for the women.
But there is an underdog charm to trampoline, in part because it sounds, to the unenlightened ear, fitter for clown college than the Olympics.
Here I should confess that I am no expert, just an earthbound enthusiast.
It does have comic potential - the cartoon quaver of its never-ending bounce - but also the grace of gymnastics and diving, the two sports it essentially combines.
Aspiring champions jump on a giant trampoline, shooting up to nearly 30 feet in the air, and are called upon to perform a series of tumbling moves (twists, pikes and somersaults) before eventually landing on their feet.
They are judged on execution, difficulty and "flight time," according to the official Olympic program.
The most common Olympic vector is straight ahead.
Medal hopefuls must go farther, faster, up and over, in their quest for gold, sometimes to the finish, other times back and forth up and down the court.
They are chasing not only the finish line or the starting wall but also, in the televised coverage, another taunting line: that of the world, or Olympic, record.
This single-minded pursuit is noble, admirable, even fanatic - and it is enough to bring even a spectator to tears.
But it is also what I find slightly exhausting about even watching the Games.
From this, trampoline offers a respite.
The trampoliner's vector is up.
Forward motion is not the goal.
He or she rebounds, seeming weightless as an astronaut, going up, then down, then effortlessly up again.
It is not without competition, of course, nor without difficulty, but for the duration of a routine, there is no frantic charge toward the end, no vaulting into the distance, just the dreamy, graceful suspension of time and gravity.
It is as close to Zen as Olympic competition gets.
NBC will air the finals as part of an afternoon block beginning at 2 p.m. on both days.
In the midst of Olympic mania, they promise a quiet, lovely moment, one likely to be overlooked in the general melee.
And if consciousness raising is to be achieved only by offering up male athletes for ogling and objectification - as the United States men's gymnasts recently proposed, according to The Wall Street Journal - Mr. Dooley only awaits his gasping new fan base.
Is Ethiopia about to crack?
Videos circulating from protests thought to be from late last year or earlier this year show security officers whipping young people with sticks as they were forced to perform handstands against a wall.
"It was always difficult holding this country together, and moving forward, it will be even harder," said Rashid Abdi, the Horn of Africa project director for the International Crisis Group, a research group.
Ethiopia is the second most populous nation in Africa, after Nigeria, and its stability is cherished by the West.
American military and intelligence services work closely with the Ethiopians to combat terrorist threats across the region, especially in Somalia, and few if any countries in Africa receive as much Western aid.
Its infrastructure has improved drastically - there is even a new commuter train in the capital, Addis Ababa.
Though Ethiopia has hardly been a paragon of democracy - human rights groups have constantly cited the government's repressiveness - opposition within the country had been limited, with dissidents effectively silenced.
"If you suffocate people and they don't have any other options but to protest, it breaks out," said Seyoum Teshome, a university lecturer in central Ethiopia.
A generation is protesting.
The complaints are many, covering everything from land use to the governing coalition's stranglehold on power.
After a widely criticized election last year, the governing party and its allies got the last seat the opposition had held and now control 100 percent of the Parliament.
Several factors explain why bitter feelings, after years of simmering beneath the surface, are exploding now.
Several young Ethiopians said this was how they gathered for protests.
"We are on the way to coordinate under one umbrella," said Mulatu Gemechu, an Oromo leader.
He was considered a tactical genius, a man who could see around corners.
Analysts say he was especially adept at detecting early signals of discontent and using emissaries to massage and defang opponents.
Ethiopia's new prime minister, Hailemariam Desalegn, was plucked from relative obscurity to fill Mr. Meles's shoes.
The last time Ethiopia experienced such turmoil was in 2005, after thousands protested over what analysts have said appeared to be an election the government bungled and then stole.
In the ensuing crackdown, many protesters were killed, though fewer than in recent months, and that period of unrest passed relatively quickly.
Development experts have praised Ethiopia's leaders for visionary infrastructure planning, such as the new commuter train, and measurable strides in fighting poverty.
Last month, protesters in Gondar, an Amhara town, attacked businesses owned by Tigrayans, and anti-Tigrayan hatred is becoming more common in social media.
"That," Mr. Abdi said, "is a very tight rope to walk."
The clarification raised new questions about the Republican presidential nominee's ability to communicate clearly to the American public.
It also put his surrogates, who have strained to defend him during a tumultuous stretch, in the awkward position of having to explain remarks that he might not mean.
After making the suggestion at a rally on Wednesday night, Mr. Trump doubled down on the assertion on Thursday, insisting in interviews that he really did intend to say that the president and Mrs. Clinton had created ISIS.
The post was a reversal from just a day ago, when Mr. Trump said in a number of interviews that he was indeed serious about the charge.
When the conservative radio host Hugh Hewitt tried to help Mr. Trump soften the remark by reminding him that Mr. Obama wants to destroy ISIS, the Republican presidential nominee would not have it.
The latest firestorm comes as Mr. Trump has been trying to refocus his campaign on the economy amid declining poll numbers.
In late July, after he drew widespread criticism by appearing to suggest that the Russians should hack Mrs. Clinton's emails, he later explained his remarks by saying, "Of course I'm being sarcastic."
The approach allows Mr. Trump to push the limits of political speech and dial it back as needed.
"I think it's a pattern of him testing certain messages that resonate with his fans, seeing how they play, and then "clarifying" one way or another depending on the reaction," said Ruth Sherman, a communications expert who has been monitoring the language used by both candidates.
But I also think he's clever about his statements and knows they are vague enough to be filtered through various lenses.
Instead of toning things down for a general election audience, Mr. Trump has taken an even more caustic tone in recent days as his poll numbers have continued to tumble.
A new NBC/Wall Street Journal/Marist poll released on Friday showed Mr. Trump trailing Mrs. Clinton by large margins in North Carolina, Virginia and Colorado and locked in a tight race in Florida.
While Mr. Trump generally tries to avoid apologizing for provocative things that he says, he often accuses his critics of misconstruing his words or misunderstanding his sense of humor.
But as he faces heightened scrutiny during the final months of the presidential campaign, Mr. Trump's jokes have put his loyal allies in the uncomfortable position of having to publicly stand up for him no matter how provocative his remarks.
Rudolph W. Giuliani, the former New York City mayor who is one of Mr. Trump's most prominent surrogates, went to great lengths to defend the candidate in an interview with CNN on Thursday.
It is true in a sense that before Obama, ISIS was an almost unknown, small little organization, he who called it the jayvee, totally wrong, and here's why it happened, because he withdrew the troops from Iraq.
Most mainstream Republicans try to argue that the Obama administration, in which Mrs. Clinton served as secretary of state, allowed ISIS to fester by failing to aggressively manage the situation in the Middle East.
Ahead of rallies in Pennsylvania on Friday, Mr. Trump continued to lash out on Twitter at the news media for harping on his every word and for being biased against him.
Some Democrats scoffed at Mr. Trump's excuse as more evidence that he is unfit to be president.
Once Priced Out, a Cafe Returns in Greenpoint
Verb Cafe was a shabby, cash-only space in Williamsburg that had no Wi-Fi but served good coffee for 15 years.
Naturally, it got priced out of its Bedford Avenue storefront.
Locals bemoaned it as the latest loss in a gentrifying city.
The artist Molly Crabapple wrote on Twitter, "New York is change, I know, but still, can't believe CBGB's is dead and the Chelsea Hotel is gutted and Verb is now a soap shop."
But if New York is change, it is also reinvention.
The new Verb has Wi-Fi and accepts credit cards but has some of the same employees and a similar unpretentious vibe.
The coffee is still good, too.
Leading the new Verb is Cisco Rodriguez, a longtime employee at the old cafe who is an owner and the general manager at the new place.
It even reused the lights from the old Verb.
There are brown-rice bowls.
"A lot of former customers got priced out of Williamsburg too," he said.
Even after she moved to Greenpoint, she would still make the trek.
After Verb closed, she said, she gave up drinking coffee for a while.
"I realized it was the coffee and the culture at Verb that I liked," she said.
Now she's back on coffee, although that day, instead of her usual iced coffee, she went with a blended chai drink, another new addition.
Tom Rosenthal, another longtime customer, went faithfully to Verb starting in 2003.
"Quarter past seven, every day, like clockwork, I'd come in and they were making my everything bagel with butter," he said.
These days, Mr. Rosenthal still gets his regular order, but sometimes he'll switch things up with the bacon, egg and cheese on an everything bagel.
Mr. Rodriguez said he had no hard feelings about the soap shop taking over the old space.
In fact, the Soap Cherie owners offered to make special soap for Verb, using the cafe's cold-brewed coffee as an ingredient.
"I think we still might take them up on it," Mr. Rodriguez said.
And Greenpoint's traditional Polish residents have embraced the cafe as well.
One of these new customers translated the menu into Polish, and Mr. Rodriguez said he planned to find a spot to display it soon to make his new neighbors feel welcome.
A local juice spot wants to bottle and sell the cold-brewed coffee.
There is a chance the cafe will expand into an adjacent building.
For many customers, a new Verb to get their old favorites is enough.
"I've needed to smell that," he said.
The Depressing Food of the Depression, in "A Square Meal"
In March 1933, shortly after ascending to the presidency, Franklin Delano Roosevelt sat down to lunch in the Oval Office.
A gourmand, President Roosevelt had a taste for fancy Fifth Avenue foods like pâté de foie gras and Maryland terrapin soup.
His menu that day was more humble: deviled eggs in tomato sauce, mashed potatoes and, for dessert, prune pudding.
Showing some culinary solidarity of their own, they met a reporter for dinner at Eisenberg's Sandwich Shop, a tiny no-frills lunch counter in the Flatiron district that has been in business since the year of the crash, 1929.
Ms. Ziegelman, 54, ordered a cream cheese and chopped olive sandwich, while Mr. Coe, 57, had the turkey, mashed potatoes and vegetable medley.
When a reporter ordered meatloaf, the couple deemed it fitting for a discussion of Depression-era eating.
"Loaves were very popular," Ms. Ziegelman said.
There was peanut loaf, liver loaf, bean loaf.
They were made from an ingredient and a cheap thing that stretches the ingredient out.
Imagine eating enough peanuts to serve as your dinner.
Mr. Coe grimaced.
"It must have sat in your stomach like lead," he said.
In the years before the Depression, the American table, especially in rural areas, was an all-you-can-eat buffet.
It was Americans who had sent food to starving Europeans during World War I. "A Square Meal" chronicles the ways the nation coped with suddenly not being the land of plenty.
Equally fraught was the new budget diet: Mystery dishes like loaves and casseroles became staples, the casserole a "wonderful way to repurpose leftovers," Ms. Ziegelman noted, because cooks could hide unappetizing ingredients under a creamy coating of sauce.
Strange mashups were tried as caloric and nutritional fulfillment took precedent over taste or even common kitchen sense.
In researching the book, which includes recipes, Ms. Ziegelman prepared a period dish of baked onion stuffed with peanut butter.
"It was not a popular addition to the dinner table," Mr. Coe said.
Peanut butter has nothing to say to a baked onion.
It was characteristic of a lot of the home-ec recipes.
As never before or since, home economists - among them Louise Stanley, chief of the federal Bureau of Home Economics from 1923 to 1943 - drove the country's eating habits.
Publishing recipes and articles in newspapers and magazines, they encouraged women to become "budgeteers" and rise to the challenge of transforming glop like creamed spaghetti with carrots into tasty dishes.
"A Square Meal" is a feast of historical tidbits.
Especially savory are the accounts of the government's response to its hungry citizenry, like President Herbert Hoover's let-me-eat-cake attitude.
While he publicly praised the simple Iowa farmhouse cooking of his childhood, he dined like the millionaire sophisticate he had become.
He ate in almost a gold-plated dining room, wearing a dinner jacket.
He was fabulously out of touch.
President Roosevelt may have committed the same error if his wife, Eleanor, had not encouraged him to set an example with his stomach.
As the book tells it, Mrs. Roosevelt's hiring of a housekeeper with no interest in flavor resulted in a White House that "put out not only some of the dreariest food in Washington but also some of the most dismally prepared."
Many of the Depression-era food ways were abandoned as soon as the country got back on its feet.
The legacy is in our continued focus on calories and nutrition, Ms. Ziegelman said, and on the way science has been applied to cooking.
The couple said that in writing the book, they gained greater understanding of the eating habits of Ms. Ziegelman's mother - how she couldn't throw food away, for instance.
"She had a real fear of food waste," Mr. Coe said.
There was the cream-puff incident.
After the plates were cleared at Eisenberg's, she and Mr. Coe pulled out a dessert they had prepared at home: the prune dessert that President Roosevelt ate for lunch.
"It's called prune whip," Ms. Ziegelman said, adding that a common trick was to give modest recipes a snazzy name.
There was no whipped cream, just prunes, a little bit of flour, sugar, water and cinnamon.
Everyone reluctantly dipped a spoon into the viscous brown goo.
Mr. Coe went back for seconds, and thirds.
It made the Syrian a glowing figurehead amidst the horror of the war.
However, he never saw himself as a hero, saying, according to Bild: "For me, this is the real jihad."
"If I were to die saving lives, I would think that God saw me as a martyr."
One woman and two children were killed, and seven people have been left with breathing difficulties.
The fatal bomb dropped by the Assad regime was supposed to have been aimed at terrorists.
Greenland sharks generally only come to the surface in winter.
Greenland sharks only give birth to young at the age of 150.
The five-metre-long animal can ramp this up to 2.6 km/h if necessary - but this maximum speed is half as fast as a seal.
"It's crazy," says Alexander Scheuerlein from the Max Planck Institute for Demographic Research in Rostock about this lifespan - which is a world record for a vertebrate.
It is true that evolutionary biologists had long thought that Greenland sharks had been around for a very long time.
They were simply lacking the proof.
They generally only come to the surface in winter because they prefer water temperatures of around six degrees Celsius.
However, these sharks still manage to catch prey: In one animal's stomach, researchers found the remains of a seal; another shark had gobbled down the jawbone of a young polar bear.
It may be the case that they hunt down sleeping animals, or patrol on the ocean floor and look out for corpses that have sunk downwards from higher levels of water.
The smallest shark was just 81 centimetres long, while the largest measured 502 centimetres.
This core of the eye's lens comes into being even before the shark is born, and the proteins in it are not renewed subsequently.
By contrast, the lens cores of third-smallest animal, at 220 centimetres long, contained less of a surplus of carbon-14 from nuclear weapons experiments - so when it was examined in 2012, it must have already had its 50th birthday.
In fact, the carbon-14 monitor gave a 493-centimetre-long Greenland shark an age of 335, while the record-holding shark, at 502 centimetres, was apparently 392 years old.
Now researchers have been able to map this length onto an age.
As one of the animals, 392 centimetres long, was likely on the threshold of sexual maturity, and had an age of 156, it seems that Greenland sharks take at least 150 years to be able to reproduce.
The previous record holder, a 211-year-old Greenland whale, in whose neck a 120-year-old harpoon tip was lodged, was caught off Alaska.
As a result of low temperatures, the systems of the animals living there often run on as little energy as possible.
The animals often become particularly large so they stay warm in cold waters.
"This means that a smaller animal has a more dangerous life, and has to focus on having as many offspring as quickly as possible," explains Scheuerlein, an evolutionary biologist.
Construction sites coming as a twinpack
The commune's council focused on construction-related topics in its most recent session.
The communal council is convinced that the construction sites in the rural, peaceful residential commune of Schönau will attract young families and older people alike.
As said, people prepared to build on these sites should apply in the town hall from now, and the communal council will probably discuss giving out the plots in its September meeting.
So that it would be able to answer questions on the movement of additional businesses, in connection with the creation of jobs, the communal council decided to amend the space usage plan first re-drawn in spring of this year.
The city on the river Main will soon have the best chance against the competition of Paris, Dublin and Luxembourg to draw jobs and companies away from London.
"It is highly likely that Frankfurt will benefit the most from the Brexit vote," said Michael Voigtländer, Head of IW's Financial Markets and Real Estate specialist area.
After the Brexit referendum it is unclear whether financial institutions will still be allowed to run European financial business from London.
Registration in the UK is all that has been required to date for the "EU passport".
Several banks have already announced that they will relocate jobs.
The "Frankfurt Main Finance" lobbying group expects to see 10,000 new jobs on the river Main within five years.
According to the IW, the European Central Bank (ECB)'s headquarters, responsibility for monetary policy and supervision over the largest banks in the eurozone, all come together to represent a real plus for Frankfurt, along with further important authorities, such as EIOPA, Europe's insurance regulator, and ESRB, the risk board.
While Luxembourg is home to a large funds industry, like Dublin, its infrastructure lets it down.
In addition, the city's easily available business properties are a win.
Rents for top-class business properties are 50% higher on the banks of the Seine than on the banks of the Main.
And even if quality of life is a matter of preference: "Thanks to its already strong position as a financial hub for the European domestic market, Frankfurt could be able to attract additional banks and investors," IW concluded.
This is also to do with strength ratios: According to figures from regional bank Helaba, around 144,000 people worked in banking in London in 2015 - compared to 62,500 in Frankfurt.
Gilead Sciences Inc is entitled to receive the attorney fees it incurred related to hepatitis C patent litigation with drugmaker Merck & Co Inc, a U.S. district judge has ruled.
In a filing on Thursday, U.S. District Judge Beth Labson Freeman said that Gilead was entitled to relief from the fees it incurred while defending the case.
The case dates back to 2013 when Gilead and Merck sued each other, claiming ownership of laboratory work underlying sofosbuvir, the active ingredient in Gilead's drugs.
U.S. backed forces say they have seized full control of Manbij from Islamic State
Syria Democratic Forces (SDF) were now sweeping the city after the departure of a remaining group of militants who had been holed up in the city.
They had freed over 2,000 civilian hostages who had been held by the militants, Sharfan Darwish of the SDF allied Manbij Military Council told Reuters.
"The city is now fully under our control but we are undertaking sweeping operations," he told Reuters.
Clintons earned $10.75 million in 2015, paid 34.2 percent federal tax rate
They paid a federal effective tax rate of 20.3 percent in 2015.
"Hillary Clinton and Tim Kaine continue to set the standard for financial transparency," Clinton campaign aide Jennifer Palmieri said in a statement.
In stark contrast, Donald Trump is hiding behind fake excuses and backtracking on his previous promises to release his tax returns.
"Your move," Clinton campaign aide Ian Sams said on Twitter, linking to the Democratic nominee's returns.
On Thursday, Trump's special counsel, Michael Cohen, told CNN he would not allow Trump to release them until the audits are complete.
At a Clinton rally last week in Omaha, Nebraska, Buffett, whose Berkshire Hathaway conglomerate is based there, challenged Trump to meet and exchange tax returns.
Buffet said that he too was under IRS audit and Trump is "afraid" not of the tax-collection agency but of voters.
Their main investment was a low-cost index mutual fund, and the Clintons reported dividend and interest income of $109,000.
Chilli-powder condoms, firecrackers boost Tanzania elephant protection
Conservationists in Tanzania are using an unorthodox way of keeping elephants from wandering into human settlements - by throwing condoms filled with chilli powder at them.
The method has proved effective and Honeyguide Foundation, which hit upon the idea several years ago, with U.S.-based Nature Conservancy has stepped up its promotion, training volunteers in villages in north Tanzania to use a non-violent four-step way of protecting their homes and crops without hurting the animals.
Friday is World Elephant Day, which is dedicated to the protection of the animals.
The first two steps involve shining a torch at the trespassing elephant and sounding a horn.
If it is not deterred, a so-called "chilli cloud" is thrown.
Chilli powder mixed with soil is packed with a firecracker into a condom, its end is twisted shut with just the fuse exposed.
One whiff is usually enough to send an elephant the other way.
A last resort is a launcher that shoots a Roman candle firework into the air, producing a loud, bright explosion.
Municipal council reaches unanimous decision: No new kiosk to be built on the St. Goarer bank of the Rhine
Normally the people of St. Goarer are happy to accept investment from businesses - but retail in the core of the city is clearly capable of developing itself.
The municipal has now unanimously rejected the application to build a new retail kiosk on the bank of the river Rhine close to the Rhine balcony currently under construction.
"We are generally happy to welcome new businesses, but this kiosk does not fit in this exposed position on the bank of the Rhine," explained Michael Hubrath on behalf of the CDU faction.
Jewish filmmaker slams Berlin hotel for removing Israel dial code after Arab "request" - RT News
A French filmmaker of Jewish origin unleashed a media furor after he revealed that the Kempinski Bristol hotel in Berlin does not list Israel's dial code, with employee citing "requests" from Arabic customers.
The country however was not mentioned among the states one can call directly from the room.
How is it possible, in 2016 in Berlin, the capital of the new Germany, that Israel was eliminated and eradicated?
Seeking explanation, the filmmaker addressed the issue at the hotel's reception.
The answer he got there, Lanzmann wrote "shocked him."
"The majority of our guests are Arabs and they demanded Israel's code to be deleted," the employee was quoted as saying by Lanzmann.
It is in itself a great shame.
That needs no explanation.
The incident triggered quite a response online, with people calling it a scandal.
Some alleged that the Kempinski hotel simply "caved in" to the alleged demands of Arabic customers.
"There was never a direct order" not to include Israel in the fast dial list," Suddeutsche Zeitung quoted a Kempinski representative as saying.
It adds that the code was now added.
Under proposals from the governor of the state of Sao Paulo Geraldo Alckmin, just under 100 public schools will be closed, while 300,000 students will be relocated in order to save money.
Some of those taking part in the protest could be seen writing graffiti on the walls against the interim President Michel Temer.
This latest protest comes just days after protesters took to the streets en masse to support suspended President Dilma Rousseff as the country's senate voted for her impeachment.
Trade between Russia & Iran surges 71% - RT Business
Last year, the Russian diplomatic mission in Iran issued about 35,000 visas, mostly travel, to Iranian citizens.
It's safe to say that last year's record number of Iranian tourists visiting Russia will be broken," he said.
"I can personally recommend to visit the cities of Isfahan, Shiraz and Yazd that have preserved monuments of ancient Persian civilization in good condition," he said.
Witnesses wanted: drinks cash-and-carry in Waldbröl raided
Three people dressed in dark clothing and with their faces covered brandished a gun and demanded that staff at the cash-and-carry hand over cash. They made a run for it on foot, and then probably got into a silver VW Golf.
Between 1.6 and 1.7 m tall, the perpetrators were relatively short.
The drinks cash-and-carry can be accessed directly from the Rewe supermarket's car park, and is tricky to observe.
After the robbery, the perpetrators must have run towards Gerberstraße along Friedrich-Engelbert-Weg, and then fled, possibly towards the B 256 (Schladern ring road) in the silver car from the Schotterparkplatz opposite the entrance to the multi-storey car park.
Anyone who saw anything around the time of the crime (around 7.45 p.m.) that is connected with the robbery should contact the police immediately.
Children and young people from the youth work day group/social group work project from the child protection league of Nagold spent eight gloriously happy days with their social workers during the summer camp in Nussdorf, near Mühlacker.
The lively group spent the first week of the school holidays in the peacefully-located Hartwäldle holiday camp.
One trip saw the group head to Bretten to visit the petting zoo.
Another saw them visit Maulbronn, where there was a special children's tour around the world-famous cloisters.
On warm dates, the group cooled off at the Tiefensee lake in Maulbronn: perfect for jumping into, swimming around in, and paddling.
During workshops, children could practise baktik, make beautiful jewellery with pearls and stones, or create a Roman windmill game from wood.
When it came to go home, the sun was shining, and the children and young people headed home happy.
The ministrants from the chaplaincy of Eyachtal-Haigerloch St. Anna went on a four-day pilgrimage from Villingen to Freiburg.
The committee of upper ministrants for St. Anna had decided to prepare for and go on a pilgrimage lasting several days to bridge the gap to the next pilgrimage to Rome for all ministrants, likely to take place in two years' time.
Various pilgrimage sites were discussed, and a decision was finally made to go to the bishop's city of Freiburg, where, to mark the holy year of mercy, this year the gates of mercy opened for this at Freiburg cathedral are a particular pilgrimage site.
16 children from Bittelbronn, Gruol, Haigerloch and Heiligenzimmern set off.
On the previous evening, Father Storost set the pilgrims off with a small celebration in St. Anna, blessed the pilgrims' cross and the pilgrims.
The individual day trips were framed by brief moments every morning and evening with various prayers, songs and written texts.
Even when they were out and about, the children took breaks at wayside crosses, chapels or churches to sing a song from the pilgrims' songbook they had put together themselves.
The rectory of each parish they reached was available for them to stay in overnight.
At each stage, Alexandra Burkhardt and Heidi Faller were responsible for creating a delicious, nourishing dinner and breakfast.
The next day, they set off on the section towards St. Peter, the most demanding section, seeing them climb around 500 metres in altitude in sweltering heat, and then descend again.
They earned the reward of barbecueing together by the swimming pond.
After the morning session on the fourth day of the pilgrimage in the impressive cloisters of St. Peter, they started off on the final stage to Freiburg.
The children gathered together in Freiburg Cathedral late in the afternoon, visibly relieved and happy, and passed through the gates of mercy.
A brief moment was taken to thank God.
The evening mass in the cathedral saw the children who had arrived at the pilgrimage site welcomed by Chaplain Markus Obert.
The next day, there was time to look around the city, located in the region of Breisgau.
Scot Callum Skinner storms home as Brits grab cycling gold
Scotland's Callum Skinner raced to glory in the men's team sprint at the Rio velodrome last night as the Team GB trio defended the title from London 2012.
The Glaswegian 23-year-old was in the anchor role that his fellow Scotsman Sir Chris Hoy made his own and the youngster did the legend proud as he stormed home to snatch victory from the favoured New Zealand outfit.
Britain claimed a shock victory four years ago to win as Hoy claimed the fifth of his six Olympic golds.
And they repeated the trick after finishing a lowly sixth at March's Track World Championships in London, despite Hoy having since retired.
The issue between Beijing and London was replacing specialist starter Jamie Staff.
They did so just in time as Hindes emerged.
Hoy's retirement also created a void which Kian Emadi and Matt Crampton tried to fill.
Skinner was the man Britain's coaches stuck with, seeing potential in the Scot which has now been realised.
Hindes, Kenny - champions with Hoy four years ago - and Skinner set an Olympic record in qualifying, but the standard was overtaken by New Zealand in the first round.
A change of strategy was a big part of the transformation, with Hindes riding a bigger gear to slow him down and allow Kenny and, in particular, Skinner to keep pace.
Hoy watched on from his position as a BBC pundit and caught the eye of Skinner, Kenny and Hindes when they stepped on to the podium.
The 23-year-old Skinner, from Glasgow, said: "It's a flattering comparison."
There's no better way to win it.
After triumphing at London 2012 alongside Kenny and Hoy, Hindes admitted to deliberately falling to the track following a poor start.
There was no such issue this time around in a supreme victory.
Hindes said: "It felt like London, with all the GB flags in the stand."
We all as a team came together in the last three months.
We've been losing out on so many world titles, so to win the Olympics again is just amazing.
That is one event, one gold medal for the nation which won seven out of 10 track titles in both Beijing and London.
If that is a barometer of the progress made in the last five months, then a successful five days in the velodrome awaits.
With the form Kenny demonstrated, it is not beyond the realms of possibility to imagine him repeating Hoy's feat of winning three Olympic golds in one Games.
That would see Kenny - who is exactly 12 years younger than Hoy, who is also born on 23 March (that seemingly sacred date in British sport which is also the birthday of Steve Redgrave, Mo Farah and Roger Bannister) - take his tally to six gold medals and one silver.
That would be the same as Hoy's.
The 28-year-old from Bolton said: "I'm just enjoying this one for now.
You get to win it with your mates.
Hindes said: "If he wins another two gold medals, he should get a knighthood."
Sir Bradley Wiggins, Ed Clancy, Steven Burke and Owain Doull qualified fastest in the four-man, four-kilometres team pursuit.
They finished in 3:51.943.
The world record, set in winning gold at London 2012, is 3:51.659.
The first round and final (10.42pm) take place on today's second day of action, where Wiggins is sure to be the focus.
He had a dispute with commissaires yesterday ahead of the qualification ride, when officials summoned him to measure his height.
In the corresponding women's event, which resumes and concludes tomorrow, Laura Trott, Joanna Rowsell Shand, Elinor Barker and Katie Archibald of Milngavie advanced in a world record time, clocking 4:13.260.
Team GB have come to rely on its mighty track cycling squad to take ownership of the middle period of an Olympic Games and deliver a host of medals.
After truly exceptional showings of utter dominance at Beijing and London, expectations have been played down in the lead-up to Rio.
However, on the evidence of the first night's racing in the velodrome, it looks like GB's now legendary reputation for peaking at the perfect time could be about to be repeated once again.
A 20-year fixed subsidy expires in November.
As many as 2000 jobs - direct and indirect - could be at risk with any closure.
Alcoa's Portland smelter is losing money and risks closure.
The moves follows speculation about the future of the plant for several years now, initially in the wake of the strong Australian dollar and more recently due to the price for the output from the plant.
Any potential earnings impact on AGL from FY18 onwards is currently limited by the strong futures market outlook for wholesale electricity prices.
AGL said it had already written down the value of the contracts in its accounts by $187 million in "anticipation of a termination event."
Analysts have been wary of the possible closure of both of the Portland smelter in Victoria and also the Tomago plant near Newcastle due to the poor economics of the industry.
If both of those plants go from the market that's a significant reduction in demand in the [electricity] market.
And as a generator that wouldn't be good for us," he said.
Kendall, who is an Estee Lauder brand ambassador and has walked in Milan, Paris and New York fashion weeks, announced the news on her Instagram account on Thursday.
"In a room with a bunch of people I love, looking at this cover made me cry," Kendall wrote.
The cover revelation was followed by a bizarre (or simply Keeping Up with the Kardashians-esque?), scripted reality video that featured the entire Kardashian-Jenner family (bar troublemakers Rob and Caitlyn, and joined by everyone's favourite showbiz uncle, Keeping Up producer Ryan Seacrest) forgetting about their sister's cover, only to end with the classic twist: they were all planning a surprise party.
It's the cliche plot line of nearly every "birthday" episode of a children's television show (Seacrest delivers the line, "You thought we forgot about you?," with the sincerity of a cartoon rabbit in an 8am timeslot), but Kris had to get her other girls in on this publicity somehow.
Kendall's big sister Kim may have beaten her to the cover of Vogue (she shared it with husband Kanye West in April 2014), but the magazine's September cover is a league unto itself.
The September Issue is Vogue's highest selling edition of the year.
With a thickness more closely resembling a coffee table book than a fashion magazine, the issue attracts a huge number of advertisers (Fashionista counted 615 of last year's 832-page tome as advertising content).
The revelation of its cover star is so hotly anticipated that, in the past two years, pictures of the magazine have been leaked before the official announcement.
Previous women to feature on the cover include Naomi Campbell, Linda Evangelista and Kate Moss.
In recent years, the cover has certainly featured more "celebrities who model" than "models who are celebrities."
Oscar winner and Dior ambassador Jennifer Lawrence was featured in 2013, the year after Lady Gaga had the honour.
But, even on the off-chance that Ms Jenner - who is described by the magazine as the "breakout model" of her generation - falls into the former category, she is in pretty good company.
Of course, not everyone is pleased about Jenner's success.
With her reality television history, Jenner's position within the fashion world was always going to be fraught.
This sentiment has boiled up again with the news of Jenner's Vogue cover appearance.
But dwelling on the discontent seems beside the point.
She's walking for Marc Jacobs.
She's selling you Estee Lauder foundation.
And, in her downtime, possibly just as a way still to see sister Kourtney and her kids, she's on reality television.
More than 160,000 of the nation's most vulnerable are turned away from community legal centres every year, with the sector bracing itself for the impact further funding cuts will have on already-stretched operations.
In Queensland, three out of five people - mostly the elderly, immigrants, vulnerable workers, victims of violence and those without resources to fight unfair evictions and the like - are already turned away while seeking free legal advice and representation.
Community legal services, already stretched beyond limits, are bracing for further cuts.
From June next year, those legal centres are slated to lose another 30 per cent of their federal funding.
Director of Community Legal Centres Queensland James Farrell said the latest National Association of Community Legal Centres Census Report found thousands of people were already being turned away each year.
Mr Farrell said without a reversal of the federal government decision, the situation was only going to get worse.
People leaving violent relationships, people with unmanageable and crippling debts, families going through separation, workers who are unfairly sacked - all of these people have problems with legal dimensions, and this report shows that they're not able to get the help they need.
The federal government will cut funding by 30 per cent from June 2017, which means thousands more vulnerable Queenslanders will be forced to navigate complex legal problems without help.
Last year, the state government delivered on its commitment to bring legal aid funding up to the national average.
It's now time to look at the needs of community legal centres and their client communities, and for the Palaszczuk government to invest in this important work.
Donald Trump campaign sued after staffer allegedly pulled a gun
New York: Donald Trump's campaign was sued for allegedly doing nothing after being told that the director of its North Carolina operations pulled a gun on a staffer as they drove in a Jeep in February.
The director, Earl Phillip, "produced a pistol, put his right index finger on the trigger, and drove the barrel into Vincent's knee cap," Bordini said in the complaint.
After complaining to local and regional campaign leadership, Bordini learned that at least four other people had experience the same thing with Phillip, according to the filing.
The suit comes just two days after the Republican presidential nominee caused a furore when telling a crowd in North Carolina that the "Second Amendment people" -- understood to be gun owners and gun enthusiasts -- could take action if his rival Hillary Clinton were elected and gets her pick of judges.
Bordini's complaint seeks compensation from the campaign for negligent supervision, and from Phillip for assault, battery and infliction of emotional distress.
Trump spokeswoman Hope Hicks didn't immediately return a message seeking comment.
A call left at his consulting firm, Innovative Consulting Services, wasn't immediately returned.
The case is Bordini v. Donald J. Trump For President Inc., 16-CS-14300, General Court of Justice, Superior Court Division County of Mecklenburg (Charlotte).
While the red-black ruling coalition in the north might just be able to continue in office, this will not be possible in Berlin, according to the poll.
However, the SPD was the strongest party in both states, with good chances of putting forward the head of the government.
The Left had 19 percent (previously 18.4 percent), and, with 19 percent, the AfD could be in the regional parliament for the first time.
Despite small losses (from 8.7 percent to 6 percent), the Greens will return to Schwerin's regional parliament.
This would put them behind the Greens with 19 percent (2011: 17.6 percent), but ahead of the Left, with 15 percent (previously 11.7 percent).
With 5 percent, the FPD could hope to return, but the Pirates, by contrast, would miss out - unlike in 2011.
Email and the Internet in slow motion: The Nokia Communicator was brought to market 20 years ago.
Its successors have now conquered the world - but its manufacturer is in the midst of a disaster.
Indeed, it was quite bulky.
The in-built storage originally held eight megabytes - enough today for around two high-resolution selfies.
The device is still available online for fans to buy for a couple of euros, even though it comes from the stone age of the Internet.
The new mobile phone could really do a lot by standards back then: it could send and receive SMS messages and emails, and could even be contacted by fax.
There was a calculator, a digital address book and an electronic calendar.
Smartphones are a success story - even if the same cannot be said for Nokia.
Today the market is dominated by providers who came to the game much later than Nokia.
For many people today, being online all day, no matter where you are, is simply a fact of life.
"We all need to learn to put our phones down from time to time," said Janina Kugel, Siemens HR Director.
Being permanently contactable has become a blessing and a curse.
For me, this was the great attraction of Heathrow, just as it was with London 2012, where we made enormous efforts to ensure that all our nations and regions benefited from the Games.
For our local communities alone we'll create 10,000 new apprenticeships, 40,000 new jobs and bring an end to youth unemployment around the airport.
Just as there were ahead of London 2012, there will be those that think the challenge of Heathrow expansion is too great.
I was told that Britain would be never be ready for the Games and that we would be embarrassed on the world stage.
The doubters were wrong on 2012 and they will be proved wrong on Heathrow.
There are always obstacles to be overcome, but Heathrow is answering every question asked of it.
Like the Olympics, Heathrow is an infrastructure project for the many, not just the few.
Expansion is an opportunity to create up to 180,000 new jobs, £211bn in economic growth, leaving a legacy of skills and employment both around the airport and across the UK.
We have a great team at Heathrow who have implemented an £11bn programme of infrastructure investment on time and on budget, from T5 - voted the world's best airport terminal five years in a row, to T2, built in the middle of the world's busiest two runways.
Now they stand ready to deliver a third runway, backed by £16 billion of private investment.
Lord Paul Deighton is chairman of the Heathrow Board and former Commercial Secretary to the Treasury
Adblock Plus, Facebook in "cat-and-mouse game" over ad blocking
For companies that make money from online advertising, attempts to circumvent ad-blocking software amount to a "cat-and-mouse game," according to one of the companies that makes that software.
On Tuesday, Facebook said that its desktop website would change the coding around its ads in order to make it more difficult for ad blockers to detect which parts of a page are ads.
The fact that the world's largest social media company has entered the fight is a strong indication of just how big a concern ad blockers have become for the industry.
Also on Tuesday, Facebook said it would be updating its "ad preferences" tool to give people more control over how ads are targeted to them.
"This isn't a good experience for people and we plan to address the issue," a Facebook spokesperson said in an e-mailed statement.
Woman run over on Swiss motorway in apparent suicide
Police are appealing for witnesses after a woman was run over by several vehicles on a motorway in the early hours of Thursday in an apparent act of suicide.
Clearly looking to kill herself, the victim, a Swiss woman aged 49, was hit by several vehicles including a lorry.
Several of the drivers involved have already been interviewed but some are still unidentified, said police, who are calling for them and anyone else who witnessed the incident to come forward.
However it remains to be seen if any of the drivers involved will face charges.
That's what the prosecutor must determine," said Hofstetter.
Last year a police officer was acquitted of causing death by negligence after she hit and killed a man who was lying on the A1 near Paynerne one night in August 2014.
The 22-year-old victim had been drinking and had passed out on the road, the court heard.
NASA climate model: Venus was once habitable
Venus was likely once habitable, according to the projections of a new NASA climate model.
Scientists at NASA's Goddard Institute for Space Studies developed a model to explore Venus' past using tools and algorithms similar to those employed by climate scientists.
The model was designed to determine whether or not Venus, with its hot, water-less surface and CO2-chocked atmosphere, might have once hosted Earth-like conditions.
But the latest simulation suggests Venus could have boasted a thin, Earth-like atmosphere and still spun slowly.
Early Venus also benefited from a sun that was 30 percent dimmer.
"In the GISS model's simulation, Venus' slow spin exposes its dayside to the sun for almost two months at a time," GISS scientist Anthony Del Genio explained in a news release.
The result is mean climate temperatures that are actually a few degrees cooler than Earth's today.
Its oceans evaporated and its water vapor was burned away by ultraviolet light.
To achieve this, the vision of the coach and VP-hockey operations needs to be perfectly aligned with that of the organization.
The Avalanche posted a 39-39-4 mark in 2015-16 and fell five points shy of the Wild for the second wild-card spot in the Western Conference.
Labor strikes over pay for North Sea oil workers are suspended while all parties to the dispute sit down for a new round of talks, lead negotiators said.
Strikes against oilfield services company Wood Group have been staged sporadically on platforms in the North Sea operated by Royal Dutch Shell.
"Wood Group and the Unite and RMT unions can confirm we have agreed to restart the process for resolution of the current dispute," a joint statement read.
Wood Group this year cut rates paid to its North Sea contractors by about 9 percent because of negative market pressures.
The company's rate reduction follows a 10 percent decrease for onshore contractors in 2014.
The company said additional cuts would give the company the room needed to move through the market downturn.
Shell, for its part, has trimmed thousands of people from its payroll and announced plans to leave oil and gas operations in up to 10 countries as it streamlines its operations in the wake of its mega-merger with British energy company BG Group.
Energy companies are under pressure from lower crude oil prices, an economic situation compounded by the British decision in June to leave the European Union.
Scottish Member of Parliament Dave Anderson met with labor leaders earlier this week to discuss one of the biggest labor disputes to strike the North Sea in a generation.
The North Sea, he said, is vital for the regional economy.
The new data is helping astronomers understand why stars in the cluster spin at varying rates, as well as how rotation periods relate to planet formation.
They're spinning as fast as they ever will.
At their peak spin rates, these maturing stars eject large amounts of stellar wind.
Rebull likens the stars to dancers, larger ones pirouetting more slowly than smaller ones.
Because the Pleiades cluster is so close, it serves as an ideal cosmic laboratory to compare stellar qualities with spin rates.
"The Pleiades star cluster provides an anchor for theoretical models of stellar rotation going both directions, younger and older," said Rebull.
We still have a lot we want to learn about how, when and why stars slow their spin rates and hang up their 'dance shoes,' so to speak.
A controversial baseball star steps down
Alex Rodriguez' tears ran quicker than the US baseball star had run from base to base, in better days.
After his emotional announcement of retirement, the 41-year-old pro will wear his New York Yankees jersey for the last time on 12 August, against the Tampa Bay Rays.
He signed a ten-year contract, which has brought him 27 million US dollars every year since 2007.
Until the end of the contract on 31 December 2017, he will work as a consultant and a youth coach - on full pay.
Rodriguez paid this back in terms of playing performance long ago.
With 696 home runs, 3114 hits and 2021 points for his team ("runs"), for the Seattle Mariners (1994 to 2000), the Texas Rangers (2001 to 2004) and since 2005, the Yankees, he has reached rather a few milestones.
However, the 41-year-old cannot be welcomed into the baseball Hall of Fame.
Rodriguez was the main suspect accused of having received performance enhancing drugs via an anti-ageing clinic in Florida over a period of years.
"The league might even have done me a favour in 2014 - I'd played for 20 years without a break," Rodriguez said, summing things up.
Even his final days didn't go off without a bang.
While many baseball legends take to the great stage over their last few games, Rodriguez had to sit on the sidelines.
"My job isn't about a retirement tour."
Nevertheless, Rodriguez, who was married to actress Cameron Diaz and who has been rumoured to have been linked to pop star Madonna and actress Kate Hudson, had the support of the fans of Yankees' arch rivals, Boston Red Sox.
2016 Olympics: Chen Xinyi, Silwia Danekowa and Adrian Zielinski are the first doping cases
Busted: After a sample tested positive for doping, weightlifter Adrian Zielinksi from Poland is not allowed to compete in Rio.
One now-banned athlete had almost won a medal.
The first official doping cases of the Rio Olympic Games were announced ahead of the seventh day of the competition.
Chinese swimmer Chen Xinyi, 3000-meter hurdler Silwia Danekowa from Bulgaria and Polish weightlifter Adrian Zielinski tested positive in Brazil, and have been excluded. Just before the start of the athletics competition, which has not escaped criticism, this news comes at a bad time.
The Sunday before, Chen had revealed the presence of the diuretic hydrochlorothiazide, which is used to mask drugs.
The international sport tribunal CAS confirmed on Friday afternoon local time that she had been banned from the Olympic Games.
On Sunday, the 18-year-old had taken fourth place in the 100m Butterfly final - missing out on a bronze medal by just 0.09 seconds.
Chen applied to the International Olympic Committee (IOC) for a hearing and to have her B sample opened.
For the first time in history, the CAS, not the IOC, is responsible for sanctioning sportspeople who test positive.
Also overnight in Rio, the news about Danekowa's positive test leaked out, and the 33-year-old went on the offensive herself.
She said she was innocent and that "the only explanation could be food supplements," the athlete explained.
Bulgaria's Prime Minister Bojko Borissow spoke up immediately to criticise the athlete.
On Friday the case of "Adrian Zielinski" was announced: the winner at the London Olympics in the weight category of up to 85 kg had tested positive for the anabolic steroid Nandrolone three days earlier, just like his brother.
Both deny taking it, but neither was allowed to compete in the weight category of up to 94 kg.
Ahead of the athletes' start, the case of Danekowa is another heavy blow for the reputation of the entire sport.
The World Federation IAAF had banned the entire Russian team, with one exception, for systematic doping, and running nation Kenya also created a mass of bad news in Rio.
In swimming, China's earlier offence had caused heated disputes between the athletes themselves.
"When I look at the podium for the 200m Freestyle, I want to throw up," Lacourt said on French radio.
Sun tested positive for the stimulant trimetazidine at the Chinese championships in 2014, but only had to sit out for a three-month ban.
Data theft: This is how perfidiously hackers extort ransom money
If they are successful in that domain, the ransom money they can demand is significantly higher than it would be for private users.
Private users were initially the target, but the shift to corporate attacks took place terrifyingly quickly over the past few months.
Ransomware follows a simple pattern: Once activated on a user's computer, it seeks out files that have not been edited for a long time, like Word, Excel or database files, as well as image and video archives.
But while it's a personal photo database that's at play for private users, it's sensitive customer data or project databases needed for the continuation of projects that are the focus for companies.
22 percent of German companies affected reported that they had suffered a fall in turnover due to ransomware, 13 percent had to cease trading entirely, and in one instance, people's lives were put at risk.
In Germany, several hospitals have already fallen victim to attacks, and their patients were placed under serious threat as a result of the loss of medical records.
"We always tell victims not to pay up: that simply exacerbates the problem," explains Kleczynski.
They explain to their victims via chat how to pay using Bitcoin, set up freely-accessible support websites, or decrypt sample files for free.
And while private individuals are targeted for sums of a few hundred euros, companies sometimes have to bargain hard and pay out five-figure sums to get their files back decrypted.
Malware kits to date, including the malware itself, advice and additional tools, have been sold for a one-off fixed fee of between 1000 and 10,000 dollars.
So you just log into an underground forum, buy the set from a criminal, and task someone else with installing the software on as many PCs as possible.
More than 50 percent of companies' IT specialists in Maywarebytes' survey relied on using file back-ups and scanner software to beat ransomware.
This means that the risk potential is much higher than before, depending on the type of file.
In the future, perpetrators will be able to focus themselves on brand-new targets within the internet of things.
At the Defcon hacker conference, security researchers demonstrated how they could take control of a thermostat connected to the internet.
In the midst of winter, many victims would pay a ransom to have their blocked heating turned back on.
In the future, if hackers switch off an entire production line in a factory instead of someone's heating, ransomware could also be a issue in Industry 4.0.
HONDA HR-V is practical and perfect for everyday use
Honda wants to cram everything into the small HR-V: a bit of an SUV, a bit of a coupé, bundled up with the versatility of a minivan.
It seems a bit too much, but the HR-V, built on the same new platform as the new Jazz, does indeed prove itself to be exceptionally flexible in daily use.
The materials used in the interior are well crafted, and have a pleasant appearance - just the surface of the dashboard lets the side down.
The HR-V is more versatile than comparable vehicles in terms of its loading space.
There isn't just a boot of 453 l with the seats up, and 1026 l with the seats down; there are the "magic seats" too.
This is rather less magical than it sounds: the seats in the back can be flipped up like cinema seats to reveal additional loading space, measuring 1.24 m from floor to ceiling.
The boot is easy to load, but the load height of 650 mm is a bit higher than it is in the Peugeot 2008, which is a comparable model.
The 1.6 l diesel engine we tested, with 88 kW/120 horsepower accelerates the HR-V powerfully, thanks to the torque of up to 300 Nm across a wide range of speeds.
Everyday consumption of 4.7 l/100 km was pleasing.
All-wheel drive is not available.
In the top-flight "Executive" version, which we tested, the fittings leave nothing to be desired.
The safety systems include city emergency braking assistant (functions up to a speed of 32), collision warning system, and the lane departure warning system.
The collision warning system is irritating occasionally: when parking, it sees lots of obstacles as "approaching objects".
The high-beam assistant system is very reliable.
If you don't want to invest quite that much, the petrol model is available from 20,000 euros, and diesel from 23,000 euros.
Airline is not liable: Fall on passenger boarding bridge
An airline will not be liable for a passenger's fall on a passenger boarding bridge.
The airline did not have to pay the man any compensation.
When do organisers pay if illness strikes?
Travellers who fall ill will only get their money back when they return home if there is no doubt that their illness was caused by something within their hotel.
However, this is only the case if more than ten percent of visitors can be proved to have suffered the same symptoms.
The holidaymakers blamed a malfunctioning sewage treatment plant, which they believed to have polluted the seawater.
The family took the opinion that the holiday was unsatisfactory - and took the organiser to court.
The claimants had no luck in court.
It was true that the waste treatment plant was suffering from a fault.
But the organiser only found out about this just before the claimants departed.
One thing is for sure: Our country will not react to the perpetrators' violence with hatred and division.
We will not give the terrorists this victory.
If perpetrators have to leave the country quicker, that will boost security and increase the general public's approval of refugee politics.
He also announced that security services would receive more staff, to the tune of "a mid-four figure sum over several years".
Advertising for terrorism must be punishable once again.
Video surveillance is to be improved, and gun laws to be amended so that purchasing weapons online, in particular, is made more difficult.
Teachers must be better trained for dealing with traumatised individuals.
De Maizière is planning to employ undercover agents to hunt down criminals in particular areas of the Internet (the Dark Web).
SPD Head Gabriel said that "the SPD is prepared to discuss anything that will increase security further".
"That was a slap in the face for agitators in the CDU/CSU," said Gabriel on Friday to the newspapers of the Funke media group.
De Maizière had previously turned down calls from the coalition for a burka ban and the abolition of dual nationality.
He views an overarching ban of full veils as problematic under the constitution.
We can talk about the law with regard to traffic, or for witnesses appearing in court.
Head of the Greens, Simone Peter, accused the Minister of wanting to use new anti-terror packages to create an air of energy and ability to act.
Head of the Left, Bernd Riexinger, said that "smooth talking and tightening up residency laws are not going to make the people in this country any more safe".
Better flow of traffic on the motorway slip road
Traffic jams are a regular occurrence on the bypass - here's a photo from November.
This is good news for all drivers stuck in rush-hour traffic on the bypass every evening as they drive onto the motorway slip road (A43).
Next Tuesday and Wednesday (16/17 August), the State Roadworks Office will extendthe right-hand turning lane in the area between Hammer Straße and the exit from Weseler Straße by 700 metres.
This means that drivers will be able to feed in directly from Hammer Straße.
The major advantage is that traffic will split earlier, improving overall circulation on the busy section of main road 51.
The CDU fraction in the Münster (West) district administration came up with the idea to lengthen the exit.
The traffic on the slip road is particularly bad for drivers between 5pm and 7pm.
This is caused by the bottleneck on the B51, just before the exit onto Weseler Straße.
The relevant authorities cannot say how long this bottleneck, and the associated rush-hour traffic, will last.
The district authorities deliberately chose the less busy period of the school holidays for the extension of the right-hand turning lane, because it will cause delays.
Intercultural journey: Cultural programme for schools
The "International Class" at the Kinderhaus forest school saw a performance of the award-winning play "The Invisible House" at the Young Theatre in Münster.
The association's objective is to encourage cultural integration of young people from migrant and refugee backgrounds, and since the start of the year, it has offered schools with welcome classes with the chance to attend cultural institutions in Münster as part of this project.
Most young people in the class arrived in Münster between September 2015 and March 2016 from Afghanistan, Iran, Serbia and Syria, among others, and spoke little German.
Thanks to the choreography, scenic images and video animations they were able to follow the plot regardless, according to the press release from Münster's Young Theatre.
There are also plans for acting and theatrical language training for children and families.
As a result of the increase in the number of refugees, the association is expecting that many classes will want to take part.
Rain replaces shooting stars: There is hope that the weather will improve
For people hoping to spot shooting stars in south-west Germany on Thursday night, the weather put paid to their plans - but all is not lost.
The President of the Observatory of Welzheim, Hans-Ulrich Keller, said on Friday morning that the clouds and rain overnight meant that conditions were not ideal for observing the celestial show.
We are pinning our hopes on Friday night.
The weather is supposed to be good, so we'll definitely see lots of shooting stars in the sky.
The shooting stars are the Perseids: some of the quickest shooting stars, travelling at 216000 kilometres an hour.
In the evening your mind won't stop whirring, you lie awake for hours each night, and by the time morning comes, sleep is far from your mind even well before your alarm goes off.
There are various forms of sleep disorders, and they can have many causes, emphasises Hans-Günter Weeß, President of the German Association for Sleep Research and Sleep Medicine.
Many people feel that their sleep throughout the night is unsatisfactory or inadequate, says Jens Wagenknecht, Member of the Board of the German Association of General Practicioners, who practices in Varel in Lower Saxony.
Biological, psychological or behavioural factors can be to blame, along with medication.
If you have a slipped disk, for example, you might find it hard to lie down, wake up every couple of hours, and start to grumble about everyday problems and worries, suggests Weeß as an example.
If, over the course of a month, you sleep poorly for at least three nights a week, and find that this impacts you during the day, you should see a doctor, advises Weeß.
They can impact in various different ways: You could be exhausted, tired, poorly rested, suffer from difficulties concentrating and staying alert, be irritable, have mood swings or physical complains such as stomach ache or headaches.
To be able to treat a sleep disorder, it is important to work out what is causing it.
Behaviour changes, cognitive behavioural therapy or medication - with traditional sleeping tablets only being used in exceptional circumstances and for a maximum of two weeks - are all options for treatment.
Your doctor will examine you to see if the problems have a physical cause.
Doctors recommend an examination in a sleep lab for patients whose snoring disrupts their breathing, for people who feel abnormally sleepy during the day, for sleepwalkers, or if the cause of a sleep disorder cannot be pinpointed, explains Fietze.
After being cabled up, you head to bed at your normal time.
In addition to the electrodes on the body, you wear a nasal cannula, a belt across your chest and a sensor on your finger.
In addition, a camera mounted on the ceiling records the sleeper.
How can those affected get a grip on the problems they are experiencing?
There are a fair few areas that can be adjusted to encourage a better night's sleep.
Weeß lists them: going to bed and getting up a regular times, not staying in bed too long, not sleeping during the day, not watching television to get to sleep, avoiding alcohol, and not looking at the clock during the night - because then you start working out times straight away, and that's not helpful at all.
What the jungle camp has got to do with missing swimming medals
In December 2014 he got his first gold medal at the Short Course Swimming Championships in Doha, while setting his first world record.
Now the former DSV athlete Markus Deibler has come forward on Facebook to defend his ex-teammates from criticism.
"In a country in which an Olympic champion is awarded 20,000 euros and the King of the Jungle gets 150,000 euros, nobody should wonder why medals aren't being won," the 26-year-old wrote on Thursday night on his Facebook page.
The remuneration system in swimming is poor, but doping tests, on the other hand, are very good, he says.
If he wanted to make a comeback, Deibler would have to register with the National Anti-Doping Agency for Germany (NADA) nine months before he started.
"If you don't submit to WADA/FINA checks a particular amount of time before the World Championships/Olympics, then you shouldn't be able to take part," the Hamburg resident stated, who now runs an ice-cream parlour.
Airport: A gang of luggage thieves are arrested
Professional thieves at Dusseldorf airport
Plain clothes officers from Dusseldorf's police force managed to arrest two women and two men, aged between 50 and 61, on Thursday.
The suspects had worked as a group to steal several bags and items of luggage.
Around 9.30 p.m. civil servants in Dusseldorf Airport recognised a gang known to the police from previous thefts.
The two men and two women had committed multiple crimes since mid-July, and had committed the offences as a group, dividing up their work in a particularly professional way.
Old buildings, a couple of little linden trees, and a few cobblestones among them: at first glance, Berlin-Friedrichshain's Rigaer Straße doesn't look as if it's one of the streets that the police consider to be among the most dangerous in the city.
If you walk along the street from east to west, you come across playgrounds, a freshly painted kindergarten and a health-food shop.
Someone has spraypainted "horrid!" on the facade of a house.
Articles on this "trendy district", as the property company responsible has dubbed Friedrichshain, have been illustrated with pictures of burning cars over the past few weeks.
The reason for this is house 94: At first, it was occupied by squatters, then the inhabitants had rental contracts, but some rooms on the ground floor are still occupied by squatters and used for events.
Berlin's Senator of the Interior Henkel had called multiple times since the start of the year for the police to take a hard line against the project that has made the area a "no-go zone" for police and singled out 94 as the starting point for autonomous violence.
After the rooms on the ground floor, the Kadterschmiede, were cleared on 22 June by 300 police officers, the police patrolled the area for three weeks, according to official statements, with 30 to 40 officers and three vans, closing parts of the street and preventing visitors from accessing house 94.
On this summer afternoon, the street seemed peaceful: parents were out walking with their children, people were sitting on their houses' steps in the sunshine, other people were chatting in front of the off-licence.
Far-left violence is not what worries most residents the most: Kerstin Neugebauer, who has lived in the district since 1999, and Jana*, who has brought three children up here, are mainly irritated by the police presence.
It doesn't sound like a district that wants more police protection against left-wing vandalism.
The schisms that Berlin's Senator for the Interior and the police believe to have opened up between the squatters in the house and their neighbours do not exist.
Friedrichshain, in the east of Berlin, was traditionally a working-class neighbourhood. Even today, it has a lower average income and a higher risk of poverty than the rest of the city.
Squatters in houses and the residential projects they spawn are nothing new in the district: in 1990 numerous houses in the then-GDR were full of squatters, including almost all of Mainzer Straßer, near Rigauer.
While those on Mainzerstraße were cleared out during a real street battle with a large police deployment, many of the projects in Rigauer were legalised, and are to a certain extent still inhabited by the people who first squatted there 26 years ago.
Many of the new buildings in Rigauer are seen as symbols of this development: this is clear from their broken windows or freshly painted facades splattered by paint bombs.
No other street has been mentioned so often this year in connection with "autonomous left-wing violence".
One reason for not all neighbours seeing this as a problem could be that they are not directly affected by crime: according to statistics, almost all crimes such as bodily harm are directed against the police.
The majority of crimes are damage to property, which tend to target new buildings and recently renovated properties.
For Kerstin Neugebauer, who has been living in a block of flats next-door to controversial number 94 for 17 years, there can be no talk of uncertainty.
She is calm about acts of violence: the people at number 94 are her neighbours, they certainly had nothing to do with it.
Even the notorious burning cars have not played a role in Rigaer for a long time.
The trained architect does not see her street as a crime flashpoint - quite the opposite: "Here we help each other, live together along the street, and talk to each other more than elsewhere".
This is also why it was so important to her that residents got their street back: back from the police, politicians and the media who suddenly started claiming how important the district was in July.
But in the eyes of residents like Neugebauer, the street is still being taken away: by impersonal new developments in old empty sites, which drive out old residents.
"They are freehold flats, and most people here aren't interested in that - people here generally aren't so well-off," she said.
"I absolutely cannot condone violence and destruction."
Kerstin Neugebauer has little sympathy for people who have moved in and are irritated by paint bombs: The housing project and the left-wing scene are part of the district.
Regine Kunde from the working group said that the volunteers are more than grateful that Deuschle is now available to work as a jack-of-all-trades to help anyone experiencing difficulties.
That's what some people said when management posted the advert for the job - meaning it less in a mocking way, and more with reference to the number of tasks that were to be performed.
They were looking for a manager with people skills and communication skills, combined with years of experience in social work - a real jack-of-all-trades.
However, managerial work is not how she spends most of her time, Annika Deuschle says.
It is primarily about organisation, working on-site with people, even in the background, and networking, she says.
It was high time," Regine Kunde said, that Annika Deuschle offered support to voluntary and full-time workers.
There are major problems, minor problems, organisational problems, problems with people, comprehension problems.
For a while, one major problem has been finding homes subsequently for refugees that have been given certified status.
The problem: Properties are free, but not every landlord is prepared to let.
According to Deuschle, being reliant on private homes has not worked.
This is why the commune's homes need to be beefed up, as it is so neatly put.
But homes alone will not do the trick.
In addition to a fixed abode, internships, apprenticeships, school places, "one-euro" traineeship jobs and temporary jobs need to be found or set up for refugees and migrants.
"More jobs would be good," reports Regine Kunde.
Many people work in builder's yards or help caretakers, or do voluntary work - and that provides motivation in a very orderly way, as Annika Deuschle reports.
The day needs a fixed structure, Deuschle and Kunde say.
Professional courses are rare.
There is where the administration and volunteers can get involved.
She says it is key that refugees feel as if they are wanted and welcome in Germany.
They have to explain to refugees that it will take that long, and that the time can be filled productively - for example, with language courses.
If someone feels that they can't help anyone in Urbach, that they aren't allowed to work, and that they are useless, they'll never integrate.
But there are also problem cases, Kunde says honestly, "people for whom nothing works". As a result, Deuschle and Kunde's work will always be to motivate others.
"No," Regine Kunde said clearly, "which some people might call naive". She could not and did not want to ignore the chance of a residual risk remaining.
They were afraid that the attackers would bring them into total disrepute.
Many of them would like to stay in Urbach.
So full-time and volunteer staff have to keep an eye open for jobs in the town and across the region.
But they always have in the back of their mind that a new group of refugees and migrants could soon be arriving in Urbach.
It is unfair to show them volunteers on site.
"In Urbach we've not got to where we wanted to be quite yet," said Annika Deuschle.
Regine Kunde also makes clear that the residents of Urbach have their hands full with integrating the refugees who have arrived to date.
Currently they amount to around 100 people, predominantly young men.
Schorndorf: Search for intruders made by helicopter
The two men were between 1.65m and 1.70m tall, probably wearing masks, both wearing blue jeans and black hooded tops.
It may be the case that the unknown assailants were recognised near the apartment or during their escape.
Baden-Württemberg: Police launch investigation after bikers attack a snack bar
After an attack on a snack stand in Ulm, police have launched investigations against six suspects who associate with the biker community for a serious breach of the peace.
According to the police, around 20 masked men from a biker-esque clan had thrown bottles and stones against the window of the snack bar.
Afterwards, two customers were attacked, one of whom was slightly injured.
Thüringen: Zeiss Meditec comes closer to reaching a billion in turnover
Munich 1856: Four maps that will change your view of the city
A mental asylum, where today young people are said to meet.
A crypt chapel, where they are now digging tunnels for the S-Bahn.
Allotment holders cultivate the soil of former farmers.
It is annoying when geographical maps are not up-to-date.
Anyone who has ever got worked up because the car's sat-nav is showing a green field instead of a bypass knows that.
The historical maps of the digital BayernAtlas, an offering from the State Government's Geoportal Bayern, are anything but up-to-date – and yet it is precisely for this reason that they are so informative.
Then it becomes clear how the towns and municipalities in the distribution area of Munich's Merkur newspaper have changed since the 19th century.
The digital BayernAtlas is a patchwork quilt that one doesn't quite recognise for what it is at first.
Within the large overview map, were worked in detailed maps for towns and municipalities, so-called original-lay-of-the-land sheets.
Their commissioner: Napoleon.
The French army commander had occupied Bavaria since the spring in 1800, during the War of the Second Coalition with Austria.
Even if the French troops finally retreated with the Treaty of Lunéville from 9th February 1801: it was the current neighbours who had the idea to create a comprehensive map of Bavaria.
The original lay-of-the-land sheet for Munich originates from 1856 and, like all the others, can be found on the website of the Bavarian State Library.
The comparison of past/present is most impressive taking the example of the state capital.
The city has stretched out in all directions and coalesced.
Where the West Park is today, one sees nothing but field – at first sight: upon zooming in, a more detailed small-scale map with dozens of lines and numbers appears: hand-numbered plots from the so-called "original record", from which the property tax was derived.
Today, it is no longer farmers who occupy small parcels there – rather, it is allotment holders of the "Land in Sonne" facility.
Theresienwiese, since 1810 the scene of Oktoberfest, was in the 19th century still actually a "Wiese" – a meadow – and not a concrete wasteland.
On the other side of the Isar, the historical map gives an insight into the history of psychiatric medicine.
In the original lay-of-the-land sheet, in the area where today the borough of Au-Haidhausen is, one can make out not only the street name "am Gasteig" or the elevation "Auf der Lüften" – but can actually read in large letters "mental asylum".
The Munich district mental asylum "Auf der Auer Lüften" had come to life there in 1858/59.
What is more, he forbade the staff from using violence against the inmates," says Hermann Wilhelm, leader of the Haidhausen Museum, which has been busying itself for an exhibition with the establishment.
Originally there was place for 280 patients; later this was expanded to 500 places.
At some point even this capacity was no longer enough – the reason why the district mental asylum in Haar was constructed in 1905.
The Isar Amper Clinic, East Munich, has been located there since 2006, one of the largest psychiatric units in Germany.
The Second World War also brought a decisive change to the heart of Munich.
The bombs of the Allies tore many holes in the city centre in December 1944.
One big one remains up to this day – at the Marienhof.
The English Institute, small commercial premises and a crypt chapel from the Middle Ages once stood in the Marienhof, where these days, preparations for the second S-Bahn main line are underway, with first digging to follow on 5th April 2017.
The National Association for the Advancement of Colored People has put out an alert for people of color traveling to Missouri because of the state's discriminatory policies and racist attacks.
"The NAACP Travel Advisory for the state of Missouri, effective through August 28th, 2017, calls for African American travelers, visitors and Missourians to pay special attention and exercise extreme caution when traveling throughout the state given the series of questionable, race-based incidents occurring statewide recently, and noted therein," the group's statement reads.
A recent Missouri law making it harder for people to win discrimination lawsuits, as well as the state's law enforcement disproportionately targeting minorities prompted the group to issue the travel alert, the NAACP said.
"You have violations of civil rights that are happening to people.
"We are hearing complaints at a rate we haven't heard before."
Sanders died under questionable circumstances earlier this year after he ran out of gas while traveling through the state, and was taken into custody by Missouri police without being accused of a crime.
The advisory also points to a recent report by the Missouri Attorney General's Office showing that black drivers in the state were 75 percent more likely to be pulled over than whites.
"The advisory is for people to be aware, and warn their families and friends and co-workers of what could happen in Missouri," Chapel said.
"People need to be ready, whether it's bringing bail money with them, or letting relatives know they are traveling through the state."
Missouri recorded 100 hate crimes in 2015, according to the latest figures from the FBI's hate crime reporting program, ranking the state at 16th in the country in terms of the number of such violations.
Previously, the American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) had issued travel advisories for Texas and Arizona after the states passed immigration enforcement laws requiring local law enforcement to detain people on immigration violations which the ACLU said would increase racial profiling.
The Fischerbach pasture fence project is a successful project and will be continued next year.
Representatives from the Fischerbach local CDU group met with mayor Thomas Schneider and the two representatives at Rechtgrabenhof farm, belonging to the Schwendemann family.
Only regional produce is served to the holiday-makers.
Grassland areas make for a lot of work, a lot has to be done with the string trimmer.
"We have to grapple with the conditions and with the topography here," stressed Schwendemann.
For Mayor Thomas Schneider, it was clear that "the community has recognised the importance of the pasture fence project and is happy to have the Leader funding".
One hopes that with that, afforestation of the area could then be drawn out for a long while.
The farmers are often the target of criticism thanks to the funding.
The areas kept open with these amount to 40 hectares, which may not be afforested until at least 2023.
The farmers were thus left with 12,610 euros, which they had to invest in the 16.2-kilometre pasture fence.
Kordula Kovac stressed: "You're doing a really good job. Without farmers we'd not be able to function."
Peter Weiß is also standing firm: "First-class foodstuffs are produced here."
The Baden-Württemberg directive on countryside conservation (LPR) makes the government funding of pasture fences possible.
In addition, the fenced-off area is not allowed to be farmable with a tractor (gradient of over 35 per cent) and must therefore be threatened with afforestation.
For the 2018 Fischerbach pasture fence project, an application is currently underway from eight participants with 24 plots who would like to build just shy of 16 kilometres of fence.
Stephen Miller, one of the key ideologues of the Trump regime, surely knew what he was doing when he took a symbolic axe to the Statue of Liberty in a heated argument with CNN's Jim Acosta over the president's proposals to drastically limit legal immigration.
In fairness, Miller did not attack the statue itself.
A horde of boat-trip owners and Liberty impersonators would have lynched him if he did.
As Miller scolded Acosta: "I don't want to get off into a whole thing about history here, but the Statue of Liberty is ... a symbol of American liberty lighting the world.
The poem that you're referring to, that was added later and is not part of the original Statue of Liberty."
Miller is factually correct, but as he put it himself, this is not really about history.
It is about the contemporary resonance of Lazarus's startling words, the only ones in which a state has appeared to invite not just any old immigrants, but the poorest of the poor: "Your tired, your poor, / Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, / The wretched refuse of your teeming shore."
There has never been a time when the "wretched refuse" has been more visible on our screens.
Miller was not engaging in literary criticism - he was making it clear that these people are not welcome in Trump's USA.
Lazarus - and her friends who campaigned to place her words at the base after her death - knew very well that they were engaging in a highly political act.
And she gives herself a very different name: Mother of Exiles.
And just as Lazarus changed the meaning of the statue, rightwingers have long wanted to change it back.
The great loudmouth Rush Limbaugh, a kind of John the Baptist for the coming of Trump, argued in 2010 that Liberty is not inviting anyone in, but is rather an early neocon, taking the American flame out to the benighted world: "Lady Liberty is stepping forward.
She is meant to be carrying the torch of liberty from the United States to the rest of the world.
Rather unusually, Limbaugh actually hit on something.
Lazarus's great imaginative act was to see it as it would be seen by exhausted, wretched but hopeful people on the decks of ships after long and often dreadful journeys.
It is literally about seeing the world from the perspective of people seeking refuge and a chance to better their lives.
Her statue speaks back to them the words of hope and welcome they need to hear.
Their torch is meant not to light the way, but to inflame the hatreds that are their only source of power.
UK Athletics' performance director Neil Black says the 16-strong Scottish contingent in the World Championships squad will make "a massive contribution to the team."
"We embrace it and we're trying to understand it and we'll push on that until we work it out," Black said.
British athletics: it's something to do with what they've done.
And the guy on the corner street, too.
Her captain's speech was incredible," says Black.
"A number of athletes, whether they were Scottish or wherever they live or train, walked out of that room feeling hugely proud and really motivated.
The passion and real feeling that Eilidh naturally put into it were great."
She will go in the 1500m and the 5,000m.
Chris O'Hare, who runs in the 1500m, is another Scot to watch, following a great season that included victory at the British Team trials and the Anniversary Games.
"The special thing about being team captain is that it was voted for by the other members of the team, so that it was such a huge honour anyway but to know that your teammates have voted for you and chosen you made it extra-special for me," she added.
And they're here as well-established athletes, athletes that are going to be looking to get on podiums.
As for my captain's speech?
I just drew on the fact that we're very lucky in this situation in that we've got a home World Championships.
I'm getting a second chance to go out there and compete and it's just going to be such an amazing atmosphere out there."
Blocking critics from Facebook: Don't run for public office, if you can't take heat from voters
The father of our country knew something about bad press.
Americans loved George Washington, but it didn't take long for newspapers to start slamming him on everything from domestic policy to his political principles.
But he did not silence his critics.
Because back in 1783, Washington said, "the freedom of Speech may be taken away - and, dumb & silent we may be led, like sheep, to the Slaughter."
That brings me to Maryland Gov. Larry Hogan, who needs to work on being more like Washington.
And the American Civil Liberties Union sued him for that earlier this week.
The governor's staff dismissed the lawsuit as frivolous, and the online commentary was rich with a "who cares?" backlash.
And it especially matters when it's a guy like Hogan.
This is a Republican governor in an overwhelmingly Democratic state who is astonishingly popular.
He has the second-highest approval rating of the nation's 50 governors.
He's shown a steady hand in leading his state and a stern adherence to principles.
He's also been pretty deft at using Facebook as a primary means to connect with his constituents, playfully debuting his hairless head after chemo treatments on his page.
So blocking people who come to the governor's page - which is a public forum, labeled as official and administered by staff members paid public tax dollars - is unnecessary and ultimately dangerous.
But it's too easy to use the image of trolls or spammers or hateful folks lashing out online.
They all said that their comments were respectful, thoughtful and not profane.
Attorney Lakshmi Sarma Ramani of Bowie, Md., wasn't hateful, but she asked about hate crimes.
"I also do not appreciate that idea that when a number of people comment on the same topic, they are immediately disregarded by some as a so-called collective effort, rather than recognized as a large group of concerned citizens."
It's a lot cleaner than the old days, when doing the same would have required sending staff out to collect and burn newspapers with critical editorials or arresting and silencing protesters.
Hogan isn't the first public official to be criticized for defanging Facebook and other social media.
The chair of the Loudoun County Board of Supervisors violated the First Amendment, according to U.S. District Judge James C. Cacheris in Alexandria, when she banned a constituent from her Facebook page.
In Washington's time, the era of affordable postage had an impact much like the Internet.
People using the pseudonyms "Juricola," "Valerius," "Belisarius," and "Portius" all wrote letters to newspapers trashing Washington's decisions.
Petitions criticizing his stand on the Treaty of Amity, Commerce, and Navigation with Britain overwhelmed his office, according to the historical documents collected by the online Papers of George Washington Project.
But he did not silence them.
Ronan Rafferty hopes for home comforts at Renaissance Club
Former European No 1 Ronan Rafferty will be hoping for home comforts over the next three days as the Renaissance Club in East Lothian hosts the 25th edition of the Scottish Senior Open.
The Northern Irishman, who led next door at Archerfield Links heading into the final round last year before losing out to Paul Eales, is attached to the new venue and is acting as tournament ambassador on behalf of the club's founder and CEO Jerry Sarvadi.
Jerry has done a fabulous job setting this place up.
This is a great showcase for this course."
Englishman Eales is looking forward to defending a championship for the first time despite winning on both the European Tour and European Challenge Tour in his 32-year career.
Coming back to this part of the world is magical.
Making his return to action on home soil is Gary Orr, who joined the European Senior Tour after turning 50 earlier this year.
This event will be his first Scottish appearance since the Aberdeen Asset Management Scottish Open in 2013.
"It always means a little bit more when you're playing at home," said Helensburgh man Orr.
"You want to do well; but you do feel that extra pressure.
I've really enjoyed playing again and I've played some solid golf.
Joining the trio in the field are former Masters winner Ian Woosnam and Senior major champions Paul Broadhurst, Roger Chapman, Mark James and Mark McNulty.
Back then, there were still 400 lung cancer deaths due to passive smoking every year in Germany.
Home connections prove to be very complex
The building works in Villinger Straße are in full throw and "are more or less on schedule," according to the manager of the construction yard, Fred Heinze.
The traffic, which always disrupts building works, poses a big problem for the Stumpp company construction crew.
"The ignorance of car drivers around red lights and barriers is really huge," reports Heinze.
"The hot days were pretty exhausting, for sure.
In her wooden home in Enarotali, the capital of Paniai regency in the restive Indonesian province of Papua, the housewife usually just places a sweet potato - known locally as "nota" - directly into the fireplace.
After half-an-hour, the charred tuber is retrieved and devoured with eager, unwashed hands.
A bucket in a roofless room serves as a latrine.
As the youngest of her husband's four wives, she has been assigned no fields to tend.
"No one dares to walk around the village after 5 p.m.," she says.
It's a rare glimpse of daily life in the highlands of Papua, a former Dutch colony that was absorbed into Indonesia in 1969 following a controversial referendum, when just 1,026 elders were forced to vote through a public show of hands before occupying troops.
An existing movement agitating for independence against Dutch rule swiftly turned its ire against the Jakarta government, which maintains tight control over the region, barring foreign journalists or rights monitors.
Enarotali is as remote as it is desolate; the journey here involves a 90-minute flight from the provincial capital Jayapura to Nabire, and then a stomach-churning five-hour drive by hire car.
The town of some 19,000 people consists of wooden houses ringed by bamboo fencing, corrugated iron roofs transformed by rust into varying tawny shades.
In addition, Papua boasts timber resources worth an estimated $78 billion.
These riches are, however, a source of misery for Papuans, ensuring Indonesia's powerful military maintains a suffocating presence.
A 2005 investigation in The New York Times reported that Freeport paid local military personnel and units nearly $20 million between 1998 and 2004, including up to $150,000 to a single officer.
Papuan calls for greater autonomy threaten this golden goose, and are dealt with mercilessly.
Mass killings in Papua's tribal highlands during the 1970s amounted to genocide, according to the Asia Human Rights Commission.
The screws have tightened as Papua's resources bring an influx of settlers from elsewhere in Indonesia.
Local people struggle to compete.
"The migrants started to sell chicken and vegetables in the traditional market cheaper than the local Papuans," explains Abeth You, a 24-year-old Paniai native who moved to the provincial capital Jayapura for work.
"It made the native Papuans - the mama-mama [the women] of Papua - lose their market."
Indonesian President Joko Widodo, popularly known as Jokowi, vowed to address the inequalities and rights abuses in Papua during his election campaign in 2014.
In fact, Paniai suffered a nadir just two months after Jokowi's October inauguration.
On Dec. 7, 2014 a group of 11 children were outside singing Christmas carols in front of a bonfire in Enarotali when two Indonesian soldiers on a motorbike broke through the gloom.
The soldiers, who had been drinking, chased and beat the group with their rifle butts, said victims and witnesses.
One child, 16-year-old Yulianus Yeimo, was beaten so badly he fell into a coma.
A couple of hours later, the nearby government Election Commission building was set ablaze, and things escalated the following day.
They carried ceremonial hunting bows and performed the waita dance - running in circles and simulating birdsong - of Papua's Mee Pago tribe.
As tempers grew more heated, an order was sent to the soldiers through internal radio: "If the masses offer resistance more than three times, shoot them dead," it said, according to an official document seen by TIME that has not been released to the local media.
"When I turned around I suddenly got shot in my left wrist," he told TIME on the porch of his brightly painted wooden house.
"It was crowded, many shots were fired," he adds.
"I ran to him and examined his body to make sure it was him," Yohanes, who like many Indonesians only goes by one name, told TIME somberly.
Three weeks later, Jokowi gave an impassioned speech in Jayapura, where he expressed sympathies with the victims' families and vowed to address the historic abuses in Papua.
"Most of the violations occurred a long time ago.
The point is we are committed to addressing these violations, but there are processes to go through," he said.
Wiranto, who the U.N. has indicted for "crimes against humanity" relating to more than 1,000 deaths during East Timor's bloody 1999 independence vote, said that 11 cases of human-rights violations in Papua have already been settled, including the Paniai incident.
"I'm afraid," he says.
"After burying the bodies, the military came looking for me," he says.
On Tuesday, Indonesian police shot at villagers in Paniai's neighboring Deiyai regency.
But locals say the mobile brigade (Indonesian paramilitary police) began shooting at the crowd, killing one.
"We were so panicked, we are afraid there will be revenge," 29-year-old Dominggu Badii, who lives near the hospital and witnessed the injured being hurried in, tells TIME.
"I have been hiding in my house for two days."
The Deiyai parliament has called for the officers involved to be held to account and the police mobile brigade to be withdrawn from the area.
The little rice on sale in Enarotali is too expensive for locals to buy.
Farming is the job of the women, who each can maintain four or five fields of the sweet potato.
Ten pieces of nota cost only 10,000 Indonesian rupiah (75 cents).
Over time, economic inequalities have grown between the native Papuans and the new migrants, who have arrived in greater numbers since the opening of a new air routes to Nabire Airport.
What few jobs exist typically go to the better-educated and wealthier migrants.
Isolation keeps the world's eyes off Papua.
Earlier this year, French journalists Franck Escudie and Basille Longchamp were deported from Papua for a "lack of coordination with related institutions" despite having been granted rare permission to film.
According to Phelim Kine, Deputy Asia Director of Human Rights Watch, Jokowi's election campaign pledges to lift reporting restrictions to boost transparency and development have not been realized.
"There are new hazards for foreign journalists attempting to report from Indonesia's restive easternmost provinces of Papua and West Papua: visa denial and blacklisting," he said in a statement.
The lack of press scrutiny means international pressure on the Indonesian government has been largely limited to Papua's immediate neighbors.
Indonesia has another presidential election in 2019, but Papuans say they are unlikely to vote again for Jokowi.
He wants Jokowi to know that the Paniai people, aside from living under the looming threat of a rapacious military, wallow in destitution, with paltry education and health services.
Knowing that justice may never be served, at least they won't let those responsible forget their crimes.
"A member of our family has been killed," says Yacobus, head bowed.
Fire engulfs Dubai's 'Torch' skyscraper for second time
A fire ripped through one of the world's tallest residential towers in Dubai on Friday, forcing hundreds of occupants to flee the 337 metre-tall, 79-storey structure.
It's the second blaze to sweep through the high-rise - which happens to be called the Torch tower - in just two years.
The building was evacuated, no injuries were reported, and there was no immediate word on the cause of the blaze.
"We were sleeping and we woke up to the fire alarm and people screaming.
We ran down the stairs and it took us about 10 minutes to reach from the 50th floor," a resident who gave his name as George told Reuters.
An investigation by the management of the Torch after its 2015 fire found that most of the damage was to the cladding, exterior panelling used for decoration or insulation.
The president of the International Tennis Federation has failed with his big Davis Cup coup in the general assembly.
At the meeting in Ho Chi Minh City, the (for this sport) revolutionary suggestion to from now on play the Davis Cup singles over only best-of-three sets received just shy – by a whisker – of the necessary two-thirds majority in support.
The admittedly often very long, but for that reason also greatly treasured, five-set classics are therefore surviving in the traditional competition.
63.54 per cent of the member countries voted in favour of the reform; ITF president David Haggerty's objective was therefore only just missed.
There will continue to be work done to improve the competition.
New from 2018 are only comparatively small details: so, in future, the finalists of the David Cup and Fed Cup will have the right to host in the first round the following year.
In order to keep costs to a minimum for organisers, the requirements in matters of training courts etc. are being simplified and the players will not have to give so many official media appointments ahead of the Davis Cup.
A survey of airline passengers found that more than 20 per cent had knowingly or unknowingly smuggled prohibited items past the US Transportation Security Administration checkpoints onto the aircraft, including at least 6 per cent who boarded the plane while unintentionally carrying prohibited knives or other bladed objects.
Less than 1 per cent claimed that they discovered belatedly that they had mistakenly travelled with firearms, ammunition or explosives.
Of the respondents who admitted knowingly trying to fly with something banned by the TSA, 19.7 per cent were millennials, compared with less than 15 per cent who were members of Generation X.
The most common items whisked past TSA agents on purpose were food and liquids.
The company said it surveyed travellers around the country to find out how many had accidentally brought contraband through airport security and how many had done so on purpose.
It's no surprise that the people most likely to haul contraband past security - knowingly or unknowingly - were those who fly the most.
So it's no surprise that the largest amount of stuff seized by the TSA happens to be forbidden liquids.
Electronics-multi-talent Elon Musk likes to brag about the huge number of pre-orders for his new Tesla "Model 3".
Up until now, he has withheld the fact that a portion of these customers have already cancelled their non-binding reservations.
In recent months, Musk had frequently used those more than 500,000 pre-orders to talk up the new car, for which distribution is just starting.
His argument: The challenge for ambitious growth targets is not in demand but on the production side.
In 2018 – all models taken together – it is said to be 500,000, and in 2020, a million.
Many experts doubt whether that's possible.
For the company cannot then prevent unsatisfied customers from running away in droves.
EPA Chief Pruitt Backtracks on Delaying Obama-Era Rules to Reduce Emissions
One day after getting sued by 15 states, Environmental Protection Agency chief Scott Pruitt reversed his earlier decision to delay implementation of Obama-era rules reducing emissions of smog-causing air pollutants.
Pruitt presented the change as his agency being more responsive than past administrations to the needs of state environmental regulators.
He made no mention of the legal challenge filed against his prior position in a federal appeals court.
At issue is an Oct. 1 deadline for states to begin meeting 2015 standards for ground-level ozone.
Pruitt announced in June he would delay compliance by one year to give his agency more time to study the plan and avoid "interfering with local decisions or impeding economic growth."
Pruitt, who was Oklahoma's state attorney general prior to his appointment by President Donald Trump, has long served as a reliable opponent of stricter environmental regulations.
Wednesday's sudden reversal is the latest legal setback for Pruitt's regulatory rollback agenda.
In a statement issued Wednesday evening, Pruitt suggested his about-face on ozone standards simply reinforced the EPA's commitment to working with states through the complex process of meeting the new standards on time.
Republicans in Congress are pushing for a broader rewrite of the ozone rules.
"The EPA's reversal - following our lawsuits - is an important win for the health and safety of those 6.7 million New Yorkers, and the over 115 million Americans directly impacted by smog pouring into their communities," Schneiderman said.
Ground-level ozone is created when common pollutants emitted by cars, power plants, oil refineries, chemical plants and other sources react in the atmosphere to sunlight.
The resulting smog can cause serious breathing problems among sensitive groups of people, contributing to thousands of premature deaths each year.
"We've got to keep fighting the Trump administration's ideological crusade to pander to polluters and special interests."
750 years of the St. Hilarius Church: To mark the anniversary of the mountain church, invitations are being issued to a serenade in the old cemetery grounds in Tumlingen on Sunday 16th July at 4.30pm.
Visitors to the sixth benefit serenade can let themselves be enchanted by this powerful place.
The Friends and Supporters of Tumlingen have made the rescue and preservation of the oldest building in the area their concern.
Walter Martini stresses: "It is a one-of-a-kind rural jewel".
The St. Hilarius chapel was first mentioned in records in 1267 in the Württemberg register: Count Hermann von Sulz sold "the mountain with the parish church for Tumlingen on it, together with the Bailiwick" to Master Eberhard von Horb and his brother Dietrich for 20 silver marks.
According to the text of the official document, aside from the former parish church, a lordly farm also stood on the Tumlingen mountain, which itself owned the church, or the right of patronage, and not the other way around.
People therefore also lived there too.
As is apparent from the upper administrative office for Freudenstadt's description in 1858, the "mountain" was, alongside the lower village and the upper village that can just about be made out still in the appearance of Tumlingen today, the village's third, grand centre of settlement.
The right of patronage arose out of the Early Middle-Age proprietary church law.
A lord who built and furnished a church and staffed it with a priest still remained the owner of this church and was also able to bequeath this proprietary church right.
Associated with this was the right to appoint a priest or nominate a new priest to the bishop.
The larger of the two shattered at Christmas 1673.
They brought out the pulpit and the pews and used them as firewood.
The remains of the church threatened to collapse in 1809.
Up until 1869, the Hilarius cemetery in Tumlingen served as the last place of rest for Hörschweiler's dead.
In 1823, the cemetery was expanded and the Hilarius church was demolished.
On new year's eve of 1834, a storm cleaved the church tower and half of it collapsed.
In order to prevent an accident, the tower was pulled down.
Only the dwarf tower that is still present today survived as witness of the church's 750-year-old history.
Today Horst Kallenberger and Rolf-Dieter Wasem from the "Industrious Pensioners" care for the Hilarius site, as successors of Dieter Dockhorn.
As event organiser, the Friends and Supporters of Tumlingen are issuing invitations to the sixth serenade in the old cemetery to St. Hilarius Chapel, on Sunday 16th July.
Municipal administrator Hartmut Romann gave the closing words.
The organisers are hoping for many backers in favour of preserving the historic St. Hilarius site, which is important to Tumlingen and to Hörschweiler.
The Friends and Supporters of Tumlingen feel especially bound to take care of their local region, as serenade organiser Walter Martini reinforced.
Association wants to have wind turbine approval examined
"Boisheim wehrt sich", sees no legal basis for the construction and has therefore turned to the District Administrator.
Construction and operation of wind energy plants are in principle possible within this concentration zone, but at the same time, the concentration zone has an exclusion against the use of wind energy for the rest of the city area.
Such zones are said to prevent "asparagusisation" of the landscape.
The city of Viersen had in fact passed a resolution for a second wind energy concentration zone in Boisheimer Nette a few days earlier, through an amendment to the local land-use plan – but the Düsseldorf regional government had not approved it due to a formal error.
The current state of affairs: the city council once again passed a resolution for the wind concentration zone in Boisheimer Nette before the summer break; approval from the regional government is still pending.
Erkens: "Grant of approval for the construction of wind turbines on this site is therefore precluded by planning law."
The district confirms receipt of the call for action.
"The relevant correspondence was received by the district of Viersen in the last week," declared a spokesperson.
With a view to the proceedings underway at the administrative court, the district did not want to comment on Thursday on the content of the arguments put forward by the association "Boisheim wehrt sich".
The company, in which the city of Viersen holds indirect participating interests, had concluded lease agreements with the owner of the roughly 65-hectare site last year already.
NEW Re wants to invest around 20 million euros.
Car and tractor crash together: woman dies in terrible accident
In it, a woman was fatally injured.
According to police information, a 17-year-old woman from Bornich, practising accompanied driving in her car with her 53-year old mother, the accompanying driver, was using the L 333 in the direction of Bogel.
As chairman of the trade association Christian König announced, the "home-town shopping" weekend is meant to make customers aware of what offers their own town has available aside from the usual supermarket goods.
A market with local suppliers is thus planned, similar to the weekly market.
In addition, homegrown companies are to give showcases, with their apprenticeship places.
Furthermore, the businesses in the town centre are to invite people to come "midnight shopping".
Town authorities and the trade association are cooperating with the Chamber of Industry and Commerce.
The trade association and the town are thus entering a further stage of the "attractive town centre" project.
To this belong new offerings such as the first "active day" for the fountain festival along with Sunday trading, talks with all the traders and proprietors to induce people to actively participate.
Attractive offers on the Saturday and waiving of parking fees on this day are also part of the concept.
But many locals too had lost sight of the town centre for shopping.
Ultimately, it all has to contribute to breathing life into the town centre – right up to landlords, businesses across the whole town and associations.
We have to overcome the lethargy with a network that has partly built up, König had said in the spring.
Brigit Streich, head of the Chamber of Industry and Commerce centre in Mühlhausen communicated that five Thüringen towns are taking part in the nation's third "hometown shopping" day.
The day is intended to "promote appreciation for local trade and emphasise more strongly its importance for the common good of our towns," said Streich.
The campaign, under the leadership of the Chamber for Industry and Commerce and with many partners, also brings home that all citizens can themselves influence their immediate environment with their shopping behaviour.
Authorities suspected works on a gas pipe to be the cause of the accident.
Trump pressured Mexico on border wall payment according to leaked phone call transcripts
Transcripts of phone calls between US President Donald Trump and leaders of Mexico and Australia have been leaked by the Washington Post.
On 27th January in a phone call to Mexican president, Enrique Pena Nieto, Trump urged him to stop publicly saying he would not pay for a proposed border wall.
Trump launched his presidential campaign on a promise to build a wall along the US southern border and vowed to make Mexico pay for the project.
Transcripts of his first call with Australian Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull were also published revealing a tense exchange.
Mr Trump told Mr Turnbull a deal for the US to take on refugees headed for Australia was "ridiculous," "rotten" and "stupid," insisting the deal, brokered under the Obama administration, would make him look like "a dope" after he had proposed a ban on refugee resettlement in the US.
Moore's Ford Massacre: Activists Reenact Racist Lynching as a Call for Justice
A 1948 Ford Mercury passed through a group of onlookers in rural Monroe, Georgia, and rumbled toward the small Moore's Ford Bridge.
The leader of the mob - a middle aged man in a pinstriped suit - took a long drag on his cigar and peered through the windshield.
Inside, the occupants reeled in fear.
But when a noose is thrown around the neck of "Roger," nearly everyone in the audience let out very real gasps.
Since 2005, civil rights activists have returned to the Moore's Ford Bridge to recreate the night two black couples - Roger and Dorothy Malcom, and George and Mae Murray Dorsey - were lynched by the Ku Klux Klan in 1946.
No one has ever been charged with the murders.
"It's mind boggling that all of these years, not a single person has been arrested - even though we see them in our communities; even though we know who they are," said Tyrone Brooks, who helps organize the reenactment.
"It's a stain on a history, but it's a burden on our souls."
Brooks is a 71-year-old former Georgia state congressman and lifelong civil rights activist.
A coroner places a sheet over the body of one of the victims of the Moore's Ford lynching on July 27, 1946.
According to FBI files obtained by NBC News, more than 50 men from Monroe and the surrounding counties were suspected in the lynching.
In April 1946, a Supreme Court ruling enabled black citizens in Georgia to cast ballots for the first time during the primary race later that summer.
Around the same time of the election, according to the FBI, black sharecropper Roger Malcom stabbed Barnett Hester, a white landowner, during a fight - ostensibly over a woman.
Brooks said the town rumor was that Hester had been sleeping with Malcom's wife, Dorothy, and that the baby she was carrying was not her husband's.
On July 25, 1946, Loy Harrison, a prominent white landowner, paid $600 to bail Malcom out of jail, according to the FBI.
But, driving away from the jail, as they approached Moore's Ford Bridge, a lynch mob surrounded the car.
"It is also apparent that there was a conspiracy among state and local law enforcement, who not only took part in the murders, disposed of evidence and concealed the identity of witnesses."
Brooks put it more succinctly.
"It was a voting rights massacre," he said.
For nearly a decade, Cassandra Greene has directed the annual reenactment of the Moore's Ford Bridge lynchings.
Her performance is graphic, gripping and grounded in a kind of deep racism that many would like to believe no longer exists in America.
It's difficult to watch, and even more difficult to look away, but Greene said that's the point.
"We don't want to talk about the lynching because it makes us face the ugliness in all of us," she said.
Rehearsals for this year's production began in June, and on the first day nearly 30 actors - a dozen white and the rest black - crowded into a room and listened as Greene launched into a well-rehearsed overview of the play.
"I feel dirty because this is not who I am," said Marbaugh.
Across the room, actors Darrius Bradshaw and Nick Rascona, who play Roger Malcom and Barnett Hester, rehearsed their lines.
The play begins with Malcom shouting and shoving Hester, livid that he's been sleeping with his wife, Dorothy.
"I said n---a, get off my property!"
Rascona fires back.
There's a beat.
And then everyone (at least all the black actors) bursts into laughter.
Did I go too hard?
"Yea," one of the other black cast members quipped.
"You have to hit the hard 'R.'"
And just like that the energy in the room shifts; a sense of camaraderie replaces the discomfort.
The reenactment ends violently and quickly.
There's screams, gunfire and then, silence.
A hundred yards back, a group of about four dozen spectators wipe sweat and tears away from their eyes.
One couple has traveled from Ithaca, New York, to see the performance, many are from just down the road.
They've all weathered Georgia's oppressive humidity for the nearly eight hours as Brooks lead them on a pilgrimage to the grave sites of the Malcoms and Dorseys.
Up until this point, the murders have remained an anecdote, but now, standing on the same land where the lynchings took place, the air feels haunted.
Children crouch by their heads, take in the fake blood and still bodies, and whisper to each other.
The actors throw off the lynching rope and wipe away tears.
Bradshaw hugs Marbaugh, the man in the suit who played the head Klansman.
Nick Rascona hugs two of his castmates, and then breaks down crying in their arms; the emotional toll of the performance finally getting to him.
"It's okay," one of the women whispers.
"We know that's not what's in your heart.
At one table, a white couple from Atlanta chats animatedly about the reenactment with a black couple they just met.
Denise Duplinski struggled to find words for how the performance made her feel.
"It's hard to hear those horrible awful words, and deeds ... come out of people that look like you and who do it because they look like you," she said.
"What this really does to me is make me think that lynchings are still going on," she added, "they're just called police shootings now."
Across the room, Tyrone Brooks holds court at his table, eating and reminiscing about civil rights.
He said he's already begun planning for next year's performance.
"The reenactment is inspirational in a way because it describes the horror of what we endured, but it also is a teaching moment," he said.
"Götterdämmerung" propitiates Wagnerians in Bayreuth
In the fourth part of Richard Wagner's monumental work, director Frank Castorf again focusses on a colourful and frivolous production, set against a giant, six-storey backdrop.
The revolving stage (designed by Aleksandar Denic) shows either a shabby street corner, complete with remains of the Wall and kebab shop in Berlin, a "Plaste und Elaste" logo from the DDR times, or the New York stock exchange.
Stacked oil barrels are reminiscent of Castorf's leitmotif – gold, power and greed – that runs through his production of the "Ring".
The three Rhinemaidens – sung by Stephanie Houtzeel, Wiebke Lehmkuhl and Alexandra Steiner – work wonderfully together, as they did already in "Rheingold".
They saucily seduce Siegfried (Stefan Vinke), lug a body in the boot in Hollywood manner, and play the riotous clique.
Stephen Milling sings the part of the superbly nasty Hagen, who has the aura of a heavy-weight boxer.
The scene where he slays Siegfried is brutal.
Later, Gunther (Markus Eiche) cops it too.
The audience thanks the ensemble with mighty applause.
There is a rapturous reception for Foster, Milling, Vinke and conductor Janowski, who effaces himself and bows his hands, forming a Merkel diamond.
There is huge applause for the Festival Orchestra, who appear on stage for the first time – in casual leisurewear in view of the high heat.
The performance from Frank Castorf and his directing team had been awaited with excitement.
Even if in 2013 he had had to endure another hall full of shrill catcalls, five years later there were great cheers, which drowned out the isolated boos.
"Once can see that the audience has in some way grown into the "Ring"," she had said shortly before the performance from the dpa.
The audience has not only made a kind of peace with Castorf, but on top of that, an understanding for his point of view has grown.
What are all the different places?
Menge: Normally in Steinfurt in the furniture exchange, and once a week I help out here in Greven in the Möbelbrücke.
And I have also worked at the full-day school in their supplementary activities.
What are your experiences of that?
You are 26 years old now, so a volunteer with a late-calling.
And then I asked myself, what do you do?
Do a social year, you can get an insight, can see what it is really like on site, in the thick of things too perhaps.
I will study in dual, probably do an apprenticeship as a welfare worker at the Herne child protective services and study in Hamm at the university of applied sciences.
Is it not somewhat unusual to have several different work locations during the voluntary service?
One can do it from at the old people's home right up to in youth work – in all possible facets of social work.
I was also sometimes at the open full-day schools, that is, for the afternoon care.
For me that was exactly the right thing, the thing that got me fired up.
I was able to recognise and see my own strengths, as it was really happening.
Differently from when doing the civil engineering studies?
Menge: Yeah, sure; here it's not about working out statistics.
One always has other people at the front of their minds, people who all have totally different histories behind them.
It is an area that gives one a lot.
Pearson cuts another 3,000 jobs, slashes dividend to revive business
Pearson announced a plan to cut costs by another 300 million pounds ($394-million U.S.) in May in a third cost-cutting programme to try to revive a business hit by the rapid move to digital learning.
The company, which agreed to sell its stake in Penguin Random House to partner Bertelsmann last month, said its outlook for the year was unchanged after it reported a 1 per cent rise in underlying sales in the first half to 2.05 billion pounds.
The bombing is the latest violence to have hit Afghanistan this month - on Tuesday more than 30 people were killed in a mosque blast in Herat.
A Nato statement said that Thursday evening's blast happened when a joint patrol with the Afghan army was attacked by a "personnel-borne improvised explosive device."
The statement said that all those injured are in a stable condition and are being treated at the US military hospital at Bagram airfield.
At the end of July, a suicide car bomb killed at least 30 people in a mainly Shia district of Kabul.
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency reversed a decision to delay an Obama-era rule requiring states to curb smog-causing emissions, one day after 15 states sued the agency over the move.
The EPA announced the decision to go ahead with the so-called "2015 Ozone Designations" late on Wednesday, saying it showed the agency's commitment to working with states.
Pruitt in June had announced the EPA's intention to delay the ozone designations - in which existing smog pollution is measured in parts of the country to determine where cuts must be made to meet tougher air quality standard - by one year to October 2018.
The administration of President Donald Trump has been seeking to roll back a wide array of environmental regulations imposed by former President Barack Obama, as part of a broader agenda Trump says is aimed at sparking economic growth.
The EPA's website says breathing air containing ozone "can reduce lung function and increase respiratory symptoms" like asthma.
In the end, the decision was clear: with two dissenting votes, the municipal council of Fluorn-Winzeln passed a resolution for a common room in the future retirement home.
Admittedly it will still be a while until the plot, which up until now has belonged to the church parish, comes into the possession of the municipality, but nevertheless, there are now no longer any planning obstacles for the project that has to be materialised by a private investor.
That is why there is a debate concerning a common room.
One of the two investors that are still on board has offered to accommodate the municipality.
For a special price, it would provide a living space – of around 55 square metres – and an adjacent terrace with no less than 70 square metres on the ground floor.
What the management and the majority of the municipal council have in mind is not simply to set aside such a common room as a meeting place only for the residents of the senior citizens' accommodation, but for it to be open to the community.
The decision, which was already pre-determined last Autumn through the allocation of resources for the current budget, is sweetened by funding opportunities.
The building is in an area for redevelopment.
The construction of a common room would be eligible for financial support, reports Tjaden, with 60 per cent of 30 per cent.
So as to signal to the investor that no-one wants to put a spoke in their wheel, the proposed resolution makes allowances for the determination that both a saddled roof – based on the surrounding buildings – and a mono-pitch roof – which reduces the height of the eaves and makes the building more economical – would be possible.
If it helps: it passes through the committee unanimously.
It's not so easy with the common room.
Daniela Ruf points to their many owned buildings that are not really being forged ahead, but instead they are going out of their way with the common room: "I have difficulty with that," she says.
Yvonne Staiger declares herself to be unequivocally in favour of the common room – but absolutely against an investment from the municipality.
That is simply not true according to the counterargument, for by purchasing the plot they are not giving away any grants, but are rather getting a genuine, when in doubt saleable, equivalent in value.
Collision with a car: Cyclist hurled onto the road
The senior citizen wanted to cross the lane of traffic up where the street Am Buchholzer Busch is.
FC Bayern Munich have to do without David Alaba and Thiago for the Super Cup against Borussia Dortmund
The Super Cup is happening without him: David Alaba has to skip the game against Dortmund.
With squad concerns, FC Bayern are travelling to Dortmund for the first competitive match of the new season.
The title-defender is missing seven of its pros in the Super Cup against the cup winners.
Coach Carlo Ancelotti has to also do without David Alaba in the duel with the BVB.
Ancelotti blamed the physical state of his team and the lack of balance in their game for their five defeats in the past six friendlies.
However, the 58-year-old believes that they can improve their performance in the first official competitive game of the season.
The nation's first "astral path" is to come to life in the Harz.
There has been a planetary trail in Göttingen since 2003.
Members want to set up plaques along the planned route and put information about stars and constellations on them.
The information on the plaques is to be expanded upon online.
The astral path is later to be extended, step by step.
In addition, they will learn why stars have different colours, or why one star shines more brightly than another, although it is significantly further away.
Starting at Gebhards Hotel in Goethealle, which forms the centre of our solar system, the planetary trail leads with its steles up to Hainberg and the observatory – as well as an "extra-terrestrial" location in Diemarden (Municipality of Gleichen) with the planet Sedna.
The steles with the individual planets – including Pluto, which was downgraded to a dwarf planet, at the end point – are set up at exact intervals and on a scale of one to two billion.
The Earth thus shrinks to a ball with a diameter of 6.5 millimetres, while the sun, standing exactly 75 metres away, measures 70 centimetres.
The total distance covered by the planetary trail is a good four kilometres.
While the light of the sun needs around eight hours to reach Pluto, pedestrians need a good hour to get to the stele with Pluto.
The trek to the nearest fixed star would take another half a year though.
Mikey Garcia and Vasyl Lomachenko meet for the first time, discuss a possible showdown
Vasyl Lomachenko and Mikey Garcia, who should be on a collision course to stage the most compelling boxing match under 147 pounds in the near future, met each other for the first time Thursday.
They were in separate rooms at ESPN offices in Los Angeles until Garcia, the unbeaten World Boxing Council lightweight champion, walked down the hallway to greet Lomachenko, the World Boxing Organization super-featherweight champion.
After Garcia's victory by unanimous decision over former four-division world champion Adrien Broner on Saturday on Showtime, both fighters are members of the top-five pound-for-pound list.
As the pair posed for photos, Lomachenko manager Egis Klimas noted that a potential showdown between the fighters would be "perfect sizing."
"I'm a former featherweight," Garcia reminded.
"I moved up for Broner [at 140 pounds], but I'm not that big.
I want to come down to lightweight.
Klimas asked if it should be on pay-per-view, part of a strategy he has to have Lomachenko fight a 135-pound debut bout later this year to set up a date next summer with Garcia (37-0, 30 knockouts), who also has interest in fighting the Jorge Linares-Luke Campbell winner following their Sept. 23 lightweight title bout at the Forum.
"This fight could be on pay-per-view because all the fans have been asking about it," Garcia said, later expressing openness to fighting on whatever network offers the best financial package.
But Lomachenko paused at lavish praise for Garcia, saying he thought the three-division champion from Riverside looked "very slow, sorry Mikey ... you wanted the knockout."
Garcia said the focus was to show punching strength, then box.
They both said they can feel the momentum building for their own bout.
"This is the fight to be made.
I'm more than happy to work at it," Garcia said.
Said Lomachenko: "I've waited for the top fighters, and this is Mikey.
According to initial reports, the driver of an Opel Zaifra lost control of his vehicle at around 4.30pm, shortly before the Marktbreit junction, after a burst tyre.
The car slid right into the embankment, where it overturned and then lay on its roof, on the grass verge.
While first aid was being given to the injured by the emergency services, the A7 was closed for around an hour in the northerly direction, before traffic was able to be led round the site of the accident in the left lane.
Fortunas Hoffmann: "Three at the back works better"
Andre Hoffmann was content with the first game of the season, and with the result too, were it not for the two own goals in the 2:2 against Braunschweig.
"That was two own goals too many, and in Aue, we have to take better care still," says the defender from Fortuna Düsseldorf.
The line of three at the back is to be optimised even further in the Ore mountains.
And the Fortunas don't want to let in any more goals after free kicks either.
"In future, no-one will stand on the line next to Michael (Rensing) any more."
Hoffmann is convinced that his team manages better with the three-at-the-back formation, even after the experiences in the build-up.
"However, a prerequisite is that we harmonise even better together and don't commit so many passing errors in the build up."
Naturally, Hoffmann is also travelling to Aue to win the game.
"Whether after one draw though one can talk of a failed start, I don't know.
"However, if we're standing there on Sunday with four points and can concentrate on the cup, we'll certainly be able to talk of a decent season kick-off."
"I will first judge our start to the season after six to eight matches," said Friedhelm Funkel, who did not wish to talk of an advantage over Aue just because the Saxony team's game in Heidenhelm had to be cut-off early due to a storm.
"Now they are effectively able to start the season with a home game," said Funkel, and Hoffman believes that the players from Aue could perhaps even be somewhat fresher, since they don't have any difficult and full games like Fortuna against one of the promotion favourites resting in their bones.
"That we are going to sweep them away just because we can claim a place amongst the top six is ridiculous," says Funkel, whose balance sheet against Aue, with only one defeat in nine games, is thoroughly positive.
"There is no team in the second Bundesliga that one has to beat from the outset," explains Fortuna's head coach.
"To give such a statement would be arrogant and presumptuous."
The latest results of tests on asylum seekers in Sweden subjected to a new method of medically assessing their age show that over 80 percent tested were judged to be older than 18, but not everyone has faith in their accuracy.
They are designed to make age assessment during the asylum process more accurate after the Swedish Migration Agency (Migrationsverket) was criticized for failings in assessing the correct age of some refugees claiming to be underage.
Eighty percent (2002) were judged to be 18 or over, while in a further 25 cases the Forensic Medicine Agency judged that the subject was "possibly 18 or over."
The tests are only carried out in cases where the person's age is in question.
"We see no big difference in the statistics from previous months, the numbers are quite consistent," he told The Local.
The high proportion of cases judged to be over 18 does not necessarily mean that the asylum seeker lied about their age.
The method of medical age assessment, which consists of taking X-rays of wisdom teeth and MRI scans of knee joints, then having dentists and radiologists analyse them, has also been criticised in some quarters.
"I've had reason to think about this, and I don't think the type of measurement being used should be.
The Forensic Medicine Agency's Göransson defended the accuracy of the tests however: "In general you can say that the risk of inaccurately judging a child to be an adult is small.
The biggest risk is if the person is just under 18, in which case it's around 10 percent."
Right on target
On Wednesday, a seven-tonne piece of concrete was installed at the bridge at the East entrance to the town of Lauterbach.
"We're doing very well for time – it's going great," says Reinhold Leicht, site manager at the department of road engineering and transport in the Freiburg local government.
In April, works began on all three bridges in need of refurbishment between Schramberg and Lauterbach at the same time.
The works are scheduled to be completed in October, and Leicht is certain that the timetable will be stuck to.
It is a vaulted arch bridge made of concrete that is covered in red variegated sandstone and has a total length of 4.80 metres.
Like the other two bridges, it is old by now.
This fixes the boundary and is also used as a passenger path.
The pedestrian walkway is intended to then to run over that.
What is special about this is that is uses finished parts, a patent of the Schramberg company Dizwo.
Laying cables through the structure in Lauterbach required particular flair.
For a fibreglass cable also runs there, which many companies are connected to.
In the run-up to the works, residents were informed about the project via a leaflet.
For the bridges between the construction yard building and the lake reservoir in the direction of Schramberg, traffic is single-lane and regulated by lights.
AfD in Gerolstein: Colourful protest with German potato salad
It doesn't happen that often that parties pull together, but when it concerns the Alternative for Germany (AfD), people come together who would otherwise be difficult to reconcile.
The parties who represent in the Vulkan Eifel district council (CDU, SPD, the Greens, FDP, FWG, die Linke) belong to a broad alliance that is peacefully nailing its colours to the mast on this day because the AfD are holding a "big kick-off to the election campaign" in Gerolstein Town Hall plaza.
The motto: "Eifel is staying colourful."
Originally the town picnic was planned for Brunnenplatz square under the motto "everyone at one table", but now is taking place in the carpark beneath the shopping plaza – and therefore directly in sight of those coming to the AfD event in the Town Hall.
A colourful picture on show there.
And what really delighted Christa Karoli, chairperson of the Eine Welt (One World) Forum and one of the leading organisers: "It's great how many people have come together here."
The police had summoned lots of officials to Gerolstein and were above all also present at the train station, which is only a few metres away from the event locations.
Mario Hompe from the Vulkan Eifel AfD reports that he strove hard to get such an event and that he won the contract.
The 45-year-old from Gönndersdorf had originally inquired in Daun, but had got a no there because there were not enough parking places available due to the St. Lawrence funfair already being set up.
And it does: at around 8pm some entertainment is provided, by a band on the plaza forecourt, and in the town hall, by various speakers, including Rhineland-Palatinate AfD chairman Uwe Junge.
In the hall there are about 200 in attendance, waiting for the leading candidate for the Bundestag elections, Alice Weidel, and the federal deputy chairwoman, Beatrix von Storch, to give their speeches.
The police presence is unchanged, but until now the officials have had a quiet evening.
The AfD event lasts a little more than an hour; the guests in the forecourt have a long wind, but even there it is time to clear up shortly after 9pm.
The police can go away – no specific incidents.
Together with the Bulgarian trumpeter Miroslav Petkov, he is giving a concert that carries the slogan "The Black Sea meets the Black Forest", or even, "Balkan folklore" meets a classic German education with roots in brass music.
So, Petkov is solo trumpeter with the renowned Concertgebouw Orchestra in Amsterdam, and Frederic Belli is solo trombonist with the SWR Symphony Orchestra.
Both have in common a passion not only for transcending the boundaries of their instruments but also for conflating the boundaries of the various genres.
So, Johann Sebastian Bach played by the two of them takes on a whole new sound, Daniel Schnyder's "Weltmusik" unites with Bulgarian folklore, and in the piece "Exchange Suits" from JazzEcho prize-winner Nils Wogram, they blend classical, jazz and free play into a fascinating complete art work.
The renowned composer Nils Wogram wrote it especially for the two musicians and there's more: the Haslach monastery church, with its special acoustic, was consciously incorporated into the concert.
"Some people love grilled cheese and will eat it for the rest of their lives.
The Hollywood star's most famous relationship was probably that with her "Twilight" co-star Robert Pattinson, which came apart bitterly in the end.
Despite all that, the brunette actress assures "Harper's Bazaar" magazine: "I've been deeply in love with everyone I've dated.
Or did you think I was faking it?"
I just never liked being made fun of."
She suffered from this especially in her school days, according to "Bang Showbiz", when she preferred to dress like a boy: "Not all girls are typical girls.
When I was eleven, kids told me I looked like a boy.
I felt really attacked, frightened and ashamed.
She particularly doesn't like explaining her love life to the public: "People expect you to behave in a certain way, and that makes me angry.
And maybe some people call me ungrateful, but I don't like having to justify myself to the entire public."
West Virginia governor announces he's switching parties
"Like it or not like it, the Democrats walked away from me," Gov. Justice said.
"Today I will tell you with lots of prayers and lots of thinking ... today I will tell you as West Virginians, I can't help you anymore being a Democratic governor."
The rally erupted in cheers.
"So tomorrow, I will be changing my registration to Republican," Justice added.
"As a coach, I would tell you it's time to run another play."
Mr. Trump promised earlier a big announcement at the West Virginia rally.
Forbes notes that he owns coal mines in five states, having inherited a coal business from his father.
Meanwhile, the Republican National Committee released a statement Thursday night saying "Governor Justice's party switch is another blow to a Democratic Party that would rather obstruct than work to make our country great again."
"With only 15 governorships and control of the fewest state legislatures in history, Governor Justice's announcement is just the latest rejection of a party that is leaderless from top to bottom and unable to find a positive, unifying message," RNC chairwoman Ronna McDaniel said in a statement to CBS News.
Global athletics boss Sebastian Coe praised what he described as a candid apology from Russia over a doping scandal on Thursday but reiterated it was not the moment for the country to be readmitted to the sport.
He said he was sorry to "all athletes who have had gold and silver medals snatched from them at competitions."
Despite his comments, the IAAF Congress voted in favor of maintaining the ban, imposed in November 2015 after a World Anti-Doping Agency (WADA) report found evidence of state-sponsored doping in Russia.
"I thought it was a very candid response today, a very candid presentation," IAAF president Coe told reporters.
German Defence Minister Ursula von der Leyen (CDU) remained silent on the as-yet-unexplained cause of the crash.
Their coffins were transported back to Germany and on Thursday were brought to Saint Peter's cathedral in Fritzlar, accompanied by a wake from the German army.
Then, amidst family and closest friends, the memorial service was begun by representatives of the German Army and the political world.
Memorial guests laid down roses, and the relatives stood arm in arm by the coffins.
Defence minister von der Leyen described the killed soldiers as "highly decorated" and experienced in missions.
The Stabshauptmann is said to have helped set up flight operations of the combat helicopter Tiger in Fritzlar and was one of the first six qualified Tiger pilots in his regiment.
Volker Bauersachs too, commander of the regiment to which the soldiers belonged, said: "If this crew were not able to prevent the crash, then no-one could have".
Minister von der Leyen did not express any doubts about the UN mission in Mali: the mission was dangerous.
However, it was also of great importance "for a country from which we are separated by only two nations," she said.
The Germany Army did not wish to give any indications about when or where they are to be buried.
However, he does not intend to be interred in his French homeland.
After his wife Margrethe's accession to the throne in 1972, he would have liked to have become king.
In 2016, he went into retirement and at the same time also laid aside his title of "Prince Consort".
Since Henrik did not get the title and function that he wanted in Denmark, he does not see himself as equal to his wife – not after death either, explains Lene Balleby, chief spokeswoman for the Danish royal family.
Where the last place of rest will be in the end for the 83-year-old is still unclear.
Born Henri de Laborde de Monpezat, the son of a noble French family, he had got to know Margrethe in 1965 in London.
Whereas the people's expressions of sympathy always flew to his then to be wife, Prinz Henrik had a hard time with the Danes during his almost 50-year reign.
In an autobiography, Henrik commented on his first years in Denmark: "A few months after my arrival, everything that I did was criticised.
My Danish was faltering, I preferred wine to beer, silk socks to wool socks, Citroën to Volvo, tennis to football.
Even for the Gauloises, which I smoked in place of Virginia tobacco, and which had the reputation here for being the brand of intellectuals who were critical of society, I could not hope for any leniency.
It seemed I was happy with this position and not ashamed of it.
CDU and FDP face possible majority in Lower Saxony
Lower Saxony's prime minister Stephan Weil (SPD) wants the State Parliament to have a snap new election after the loss of the red-green governing majority – but he doesn't want to step down.
Weil declared himself on Friday to be in favour of a dissolution of the Parliament.
Previously, the unexpected resignation of a Green party representative from her state parliamentary fraction in Lower Saxony had plunged Prime Minister Stephan Weil (SPD)'s government into a stark crisis.
Five months before the official date of the state elections, the red-green coalition lost in Hanover, and with that, their scant one-vote majority in Parliament over the opposition of CDU and FDP.
Elke Twesten, up until that point a Green Party representative, justified her move with the fact that she had not been nominated for the 2018 election in her constituency in Rotenburg (Wümme).
CDU parliamentary group leader Björn Thümler wants to advise his party to take her in.
The new State Parliament will be elected as normal on the 14th January next year.
However, Stephan Weil considers it imperative that the State Parliament vote to dissolve itself as swiftly as possible.
"All aspects will be debated in good time, if they are examined in a sound legal way."
Thümler called Twesten's move "somewhat curious though".
"We naturally assume that she will give up her seat in Parliament, which she won on a Green party ticket, with immediate effect," communicated state chairpersons Meta Janssen-Kucz and Stefan Körner.
She consciously decided not to give any statement in the parliamentary group.
Twesten's resignation costs Red-Green the majority in Lower Saxony.
The politician "in her wounded vanity and in her frustration" put "her personal interests above the wellbeing of the state," critisised SPD General Secretary Hubertus Heil.
"It is a scandal that the CDU in Lower Saxony plays along in this dirty scheming and attempts to score political points from it."
The parliamentary group leader of the SPD in the Bundestag, Thomas Opperman, accused Twesten of distorting the result of the State election in 2013 with her personal career notions.
The CDU was then the strongest power ahead of the SPD, but SPD and Greens had a wafer-thin majority of one vote in the State Parliament.
Minister of Food and Agriculture Christian Schmidt (CSU) answers our questions in interview with RedaktionsNetzwerk Deutschland (RND).
Affected eggs should be destroyed or returned.
Even if, according to everything we know at this point in time, a health risk is all but ruled out.
Is Aldi now adopting the best possible reaction to the crisis – removing all eggs from their offering – because the Federal Minister of Food and Agriculture is not really playing the central role of providing clear information?
Despite that, the ministry immediately connected and has been liaising closely with the state authorities ever since it became known that Germany was affected.
Uncontaminated eggs, however, can be sold and consumed.
Are production facilities and consumers in the same boat?
According to what we currently know, the production facilities are not in any way directly to blame.
In fact, due to suspected illegal practices by service companies, they have to deal with commercial claims.
As always in emergencies, there are too few inspectors.
Is it just the number of staff that is lacking, or the key competence as well?
It is for precisely this reason that it is so crucially important to have such occurrences thoroughly cleared up and passed over to public prosecutors in cases where crimes could have committed.
Consumers have the right to get only safe food that is approved for market.
If a prohibited insecticide is used in the food industry, consumers are quite right to be indignant.
Work must be done on this consistently and urgently at all levels.
Rules aimed at preventing unfettered spending by European soccer clubs will not disrupt Neymar's world-record transfer from Spain's Barcelona to France's Paris-Saint Germain.
Any consequences will come further down the line for Paris Saint-Germain from UEFA, the governing body overseeing the European game which has the power to ban teams from the prestigious Champions League tournament.
Financial Fair Play rules launched by UEFA in 2011 mean that PSG will eventually have to show that Neymar's transfer was funded without incurring huge losses.
Barcelona has been paid 222 million euros ($262 million) just to buy the Brazilian out of his contract and Neymar will command a salary that will run to tens of millions of dollars a year.
PSG can certainly stump up the cash to sign Neymar and add him to a galaxy of other stars, given the team's funding from the energy-rich ruling family of Qatar.
Clubs are allowed to spend heavily on acquiring players but they have to counterbalance that with legitimate sources of income, allowing them to approach break-even on their football-related business.
And despite Platini being ousted in disgrace from the presidency in 2015, his UEFA successor Aleksander Ceferin is still committed to deterring excessive spending.
Neymar has signed a five-year deal, so the transfer fee could be shown as a 44.4 million-euro cost in the annual accounts for the next five years.
UEFA is on the lookout for clubs who might try to outwit its financial regulators by inflating their income through companies linked to a club's owners.
While a Qatari company could sponsor PSG, if the value of the sponsorship was deemed to exceed standard market rates UEFA would not allow it to count as legitimate income.
That is what happened in 2014 when UEFA ruled that the value of the Qatar Tourism Authority sponsorship of PSG was inflated.
But PSG and Qatar 2022 have denied that Neymar will become a World Cup ambassador and such a maneuver would be easy for UEFA's regulators to expose.
Past sanctions slapped on PSG means that UEFA will be even more watchful of any attempt to circumvent the rules.
UEFA has not been in pre-emptive discussions with PSG about Neymar's transfer, people familiar with the situation said Thursday.
PSG expects Neymar's arrival to be a boon for sponsorship deals, merchandising and jersey sales.
Clearly irritated to see one of soccer's biggest players leaving, the Spanish league tried to stymie Neymar's move, claiming that PSG will be breaching FFP.
"Once a country owns a club, everything is possible.
It becomes very difficult to respect the Financial Fair Play because you can have different ways or different interests for a country to have such a big player to represent a country."
Swiss is on the look out for a new choccy supplier
Now the sweet collaboration faces a possible end: the airline is inviting new calls for tenders.
According to current plans, the airline will conclude a new contract in the first half year of 2018.
Every year, around 17 million small 14-gram chocolate bars packaged in red and white are handed out by the flight attendants to passengers before landing.
However, more important is always the advertising effect: for a chocolate producer, it is a prestigious contract.
Swiss will not disclose how many bidders there are for the new call for tenders.
According to the newspaper report, Chocolat Frey wants to strive to renew the contract beyond Spring 2018.
The biggest Swiss chocolate producer was not available to the sda for a statement.
Swiss has been handing out chocolate bars on board their flights since 2006.
Swiss introduced the possibility of inserting a logo two and a half years ago, at the start of the collaboration with Chocolat Frey.
The airline collaborates with various Swiss chocolate manufacturers.
On long-haul flights, the first class customers are spoiled with treats from confectioner Sprüngli; in business class, passengers nibble on chocolate from Lindt, and in economy class, chocolate from Chocolat Frey.
On short-haul routes too, Swiss hands out chocolate from Chocolate Frey, both in business and in economy class.
Track-and-field discus Olympic champion Robert Harting reaches the World Championship finals
Nostalgia Goes Niche in "Wet Hot American Summer" and "Comrade Detective"
So this iteration of the story is simultaneously nostalgic for the characters' '80s glory days; for the '90s grunge era (around when the masterminds David Wain and Michael Showalter made the sketch comedy "The State" for MTV); and for itself - that is, for 2001, before its stars, like Elizabeth Banks, Amy Poehler and Paul Rudd, went on to bigger things.
As a cultural artifact, it's both a sendup and embodiment of our Facebook-enabled era of permanent reminiscence.
But as a franchise, it feels like it's running out of time.
"First Day of Camp" worked surprisingly well, not just because of its absurdist humor (it included an origin story for a talking can of vegetables, voiced by H. Jon Benjamin).
By doubling down on the core gag - middle-age actors playing horny kids coming of age - it made the impossibility of recapturing the past part of the joke.
"Ten Years Later," with its adults now playing adults, is less emotionally rooted and its parody more scattershot, including a riff on '90s stalker flicks like "The Hand That Rocks the Cradle."
At one point a character rummages through an Apple Powerbook, some in-line skates and "a bunch of other things from 1991."
Sweet-hearted Coop (Mr. Showalter), now a novelist, still hasn't gotten over Katie (Marguerite Moreau).
Victor (Ken Marino) still hasn't lost his virginity.
And there's another battily villainous plot involving Ronald Reagan (also Mr. Showalter), now abetted by George H. W. Bush (a well-inhabited impression by Michael Ian Black).
As always, the best part of the franchise is the digressions.
It's especially fun to see the forever-young Mr. Rudd, sporting Matt Dillon's soul patch from "Singles," whose former big-man-on-camp Andy now feels like a geezer.
It's the moments of random lunacy that might power this franchise on, like a kind of recursive "Seven Up!" series, until it reaches what I assume will be its logical conclusion: "Wet Hot American Summer: Twenty Years Later," whose last scene will have the gang going to see the movie premiere of "Wet Hot American Summer."
"Comrade Detective" on Amazon, meanwhile, appeals to a different brand of nostalgia: the Cold War revivalism of "The Americans," the film "Atomic Blonde" and even "GLOW," with its East versus West wrestling iconography.
The comedy, created by Brian Gatewood and Alessandro Tanaka, with Rhys Thomas directing, purports to be found TV: a Romanian 1980s buddy-cop drama about two Bucharest officers fighting for truth, atheism and the Marxist-Leninist way.
The lead roles - hard-boiled Gregor and idealistic Iosef - are played by Florin Piersic Jr. and Corneliu Ulici, their dialogue dubbed in English by Channing Tatum (also an executive producer) and Joseph Gordon-Levitt.
There are some fine sight gags (the police pass the time watching chess on TV as Americans might football).
And the roster of famous voice-over actors - among them Jenny Slate, Nick Offerman, Mahershala Ali and Chloë Sevigny - makes for a decent game of spot-the-voice.
But "Comrade Detective" is so committed to the verisimilitude of a hamfisted propaganda drama - a killer wearing a Reagan mask is involved - that it often plays like one.
At six long episodes, it drags, and the comedy isn't fast or frequent enough.
Edited to a tighter length, "Comrade Detective" might deliver better on its agitprop satire, as when Gregor and Iosef repeatedly visit the American Embassy, whose lobby is always occupied by two fat men wolfing down a pile of hamburgers.
The message, for the imagined communist audience, is that Western culture can turn anything into fodder to binge.
The fictional Romanian creators were not wrong: We even do it with our own recent history, and theirs.
Blow dealt to drug mafia in the country
In the course of this, 15 accused, aged between 25 and 77, were detained and already had arrest warrants issued against them.
The mafia members were charged with organised drug-related crime, serious acts of violence, attempted murder, and robbery and extortion.
Konstanz public prosecutor's office has been investigating the drug trade in southern Germany since the summer of 2016 already.
The major operation on Wednesday morning was thus attended by four officials from Palermo.
An incident on 27th May in Hüfingen, during which several shots were fired into a restaurant in the early morning, is also likely to have been caused by the gang.
"Data for citizens that ought not to be showing up there": according to a report, the Register of Foreigner Nationals in Germany is exhibiting significant defects.
Frank-Jürgen Weise, the official appointee of the German Government for the management of refugees, has brought attention to big holes in the Central Register of Foreign Nationals, according to one media report.
Because the data have not been sufficiently maintained, it said, the quality of the data has in part not been good to date.
Such false categorisations, however, led to "a biased debate about how to deal with those who are obliged to leave the country," it says accordingly in the analysis.
Meanwhile, the German Government has apparently begun to send back to Italy refugee families with children under 16 years of age, if this is where they entered the country from.
In the paper, it says that the BAMF has been once more transacting such procedures "that concern families with children – with the exception of infants and very small children – to Italy since 1st June 2017."
Since the end of 2014, that had practically no longer been possible, says the newspaper, pointing to the difficult situation on the ground.
According to the Dublin Regulation, it is the EU state the refugee first reaches that is responsible for them.
If a migrant travels further into another EU country, this state can send him back to the country he entered from.
Italy has provided guarantees for the intake and accommodation of families.
Other EU states too would send back refugees there using the scope of the Dublin Agreement.
The Linke party's spokeswoman for domestic poicy, Ulla Elpke, criticised this decision: "Due to shortcomings in the Italian asylum system, families with children are threatened with conditions of admission that contravene human rights and with risk to the child's welfare"
Altogether, the blood donor service made 220 litres of blood from people living in Oberreichenbach available for others.
At least, from the twelve citizens who were honoured on Friday.
The community traditionally acknowledges the repeated willingness to give blood in the meeting of its municipal council.
"It is ingenious how our bodies are designed for this and we show respect to the donors who make their blood available for strangers, and so selflessly," stressed mayor Karlheinz Kistner.
"One single blood donation helps multiple people," explained the district head of the on-call service of the German Red Cross (DRK), Holger Maisenbacher, for the reserves are broken down into their components.
So, as many as three people could benefit from a single blood donation.
At the same time, Maisenbacher reported on the campaigns that are to be carried out in Oberreichenbach in the spring.
"This year, we achieved our second best result ever, with 114 donors," said the DRK on-call district head.
Obviously the move into the theatre venue a few years ago led to a higher number of participants.
Half as many were clocked up by Herbert Mair and Dorothee Reixinger, while Tamara Pfrommer, Petra Schleeh, Stefanie Stoll and Uwe Vetter each gave 500 millilitres of their lifeblood.
The Bank of England is expected to announce later that interest rates will remain unchanged after lacklustre economic growth and easing inflation dampened speculation over a hike.
The Bank of England has warned economic growth will remain "sluggish" as it kept interest rates on hold amid a tightening squeeze on family incomes.
But it signalled rate hikes will be needed over the next few years to rein in Brexit-fuelled inflation and said borrowing costs may need to rise by more than expected in financial markets.
It will call time on the Term Funding Scheme to offer cheap-finance to banks from next February, although it said it was now expected to offer £15 billion more under the scheme - at £115 billion.
In minutes of the rates decision, the Bank said: "In the MPC's central forecast, gross domestic product (GDP) remains sluggish in the near-term as the squeeze on households' real incomes continues to weigh on consumption."
On rates, it reiterated that "some tightening of monetary policy" would be needed to cool inflation and by a "somewhat greater" extent than markets expect.
Sterling fell against the dollar and the euro following the news.
The no-change decision comes after recent disappointing growth figures have dampened mounting expectations of a hike, with GDP edging up to 0.3% in the second quarter from 0.2% in the previous three months.
Its latest inflation report offered little cheer for households being hit by soaring inflation and paltry pay rises as it said the squeeze will get worse before it gets better.
It added that monetary policy "cannot prevent" the hit to incomes over the next few years, but expects wages will recover "significantly" towards the end of its three-year forecast.
The economy is also set for a boost from surging demand for British goods thanks to the weak pound, which will offset some of the lower consumer spending.
The Bank estimates it will likely take four years to fully feed through to prices and the economy.
Prior to the Bank's latest rates verdict, there had been growing clamour for a rate rise as inflation ramped up pressure on hard-pressed households, with three policymakers calling for an increase to 0.5% in July.
Andrew Montlake, director at Coreco Mortgage Brokers, said: "Given the recent fall in swap rates, the mortgage market looks set to become ever more competitive once more as lenders clamour for business and look to end the year in positive fashion.
The market looks particularly good for those who may be coming to the end of their existing deals as re-mortgages, many with fee-free options as well as low rates, become ever more popular."
Patients will be able to access a 'transformative' HIV prevention treatment from September following a High Court battle over funding the drug on the NHS.
NHS England announced that pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP), a pill taken before sex which has been shown to reduce the risk of infection in high-risk individuals by around 86 per cent, will now be provided by the health service through an initial three-year trial to an estimated 10,000 people.
It agreed to fund the trial after the Court of Appeal upheld a High Court ruling last year, which said the NHS had the power to pay for PrEP despite its claims that local authorities should fund it.
Pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP) is a course of HIV drugs taken before sex to reduce the risk of getting HIV.
Taking PrEP before sex means there is just enough of certain drugs in a person's body to prevent an HIV infection taking hold.
Those eligible for the treatment include gay or bisexual men, transgender people and those with HIV-positive partners who are not successfully receiving treatment.
Clinics will identify eligible participants who consent to the trial, including men, women, transgender people, and individuals who have a partner whose HIV status is not known to be controlled by anti-retroviral treatment.
People living and registered with a GP in England will also be able to enrol for potential participation at their local participating sexual health clinic.
The trial is designed to assess the full potential of PrEP by gathering clinical evidence on how it is targeted, taken up, and implemented on a large scale.
From September, people at high risk of HIV will have access via this NHS-funded trial in England to an empowering new tool that is truly individually controlled and not subject to negotiation with a partner, leading to the improvement of many, many lives.
Now that the PrEP trial drug has been procured, we're well on the way to protecting over 10,000 people at risk of HIV.'
Shadow public health minister Sharon Hodgson said: 'The start of the PrEP trial is welcome and long overdue after months of delays and heel-dragging by the Government.
This trial will take us one step closer to fully understanding the benefits of PrEP.
It is on the first floor of a smart Queen Anne terrace - and it is a testament to the new design that Joanne hasn't packed her bags and sold on.
"I was looking for something that was comparable for my price.
I fell in love with it and put an offer in that day."
Originally a one-bedroom property with a convoluted layout - you had to walk through the kitchen to get to the bedroom - Joanne wanted to add storage space and a mezzanine to make the most of the generous ceiling height.
Erfan had to think creatively to resolve the brief.
"The steelwork is quite complicated," he explains.
"We had to arrange the spaces so that they stacked on top of each other without needing to hunch down.
It wasn't just building a simple platform, but cranking the steels so that they were at the right height for the function above or below."
This arrangement allowed Erfan to get two full-height rooms on top of each other in the space - with lots of added drama.
For the mezzanine, a vintage copper light window from Retrouvius looks down over the glamorous living area below.
Mirrored gold furniture, silver accents and vintage Serge Mouille lighting all set the style for the scheme.
The use of mirrors plays a part in adding theatre, space and light.
A short corridor is mirrored at both ends to make it appear longer.
In the kitchen, the mirrored splashback feels like a window to another room.
Giving the perception of a more glamorous space, the beauty of the living room is being able to close off the kitchen when it's not in use.
Foldaway kitchens are nothing new.
What's unique about this one is that it's a garage-style lift-up door.
"A bit of engineering went into that," explains Erfan of the steel-reinforced, veneered MDF door.
"It's counter-weighted so that when you push the door up, it glides really easily."
"At the end of the day, floor space is what you are going to sell - or how your property is valued," Erfan says.
"In a rudimentary form, a real estate agent will walk in and do a calculation based on floor size."
"The materials are the things that you touch and therefore help to create an emotional bond in a home," says Erfan.
"You don't fall in love with the electrical feeds in the walls.
It goes to show that through good design and increased square metreage, a flat can turn from something standard into something quite amazing.
Two brothers are at war over one of Victoria's biggest real estate empires, worth more than $500 million, four decades after their Italian family founded the dynasty.
Former Carlton Football Club director and developer Colin De Lutis lives in a Toorak mansion three doors from younger brother Paul, who has taken him to the Supreme Court over how their property and business assets will be sliced up.
Paul has wanted out of the family business since 2014 but an acrimonious argument is playing out in the Supreme Court over the break-up.
Together with their mother Anna the brothers own 38 properties worth more than half a billion dollars, amassed since the family bought a Smith Street, Collingwood, shop in 1973.
It sold in 1999 for $85 million.
That money was sunk into property and the De Lutis portfolio now includes city offices, Brunswick and Sorrento development sites, Gold Coast and Mt Buller apartments, and suburban shopping centres.
A court filing says this translates to Colin owning property worth $316 million and Paul $176 million.
Dividing the properties and cash has proved the sticking point for Paul.
"The splits proposed by Colin left him with what I considered to be the best properties," he wrote in an initial court affidavit in 2015.
The brothers are also now fighting over who controls the existing business - which Paul alleges Colin has locked him out of.
Colin argues this is not true, but accuses Paul of incompetently managing some properties.
"My Italian heritage dictates that family is the most important priority," he wrote.
Costs are mounting in the case, with hundreds of pages of affidavits, emails and reports by companies including Deloitte, Pitcher Partners and Charter Keck Cramer filed and top barristers including Allan Myers, QC, and senior solicitors retained by both sides.
Anna De Lutis says she and Luigi, who died in 2012, hoped to pass down their properties to their sons amicably.
"Luigi often said to me that he never wanted the brothers to end up in court," she wrote.
Both Luke and Mark had become, Paul says, "bitter about the terms of their financial separation."
Colin has kept a low profile despite being a former AFL club board member and, according to a 2015 biography of Eddie McGuire, the television star's best friend.
Fairfax Media contacted Colin and Paul De Lutis on Friday, and their lawyers.
"Our father would not have wanted to see Paul and I end up in our current dispute," he said, adding that he was "still hopeful of resolution."
Trump's new chief of staff plans to restrict the president's media diet.
Politico reports that the new White House chief of staff plans to restrict the flow of information to President Trump - including news media reports - in the hope of keeping the boss on a more even keel.
"When new White House Chief of Staff John F. Kelly huddled with senior staff on his first day at work, he outlined a key problem in President Donald Trump's White House that he planned to fix: bad information getting into the president's hands.
Kelly's diagnosis makes perfect sense, but others have tried and failed to tame Trump by monitoring his media diet.
President Trump's relationship with television goes back decades - and now that he's in the White House, his TV-watching habit is still going strong.
"If candidate Trump was upset about unfair coverage, it was productive to show him that he was getting fair coverage from outlets that were persuadable," Sam Nunberg, a former campaign adviser, told Politico in February.
Politico's Tara Palmeri wrote at the time that "the key to keeping Trump's Twitter habit under control, according to six former campaign officials, is to ensure that his personal media consumption includes a steady stream of praise."
Maybe these campaign officials know something the rest of us don't - that Trump's tweets would have been even more inflammatory if not for their interventions.
We'll probably never know about tweets that Trump didn't send.
If his staffers managed to him out of trouble even a few times, then their efforts were worthwhile.
But no one has been able to consistently prevent Trump from stirring up controversy.
Part of the problem is that in a White House composed of competing factions, people invariably try to advance their agendas by presenting Trump with material - which may or may not be reliable - that promotes their worldviews.
Politico - all over this story - reported in May on advisers' penchants for strategically feeding dubious information to the president.
"Current and former Trump officials say Trump can react volcanically to negative press clips, especially those with damaging leaks, becoming engrossed in finding out where they originated.
That is what happened in late February when someone mischievously gave the president a printed copy of an article from GotNews.com, the website of Internet provocateur Charles C. Johnson, which accused deputy chief of staff Katie Walsh of being 'the source behind a bunch of leaks' in the White House.
No matter that Johnson had been permanently banned from Twitter for harassment or that he offered no concrete evidence or that he had lobbed false accusations in the past and recanted them.
As the address is unknown, the assistance of the population is being requested and hoped for.
Since the addresses of the sought-after serious criminals are not known, they are hoping and asking for tips from the population.
Europol reported on Friday about the campaign, which follows on from the "EU Most Wanted" advent calendar from the winter.
It has so far been possible to arrest 36 of those being sought online; at least 11 of these are due to tips following publication on the internet site.
Travellers negotiate trench, return to 'Millionaire's row'
Some of the West Midlands' wealthiest homeowners are again at loggerheads with determined travellers who have negotiated a council-dug trench to reclaim a field outside their mansions.
The travellers have parked their 20 caravans in a field outside a prosperous street of Solihull dubbed 'millionaire's row'.
Bringing horses, babies and an army of vans, they have returned after being kicked out only in May, undeterred by a moat dug by the council to prevent their incursions.
The tactful group found a gap in the defences, squeezing their vehicles though a section left unbarricaded to accommodate a pathway.
Furious residents have savaged Solihull Council saying it was 'useless at dealing with the problem'.
One anonymous resident said: 'They moved there on Monday night after being moved on from Bentley Heath where they were throwing rocks at passers by.
The council needs to be shamed into action as they are useless at dealing with the problem.
She added: 'Birmingham council knows how to deal with this by getting long injunctions to protect their parks.
I live on Streetsbrook road and I'm not happy to continue paying my council tax when the council can't even stop this.'
One local resident who did not wish to be named said: 'It is ridiculous, we have only just seen the last round of these travellers leaving, only to be blighted by another round.
The numbers have increased this time and a horse has even been seen grazing on the parkland.'
A spokeswoman for Solihull Council said: 'We are aware of an unauthorised encampment on land off Streetsbrook Road and working alongside Solihull Police, we are undertaking the necessary legal actions to move them on as quickly as possible.
This helps build a picture of the situation for the court to consider when we present our case to them.'
In the autumn of 2014, in the face of dramatically increasing numbers of refugees who were coming into the rural district, the hotel building was offered to the district administration as collective housing, which sparked controversial discussions.
The decision passed in the municipal council back then without controversy.
The Luisenhotels Group, with Managing Director Birgit Scherer, based in Bad Bergzabern, acquired the former Hotel Birkenhof at a voluntary auction in Berlin and wants to return it to being an establishment in the three-stars-or-more category, under the name Waldhotel Luise.
There has been a skip standing in front of the entrance to the former Hotel Birkenhof for a long time now, and when you enter the building, it becomes clear just how extensive the refurbishment works are that are being undertaken.
The entire hotel building is one big construction site.
The rooms are being kitted out with large, walk-in showers, the entrance foyer is being revamped, new windows are being installed.
Everything should later become "beautifully in touch with the people", is how Thomas Scherer expressed it.
One doesn't want to position oneself at the high level of the hotels in Lauterbad, but still at an elevated downtown level, stressed Scherer.
The city's expectations are said to be in line with those of the hotel group.
Asked about the level of investments, Thomas Scherer doesn't want to commit himself precisely.
A little under a million euros, he reckons.
Russia affair: US Special Counsel convenes grand jury
Grand juries are for this reason also called prosecution chambers.
They are usually engaged for major and controversial cases.
The panel may also be engaged by the public prosecutor's office to subpoena people for questioning under oath.
They were also supposed to make documents available.
However, this does not necessarily mean that the grand jury is ultimately being engaged in order to decide whether to bring charges.
Nevertheless, the convening of the panel signals the beginning of a new phase in the investigations and gives President Trump a new cause for concern.
He said the subject gives Democrats an opportunity "to feel better when they have nothing else to talk about."
However, Mueller was only engaged after Trump had fired Comey.
Unlike an independent Special Counsel of Congress, such as, for example, in the Watergate scandal concerning President Richard Nixon, who later stepped down, Mueller is in a position where, in theory, he could be fired by the justice department if the President pushed for it.
Antarctica: Gigantic iceberg drifts into the Antarctic
In the West Antarctic, a gigantic iceberg almost seven times the size of Berlin has detached from the ice shelf.
The Alfred Wegener Institute for Polar and Marine Research in Bremerhaven communicated this on Wednesday.
It does not pose any danger for men.
The extent to which climate change had a part to play in the iceberg breaking off is unclear from the research scientists' findings.
Nevertheless, altogether, there have been a series of unusual collapses of ice shelves in the region for around 30 years now, writes the US research centre for snow and ice (NSIDC) in a background fact report.
The now detached colossus was previously a part of the Larsen C ice shelf.
The equilibrium between growing and breaking off became disrupted north of this ice shelf a few years ago.
An entire ice shelf crumbled there, writes AWI researcher Daniela Jansen.
There is some evidence that the Larsen C ice shelf is in danger too, for the front edge has never retreated so far back as it currently is.
What is more, the ice sheet is under tension and could crumble if a piece breaks off at a key point.
The melting of shelf ice and icebergs do not raise sea water levels, since they float on the water and ice displaces as much water as it itself produces after melting.
It regularly breaks off there.
"Although this is a natural event, and we’re not aware of any direct link to climate change, this puts the ice sheet in a very vulnerable position," says Martin O'Leary from Britain's Swansea University.
"This is the furthest back that it has been since records began," he also confirmed.
Even if these researchers do not attribute the break-off of this gigantic iceberg to climate change, nevertheless, very many ice shelfs in the Antarctic Peninsula have crumbled in recent decades.
This long tail of Antarctica stretches towards South America.
The rise in temperatures has contributed to this decline.
The Antarctic Peninsula has warmed up by around three degrees in the last 50 years and is amongst those areas where temperatures are rising most quickly.
CDU want in-house wage agreement for staff
Since it is getter ever more difficult to fill the positions that become available, the CDU is calling for secession from the employers' association, so as to become more attractive.
The apprenticeship positions at the district are apparently very coveted.
However, the district is lacking additional personnel which it needs to overcome growing demands and duties.
The administration is to "work out a plan for acquiring and developing staff," in line with the wishes of the parties.
The plan is not only to satisfy short-term demand in skilled workers, but, with a view to the future, to counteract the shortage of applicants, it is reported.
Well that does sound like a good approach.
Other cities poach good officials and staff members and offer attractive conditions.
High time to act then, so that not even more positions remain unfilled.
Just recently he caused a huge surprise in the district assembly when he publicly called the staff capping into question and startled the other parties.
"If we don't reach a satisfactory solution in the short term, the district administration should strive with the unions – perhaps also in collaboration with the district's towns – to secure an in-house wage agreement," said Völker.
The CDU are thereby attempting to pay the permanent staff and officials better than the pay-scale for public sector workers actually allows for.
Salaries are currently prescribed exactly, and there are only raises or more money when moves into a more senior level, which is based on years experience.
Yet the district's tasks have expanded more and more in recent years.
Not least because of the growing number of applications for asylum, County Commissioner Thomas Hendele and District Director Martin Richter have a problem: they have too few staff.
Minniti's warning came a day after Italian authorities impounded a boat operated by German aid organisatiion Jugend Rettet on suspicion its crew effectively collaborated with people traffickers in a way that facilitated illegal immigration.
The aid organisation, which has only been operational for a year, declined to comment on the substance of detailed allegations made against it by Italian prosecutor Ambrogio Cartosio.
Its crew is suspected to taking on board dinghy loads of migrants delivered directly to them by people traffickers and allowing the smugglers to make off with the vessels to be used again.
At least one such meeting allegedly took place only 1.3 miles off the Libyan coast, according to the prosecutor's file, the contents of which were published by Italian media.
Minniti meanwhile said a sharp fall over recent weeks in the number of migrants arriving in Italy following rescues was an indication that efforts to beef up the Libyan coastguard and cooperation with local mayors was bearing fruit.
Ascents and trials
Nine Weilermer Bikers, the "Berlin outpost", and two guest riders met in Wachenheim in North Palatinate to enjoy four days of trials and attractions.
Three chummy guides were on hand for this.
Wachenheim's Castle and Wine Festival was a welcome extra.
The first tour led along the vineyards, amidst hot summer temperatures, to the Chapel of St. Michael above Deidesheim.
In between, there were time and again long uphill climbs, for which long trials were the reward.
On the second day, they went to Bad Dürkheim, to the salt works and to the Wurstmarkt festival.
Again, there came vantage point after vantage point, strung together with "flowing" trials and moderate ascents.
On the last two days, lots of high altitudes were on the cards again.
In Bad Dürkheim, the bikers breathed in healing salt water in the open-air inhalatorium.
Console instead of turf – Bundesliga is getting ready for e-sport
Will the sports stars of the future sit in front of computer consoles instead of battling sweatily, come wind or rain, on the stadium turf?
Even the top Bundesliga clubs have recognised this, and are getting more and more involved in this area.
"Real football has to deal in particular with the 14-30 year olds, so that the young people still go to the stadium in the future," says the 52-year-old.
With prominent e-sportspeople under contract, it would be possible to be present online in these markets vastly more often than the mere once a year the national team gets sent to Asia.
What exactly is it about?
For many people, this notion certainly takes some getting used to.
In addition, it requires cognitive capabilities, technical and tactical understanding and an ability to react quickly.
Professional gamers ought to train not only on the console, but also their bodies, and should pay attention to their diet.
Froböse sees problems too though: "Doping is becoming more and more of an issue".
The players travel internationally, it is like a big global family, and there are no intercultural barriers.
Compared to the almost 2.4 billion euros of the football Bundesliga that is admittedly scant.
However, the e-sport is "no longer far off other established sports like handball, basketball or ice hockey," write the Deloitte consultants.
In Europe too, quite a bit is happening.
In the Netherlands and in France, the top division football clubs are now committed to setting up an e-sport department, according to Dutt.
Simply to slide back into nostalgia and romanticise the old days is no longer enough these days.
"So you can't cling on to the idea that only in football, everything stays as it always was."
